Great little place in Palo Alto! We went on a weekday, but the place was still PACKED. Luckily we had a reservation; however, they wouldn't seat us until our ENTIRE party had arrived. And since 2 friends were stuck in traffic, it meant we waited around for 20 minutes, and our table for six just sat empty. The pasta was cooked to be al dente, which is SUCH a rarity. And the selection of pasta was really good. The portion size is very reasonable, and we were all full- without being stuffed. We even had room to share dessert at the end. We had a fantastic server; he was super friendly- and very Italian. He constantly joked with us, and almost even sang at the end. He was also very friendly to all the other tables, and was still able to to not keep anyone waiting for too long.
this place is a joke, and obviously whoever thinks that it is italian food has never put a foot in the boot!! take pasta (they say it's homemade, tasted just like a box), damp it in industrial bolognese sauce (tasted just like a jar), sprinkle some basil on top to make it look fresh and have some silly waiter go around with low quality grated parmesan pretending to speak italian.... that is l'osteria... add that they serve you half a loaf of day old plastiky supermarket sourdough with half melted butter. and that  their prices are high! then you got one of the worst italian american place ever, pretentious, fake, low quality... dont' go!! if you have to have italian in Palo Alto, go to La Strada! otherwise rush to redwwod city for an awesome dinner a Donato Enoteca, it won't cost more and it's better in every way
The food was great (I ordered the fettuccine with porcini mushrooms and truffle oil), but the SERVICE was HORRENDOUS!! The maitre d' was short with us, and right when we finished our dessert he came up to the table and asked us to leave because there were other people waiting.  There were six of us, and we barely had time to enjoy our food! The food came extremely fast and it was very tasty, but the rude maitre d' definitely brought this place down a few stars. Our waiter was extremely friendly though, and even brought us olive oil to the table when we wanted some for our bread instead of butter!
I have always liked this place but in the past have been put off by the crowds and closeness of the tables.   It feels like somehow they may have taken a table or two out  ... or maybe I'm getting more tolerant.   At any rate, the seating was very comfortable.   We went over Labor Day Weekend & had no problems with reservations.   The host was friendly & accommodating. What I liked:    my favorite dish here is the Calamari Steak (Meuniere-Prep) ...  90% of local restaurants serve frozen calamari steak which tastes like old tires.    There are a few that don't --- Carpaccio in Menlo Park, Iron Gate in Belmont, Bella Vista, and Osteria --  all good, but I like Osteria's prep best.    We also had the Veal Piccata which was very good, maybe a tiny bit salty.   Service was very efficient ... the server waited until we finished appetizers to put in the main course order, and the food arrived very freshly hot.   I noticed pastas being delivered at adjoining tables that were literally steaming.   Wine prices were VERY fair ... bottle of Saintsbury Chardonnay = $38 ...less than 2x retail. What needs a bit of work:   Broccoli accompanying main course was way overcooked.   Bread as noted in other reviews was nothing special & cold.    Butter served with bread, but this place cries out for good olive oil instead or in addition. All in all ... one of the best Italian meals I've had in the area.
We took a dear friend there for her birthday.   Wonderful food and wonderful service. We  will most certainly visit again!
Yummy! Although we had a reservation for  8:15 (which we were on time for) and didn't get seated until 8:45 tonight, I will always love this place. The maitre d changes frequently but they all seem to have the same arbitrary system of seating people which gets soo annoying. A word of advice, don't even think of coming one minute late or they will basically put you at the end of the list. Also, don't come without a reservation if you are more than two people, otherwise you'll basically wait an hour. Anyways, on to the food! I always get the insalata speciale, and my parents always have the caesar (really anchovy-ey). You can't go wrong with any of the pastas which are all made in house, but I usually rotate between the angel hair, spinach tagliatelle with shrimp, or whatever the pasta of the day is. My mom usually gets the veal medallions and they come with super buttery carrots and green beans which are awesome. I always ask for these veggies as a separate side since they don't come with any of the pastas. Don't forget the tiramisu for dessert! The waiters and bus boys are great, and everything comes out very fast. I would recommend coming here for lunch or an early dinner before 7 PM, that's when they really pick up.
Osteria in Palo Alto actively violates the Americans with Disabilities Act and federal regulations against disallowance of service animals. BOYCOTT!! My friend could not bring her service dog with her into the restaurant! I think that Osteria needs to review their federal laws again before they are slapped with a law suit!
I'm always in search of an Italian restaurant that compares to the restaurants I went to in Florence, Perugia and Rome a few years ago.  For me, Osteria is the most deserving place that won't cost you an arm and a leg.  The large paintings on the walls are apparently painted by the owner.  I'd imagine you'd see little flecks of food all over them, as they are low and quite close to the tables.  I'm not sure why so many people have bad experiences with wait times and service.  I've had great service the two times that I've been there.  The guy at the bar has greeted me both times, and gotten me a table within 10 minutes.  This is with a reservation, of course. The highlight of my first meal was the polenta.  My lord, that is some of the best polenta, if not the best, I've ever had.  To describe it wouldn't do it justice.  The creaminess of the cheese, the crispness of the corn, the tanginess of the tomatoes, the fragrant herbs, the tender heartiness of the mushrooms...it's like a symphony for the senses.  You simply must try it. The Pappardelle Osteria has big and thin spinach noodles that are freshly made in a sauce made from prosciutto, mushrooms and tomatoes.  Excellent and reminiscent of some Tuscan pastas I had in Italy.  The second time I tried the Spaghettini Carbonara.  It was good, but not quite as good as the Pappardelle.  I'm not the biggest fan of Alfredo cream-type sauces.  Nevertheless, I enjoyed both of my experiences at Osteria and look forward to my next visit there.
This is the best restaurant in Palo Alto. Been going for years. The food id great and the service has always been good. You will always need a reservation.
Have been going to Osteria for a few years and have never been disappointed with the food.  It comes out very hot and very timely.  I was just there last night--we go early 5:30--and it's great.  By the time we leave it's packed with people waiting on the sidewalk.  The pastas are wonderful--I had the fettucine with porcini mushrooms and truffle oil.  It stayed hot until the last bite and was very flavorfull!!  We always ask for Nialle (a nice Irish boy) to be our waiter and he's terrific!!  Of course it helped that we were there with someone who knew the whole staff.  I will continue to return to Osteria and bring friends to enjoy it with me.
I love this family owned place. They have really fresh & hot pasta dishes. I love how most of the staff have been working there 10+ years. There's usually not a wait for a weekday lunch/dinner but weekends here are pretty busy. My favorite dishes are the polenta appetizer, parpadelle, bay shirmp with spinach pasta. If pasta is not your thing then go for one of the grilled fish dishes. The veggies come with a buttery sauce so ask for it on the side if you're going light. Tip: the fresh sourdough bread does not come warmed up but they'll be happy to do so for you.
Good food, fairly good service. This is not a restaurant for a large party. And beware, they will NOT seat you,even with a reservation, until your ENTIRE party is present!  Don't invite any flaky or "chronically late" friends or family!!!  I watched the host give away another party's table for that very reason!
After so many years, this remains one of our favorite italian restaurants. The location is great, and while the place is busy, it does not have the ridiculous waits of other popular restaurants. This is an old-school restaurant: No fancy decoration, but sober and classic style. No pretentious menu, but well-chosen classic dishes. The food may not be 100% authentic, but is consistently of good quality. Examples: The bread. You get served half a sourdough. It may not be italian bread, but it is of good quality. The appetizers: prosciutto with cantaloupe. The prosciutto was really good, not salty. The cantaloupe really sweet. The pastas are good, even if sometimes a tad overcooked. The portions are "european size", which is OK with me. The prices are reasonable for Palo Alto. The service is prompt and efficient.
Osteria is really overrated. Because it is located in a college community, it is typically crowded. They have little respect for the customer. As I go there when I visit family members in that area, I don't live nearby and have to drive up there. The last time there was bad traffic and we were 20 minutes late for our reservation. It was a Thursday night. The place was jammed. We apologized for being late and asked how long we would have to wait. They said 15 minutes. As 15 minutes turned into a half hour and then 45 minutes and then an hour, we got very frustrated. They were seating people who came in during that time because they had a "reservation". Now suddenly it was not a 15 minute wait and they weren't sure when they could seat us. They acted annoyed when we asked when we would be seated. Had they been up front with us when we arrived, we would have gone elsewhere. But they weren't and did not care that we waited an hour. Will never go back there. Also, the food was nothing great. it was okay. The chicken parmesan was overcooked as were the vegetables. The minestrone soup was tasty. So was the pasta. The meal wasn't bad, but not worth the hassle or the crowds. Also, there is zero ambience. the restaurant is very noisy and tables are literally inches from each other so you can say hi to the people next to you and hear their whole conversation.
Always GREAT food: simple, hot, and fresh. Been going there for over 5 years.
I had such high hope for this place and I was so excited to go to an "authentic" Italian restaurant. I was very disappointed by the food though. I ordered the pasta with truffle oil and my wife got the pesto pasta with shrimp. For appetizer we got the mozzarella with tomato to share. Pasta was over cooked and very bland. Not a hint of truffle oil in any of the bites I took. My wife's dish had tiny salad shrimps in it and again, it tasted very simple. There was nothing exciting about this place and I couldn't wait to get the check and leave. Two stars for service and big portions for a good low price.
It's been years since I went here the first time and have been wanting to go back, but never had the opportunity to do so until I had to pick a place for my boss and coworker to have dinner with last week. They had room at 6pm, so I figured what better time than to have my company pay for it. :) My coworker and I arrived first. Man, it's a blessing and a curse to look at the menu and just stare longingly at every dish that sounds better than the next. We had the baked goat cheese/tomato/pesto with toasted bread while we waited for our boss and to buy us more time to just admire the menu choices. It was heavenly, but it is like a 3:1 ratio of cheese to bread (and the cheese is already on), and as much as I love cheese, I had to transfer some to the bread they served for the table. No big, though. My boss and coworker opted for fish dishes that were served with a couple of sides that really presented well and tasted great. I originally had my final eye on this scrumptious-sounding porcini mushroom trufflish pasta. Sad thing was, it was served with the "sauce of the day", which happened to be a red meat sauce. I'm sure it was good sauce, but the two together? Not so appealing. I opted for the carbonara, which deserves a place on the medal stand in the carbonara olympics. Perfectal-dente. The servings are generous, service was awesome. It could qualify as an answer of mine if asked what I'd want for my last meal on earth.
I don't go out for Italian often, but I wish I could eat here every week.  Two words - spaghetti carbonara.  It's simply the best I've ever had.  Ever.  Simple ingredients, excellent flavor, easily worth the 5 stars.  The spaghetti has been cooked to perfect al dente each time I've ordered too. While I mostly order that dish I have tried some others and my other favorite is the veal parmesan - also, one of the better ones I've had (it's a HUGE portion too) and the saltimbocca - pure glutony goodness right there! On the appetizer side, my go to is the carpaccio.  Phenomenal tasting, high quality steak with simple toppings - mustard, red onions and olive oil.  (Oh, it has capers on it too which I immediately discard.  Capers = YUCK, I can't stand those things, hate them, they suck, they need to go away, horrible, did I mention I hate capers?.)  Anyway!  So what makes me happy about the carpaccio (besides capers) is that, well you ever go to a place that essentially gives you a salad on top of the carpaccio?  And you're like, "I think there's meat underneath this forest... " Doesn't that just suck?  You won't find that here.... Just meaty goodness. Wine selection is pretty good, lots of very drinkable inexpensive bottles. Bread service is a downer.... while the bread itself is pretty good it is often served with cold (cold!) butter.  Oil and vinegar would be a nice option. Yes.  It gets crowded, packed, loud.  Want an intimate dinner this might not be the best spot for that.  Service has been very good, yes they may seem curt and to the point but they do a good job and I never felt they are being rude to me.  For real Italian food that doesn't break the bank, come here and enjoy. FYI... they do take out and they charge a 10% fee for it.  I'll drive back to Redwood City and literally, my food is still HOT.  They do take out very well here.  Good stuff!
With a 7:30pm appointment on a Wednesday, we were able to be seated quickly and efficiently, which I appreciated. It was actually quite nice how quickly the food came out, too! I ordered the Linguine with Mushrooms, while my boyfriend had the carbonara (yes, this was because it was highly recommended online, and it did not disappoint)! In fact, the food was really good overall! It came out quickly, was very tasty, unique, and generously portioned! Plus, I couldn't complain about the price! The only drawback of the night's experience was the cold treatment by our waiter. I'm not expecting a chummy-chum kind of treatment, but a little more graciousness and poise goes a long way to make a customer feel comfortable, and not like they are part of an assembly line. Get in and get out! It's a shame that the service was as dry and unfriendly as I'd read so many times online, because if that one aspect were changed, this place would be getting all 5-star reviews, instead of the 3 that it earned.
Intimate, casual, tasty. If my grandmother was Tuscan, her kitchen would be like this place.  Ok, maybe her restaurant.  She would be entrepreneurial obvi!
Good food but why do they continue to hire total douche bags for hosts? If you have a reservation why do they make you wait for more people? They can't use the table anyways. Roid dude with right black shirt and pointed leather shoes thinks he is bouncer at a nightclub and not a palo alto restaurant. 5 Stars for food, 1 Star for bounders at a local pasta restaurant = 3 Star Average.
What is going on with Osteria? Ownership change? New employees? The friendly, family run atmosphere... Read more 
If you have to wait an hour for your reservation and people who came in after you (with reservation times after yours) are being seated before you, that's definitely a sign that "your money isn't welcome here".  When other patrons are greeted with a hug and a glass of wine, while you sit in the entry area waiting and waiting (while these favored patrons are seated first), that's also not a good sign. When you finally sit down and you order food, and the food comes and it's just so so (between the side of sauteed [previously frozen] spinach, chicken parm, and pasta, the best item was the spinach), it's a sign that you shouldn't come back. Osteria may be one of the less expensive Italian places in Palo Alto, but the service and food mean that you get what you pay for, and if you're not a regular, you should expect to be ignored, kept waiting, and generally treated like a second-class citizen. So I'm not coming back.  Byeeee.
Out of all the Italian restaurants in Palo Alto, I think this one is my favorite for quality and value. It's family owned and old school. The last time I was there they were still doing the checks by hand. I normally visited during lunch, since I worked nearby. My usual was either a ravioli or tortellini dish; my favorite was the veal ravioli in red sauce with shitaki mushrooms. They make their pastas and sauces fresh. Their carbonara is also delicious, but way too rich for my taste. With so many other Italian choices in downtown, I'd go with Osteria 80% of the time.
This is a really nice Italian restaurant in Palo Alto. I had dinner here after a business meeting. I ordered the: RAVIOLINI DI SPINACI AL POMODORO spinach ravioli with cheese and fresh tomatoes  $9.75 The waiter comes around and grates the parm. cheese over your pasta. Also had a glass of wine with my meal. Highly recommened.
The restaurant makes a better impression from the outside. It looks decent, smells good, and was full - so we gave it a try. The food was very heavy though, the veal was breaded and fried, and the vegetables done in a lot of butter. I guess it's a matter of taste, and there's certainly people who like it that way, but I don't. Their tortellini al prosciutto were nothing special, the sauce very bland. The pasta was fresh though, and good by itself. Nothing bad, but nothing great either - wouldn't come back here again.
Ok, I'm just going to go all out and give this place 5 stars. I can't really comment on the host or wait time since we had a reservation, so maybe that's why I had such a good experience. Or maybe it was just the fact that I went with good friends I hadn't seen in a while. Either way... LOVED IT. My first impression of the menu was "I don't understand what any of these things are..." Everything is in Italian, but luckily, the captions underneath the entree name tell you all that you need to know. Half of our group ended up ordering the "Tagliarini verdi con gamberetti," which we all just referred to as "The Shrimp Thingy." Our server was really awesome and humored us by calling it "The Shrimp Thingy" as well, which was actually really cute. I love garlic and I love shrimp, so when I saw that on the menu, I knew immediately that I was getting it. The fact that it was SPINACH pasta made it just that much more enticing. It was so so so so good! It was definitely very rich, so if you don't like pasta or cream or creamy rich pastas, this may not be the place or genre of food for you, but if you do, then you are in luck! There were so many little shrimp floating around in my plate, I kept worrying about keeping an optimal pasta-shrimp ratio in all my bites so I wouldn't be left with tons of shrimp at the end (which mind you, is a much nicer problem to have than having no shrimp at all in the end and just pasta). Words pretty much cannot describe how much I liked the pasta, so I'll just leave it at that. All my friends kept saying I had to save room for the hazelnut flan, so let me reiterate that point to you as well. SAVE ROOM FOR THE FLAN! Flan is a dessert that I actually quite like, and it was so good here! So much Nutella-y hazelnut-y goodness. Yum yum yum! I don't know why other people have had such bad experiences here. Our server was super sweet, and the guy filling the water glasses was always there. Even if I had only taken two sips, he was there filling my glass with water. I would definitely lose in a competition with him trying to drink my water faster than he could refill it. tl;dr: I want to come here again and again and again and order the same thing, even though I know that the other items on the menu are probably just as good. Pretty much just lalalove.
we went there two weeks ago. our meal was $50 without drinks.  We typically order the same dishes and salads everytime we come, but this time we decided not to order alcohol and our meal came out to be even more expensive than usual?  They said, "our prices increased by $2." -but not noted on the menu? We're going to cut back on this place because of the price. Also, we brought the BF's mom here, there was hair in the butter. He gave me a new dish of butter, but AGAIN there was hair in it. He did this about 4 times, no joke. Then the last dish of butter, he handed it to me and said, "I cut a new batch" WHAT THE HECK!?
best place in downtown Palo Alto, by far. what the BF and I always order: Glass of Cab Spinach... Read more 
+5 stars for the Spinach Olio - sauteed spinach with olive oil and a touch of garlic. For real - the Spinach Olio is 'fist fight a priest for the last serving' good.
I love their food and their wait staff is generally friendly. This place gets super crowded sometimes. The problem is that the house staff tends to overbook, so even if you have a reservation and you're on time to meet it, you often have to wait for...awhile. We had an 8pm reservation on Friday, but we still ended up waiting 35 min. We saw group after group get seated before us even though we were only #3 on their reservation list. Less than stellar dining experience. If the staff want to do good by their diners, they need to get out of this habit of overbooking tables and actually honor reservations within a 10-15 min window and NOT a 30-40 min one. They are plenty of walk-ins to take those seats in case reservations fall through and they get no-shows. You should live up to your delicious food and not scrimp on organization and service.
A friend recommended this place and I can't believe I had never been here! This place is great. The service is top notch and the food is delicious! I really loved the bread too. The bread isn't served warm but still good nonetheless. I had penne pasta with chicken, asparagus, and tomato wine sauce.
Came here to celebrate a friend's bday after hearing good things about Osteria. Sadly we were disappointed. AMBIANCE:  Crowded and cluttered. Our group of 7 were crammed onto two too small tables next to the kitchen. Generally older patrons (on a Friday night no less).  We were also asked to leave almost immediately after finishing our meal in order to make room for the next large group. SERVICE:  SLOOOOWWW.  Our server had hearing problems because he could NOT understand us for the life of him, even after embarrassingly slow enunciation and LOUD repetitions. FOOD: SO BLAND. Our entire table ordered pasta. - Mozzarella/tomato appetizer ($8.50):  Two slices of tomato topped with a small dollap of firm mozzarella. Plated with some sort of weird greenish sauce that tasted like Italian dressing. Not worth it. - Minestrone ($5.50):  Best tasting dish at the table IMO.  Nice flavor, but chunkier than I'm used to.  Was more of a (pureed) bean stew than a soup. - Daily pasta special ($16):  Some sort of meat filled ravioli topped with wild mushrooms and tomato-based sauce. Bland filling but nice sauce. Too much parsley. - Tortellini al prosciutto ($13.50):  Again, the pasta/filling was SO BLAND. It tasted like nothing. Texture was mushy. Cream sauce was tasteless, but the "prosciutto" (which I suspect was Canadian bacon or something) was salty, so if you could manage to spear a bite with pork and peas on it then it tasted ok. OVERALL:  Not only was the meal basically flavorless, but I think the majority of people were still hungry at the end.  Wish I could say better things... but nope, not returning.
Came here with a large party (10 or so) and booked the day of - they were very accommodating and was quite happy we were able to get in. Overall, service was very friendly - most of the waitstaff is Italian. Started with an inexpensive but very drinkable bottle of their montepulciano.  For my main course, I had a nice simple past dish with a well prepared meat raghu - a special for the night. Nothing fancy but quite enjoyable. So why only 3 stars? The appetizer. A radicchio salad with blue cheese: whole lettuce leaves served with a large bowl of dressing in the middle of the dish. Sort of like what you'd expect a plate of hot wings to look like...at Hooters. Apparently you're supposed to dip the lettuce into the dressing. I'd been to this place several times before when I used to live in Mountain View (now out in NYC)....I remember it being much better.
My friend brought me here because she really  likes this place. We came in pretty late (around 9pm), and we got to choose where to sit (we sat by the window). Because I was already extremely full and because my friend has been here multiple times, she ordered the Carpaccio and the Spinach Tagliolini with Shrimp. She was saying something else to our waitress, but our waitress misunderstood and thought that my friend asked for mushrooms... which worked out perfectly because we didn't know we could add mushrooms to the pasta and because the mushrooms tasted really good with the pasta. The Carpaccio was really unique and nothing like what I had before. I was somewhat scared to try it out just because Asians don't really eat red meat, but I really enjoyed it. I usually crave salty food, so I have been craving the Carpaccio from this place lately. If I didn't come here with my friend, then I probably wouldn't have known how to eat it... but it's simple. All you do is mix everything together. I ate a little bit of the pasta, although I was wayyyyyy too full to enjoy eating anything, I really liked the pasta. It wasn't heavy, and I really want to go back and try it when I'm actually hungry. My friend was wondering why her noodles were shaped differently (I guess they're usually flatter?), so she asked the waitress, and she said it was because the noodles are home made.
Occasion: Lunch with family What I Had: "Pappardelle Osteria" - spinach noodles with prosciutto, mushrooms and tomato sauce Food Review: There was so much to choose from on the menu that sounded amazing (especially considering I've been a carbivore all my life) that I couldn't help but try something I'd never even heard of before. I would choose wheat noodles over spinach noodles after trying this if I had to state a preference, but the dish was still very well prepared. All the dishes are brought in with towels because the keep the plates piping hot. Service Review: Good service, not over-attentive and the restaurant is run like a very family style business which I have a soft spot for. Venue Review: Very cute little restaurant in Downtown PA with indoor seating. If street parking isn't available, there are parking lots for other businesses nearby. Overall Impression: I've been to a lot of Italian restaurants and eaten a ton of pasta, but this has to be one a favor more than others. I haven't tried their desserts, but their pastas are always piping hot and delicious.
Been here twice - nothing special. Your typical Italian fare. The pasta dishes are humongous - enough for like 3 people. If you like to feel over stuffed after eating, then maybe you will like it. I will say it is probably better than the chain Italians but that is not saying much. It is always packed so maybe I am missing something but I doubt it.
Recently went back to Osteria this past Friday night and I was highly disappointed.  So disappointed that I'm removing two stars for what happened. We made reservations for 2 at 7PM, because we've been here before and there's no way you can expect shorter than an hour wait for a table for 2 without a reservation on a Friday or Saturday night.  This place is always crackin! So we got there early at 6:40, checked in with the host and waited around for them to seat us.  The thing is, every other party of two who came in after us (we counted 4 separate parties of 2) was seated because they somehow seemed to know the host.  We weren't seated until 7:20PM.  Now, there is NO WAY all these people had reservations before 7PM - before we got there.  We went up to the host and before we even said anything, the tall guy in all black said "We'll seat you shortly, just wait."  I wouldn't have minded being seated at 7:05, but making me wait 20 minutes after our reservation and seating people ahead of us was what pissed me off.  We didn't say another word to the host, just waited patiently, as every single other party around us got seated until we were pretty much the last original party who had been waiting and a new wave of people had come in. When we finally did get seated the host apologized and ran off.  Our food came out very quickly as usual and we do love the old Italian men who provide such excellent service and have a good time doing it.  But then I noticed something was dripping overhead.  It was the pipes from the AC dripping onto our table.  The host had the nerve to place us in the worst possible location of the restaurant to top off our evening. We didn't say anything rude the entire time.  We were perfectly polite and tipped well over 15%.  The old guy who usually takes the reservations and seats people wasn't there, so maybe that's why the reservation process was so bad.  I just can't believe the 40ish year old taller gentleman would play favoritism like that.  Um, is this Vegas and do I need to tip you to get in?!  Kind of ridiculous.  And it's not like we've never been here before.  We've come a good handful of times and always are nice to them.  I can't get over this Osteria.  If this is how it's going to be, I may not come back and I may tell everyone else I know about your favoritism.
Simple menu, but the service is the best!  Good thing we made reservations because that place is... Read more 
After 10 years patronizing this restaurant, we are DONE with this place.  In the past we have put up with mediocre and sometimes borderline rude service (they need to replace the maitre d'), long wait times (even with a reservation), and a stuffy, hot, and overcrowded space (fire hazard?), all for their food.  Last night we didn't want to deal with all that so we decided to place an order to go.  It was a big order for 10 people.  We got the menu online from zagat and I called to place my order.  When I asked for a total, the maitre d' didn't have it ready.  No problem.  When I got there, they charged me 10% as a "processing" charge.  WTH??!!  In addition, the prices were higher than what was on the menu.  When I brought it up, the maitre d' acted smug and said "well we don't post our menu online".  When I asked about the 10% "processing" charge, he said, oh yeah people complain about that all the time.  Well yeah bud, NO ONE else does this.  This is such a scam.  Since the receipt was manually written, I asked him what the tax rate was in Palo Alto and he mumbled something like "whatever it is in the rest of CA".  Seriously, I could not believe the level of rudeness.  To make things worse, the 10% processing charge was added to the TOTAL bill (after taxes).  On my receipt it said "tip".  Even tips are not calculated on the post-tax total.  What the heck?  Their shady business practices should be reported to the Better Business Bureau.  We are never going back to this place again.
Food: 5-Stars Service: 4-Stars Ambiance: 3.5-Stars Presentation: 4-Stars Worth the Money:  4-Stars Overall Evaluation:  4-Stars Cappellini Arribiata. QUALITY OF FOOD: * * * * * Although the Cappellini was not made here, I couldn't resist the thought of using the delicate angel's hair to deliver the aggressive arribiata.  The combo worked and the Arribiata was right on!  Each bite was chalk full of fresh tomatoes with the sharp peppered kick at the end.  The sauce was cooked perfectly, avoiding the over-acidity or excessive cheesiness I find all to commonplace in restaurant.  Skilled chefs are a work here. Ordering arribiata, meatballs and veal cutlets are easy ways of determining the quality of an Italian restaurant.  The bread was flavorful and a welcome relief from the spice. QUALITY OF SERVICE: * * * * Excellent!  They were knowledgeable, courteous, and very attentive.  Thank you. AMBIANCE: * * * ` The place is not overrun by expensive decorations or stereotypical Italian music.  It's humble but confident.  Although the mood lighting could be better, this place cares more about the quality of the meal.  The volume of people lining up proves mood lighting isn't everything. PRESENTATION OF FOOD: * * * * Simply beautiful. WORTH THE MONEY: * * * * Definitely worth the money.  The servings were large; enough to take home for lunch the next day. OVERVIEW: * * * * My lasting impression: Osteria is the best authentic Italian restaurant in DT PA.  I will be back; I will bring friends; and I will be hungry!
Osteria made me feel like I was suddenly transported to the East coast. It started with the tall Italian host who greeted us, with his slicked-back hair and unbuttoned shirt (Wait...am I in New Jersey?). It continued with the straightforward, are-you-ready-yet service (which was OK because we were).  The tiny space was packed to the gills and bustling with activity - It seemed like there were at least a half-dozen waiters scurrying about, mostly middle-aged Italian men. My wife ordered the Penne Fantasia ($12.50), which was absolutely fantasia-astic: A perfect marriage of penne, garlic, sun-dried tomatoes, asparagus, and chicken I ordered the calamari steak ($15.50), after it was recommended by our waitress. It was good...It reminded me of breaded abalone. But it was much richer and oilier than I was in the mood for; The green beans on the side were overcooked. It was a good thing my wife couldn't finish her pasta. Since Osteria offers no-nonsense, solid Italian fare at good prices, it's a popular place. Call ahead for reservations (not on OpenTable).
Great delicious food. Knocked off one star for the obnoxious attitude we got from whom seems to be a manager or owner of Osteria. Very cocky attitude. Doesn't even look you in the face when he talks to you even if you have a reservation. Feels like I am begging for foods everytime he happens to be the host.  Everyone else in the restaurant have really polite attitude so we keep coming back. But this tall skinny dude really turns us off and leaves a bad taste in our mouth at every lucky encounter...
-One hour time limit to eat on a non busy Tuesday evening. - they tried to add an arbitrary %60 additional charge to a $13.5 dish for one measly calamari topping. -my takeout was squished in a tinfoil blob -the service was beyond dismissively arrogant. -the pasta calamari dish I had was blander than my saliva You suck Osteria.
This review is only for the reservation process. I wanted to warn those thinking about trying this place. Never in all the years of dining out had a place screw up my reservations AND did not apologize. Even worse, the person who called to confirm my reservation made it like it was my fault. To make a long story short, made reservations for 7:30pm the next night for dinner. Confirmed, sealed, engraved in their fat foreheads, okay? Then 3 hours before dinner the next day, a man calls from the restaurant, sounded like the "manager", and says he was confirming the reservation with me today. Wait, I thought I confirmed it already yesterday? He mentions that he has us penned down for 7pm. He then says he cannot accommodate us at 7:30 and then hung up. After I read some of the reviews, I was probably not gonna have a good experience there. Sounds like mediocre, overpriced Italian fare.  In a way, this was actually a blessing!!
What else can I say.  If you don't value your health, then please by all means eat here.  This restaurant is disgustingly filthy and that have a cockroach infestation. I will never set foot in this place again.
welllll, i was a bit apprehensive with all the negative comments but i have been wanting to try Osteria, so we did exactly what wasn't recommended...we called at 5pm for a reservation for 7 people (a large party) at 7pm.  They took it alright and we arrived and our table was ready and everything was good.  And the place was getting to be busy even for a Monday night. We also had a toddler with us, they had high chairs available, which I was surprised to find since the info on yelp says not good for children. They don't have a children's menu but they will do half orders of pasta and the side dishes were just perfect for our toddler anyways. They kept the bread and butter and water well supplied and yes, the waiter was a bit non-plus, he was professional and very busy. Our food came out quickly and was hot and yummy! Our toddler enjoyed the warm lava chocolate cake with ice cream!  In today's age of cutting back on the calories, we all finished the dessert in short order =). The prices are reasonable and the serving size was decent.  Overall, it was a good experience - we'll be back!
This place has amazing meat sauce and the noodles are done the way I like them: al dente. This place gets packed really fast. Make reservations and the wait staff is always overwhelmed. Just be patient.
My friend and I decided to eat here and ever since then it became our spot. First of all, parking is difficult and I wouldn't come with my car because I am definitely not the best parker/parallel parker. I love the atmosphere here. It feel like an old Italian spot. I ordered the Fettuccine with mushrooms and truffle oil and I never got anything else ever since. I love truffle oil and mushrooms so I knew right away that I would love it... And I did! I tried my friends pasta dish which was just Alfredo with baby shrimp. Every time we went, he kept saying it was amazing but to me it was just alfredo sauce... After dinner, I tried the tiramisu. It was super good and not too sweet... But at the same time it was my first tiramisu so I don't think I can really say anything about it. The price here is super reasonable! I love it here. It's just amazing.
Love, love, love, love, love this place! My bf comes to visit me from DC every few weeks, and our tradition is always to come here on his 1st night back to Palo Alto.  The servers know us, and we love them.  The restaurant is cute and family run with always the same friendly staff. The ambiance is warm and cozy, but the best part is the food!! The food here is delicious!! The lamb chop special, ravioli, veal picatta, spinach pasta w/ mini shrimp, and bolognese are all fantastic!!
The guido behind the counter was a douche. He acted like he didn't care for our business when taking down our name. After a half hour wait with no update we  left. I really wanted to try the food but could not get past the rude host.
I have been there 3 times but I will NOT go there any more. The main reason is that owner(host) thinks that because Facebook owner was there two days ago, then he can tell us that we did not spend enough money (we spent ~340$ for 17 person group).  And the whole problem was that we asked for a receipt that we could read. But anyways, if you want to meet the facebook owner in this diner, do not go in a group more than 4, and order their veil and no pasta ever.
Since this has been my favorite restaurant for so many many years now, I can't even read some of the bad reviews. :( The "manager" IS the owner. LOL.  Yes, he has his favorites and I have been one many times and have had the "evil eye", especially when a bottle of Silver Oak is served to us upon arrival. I love the Veal Cannelloni (only as an Entree Du Jour  and  I always call ahead to have them hold some for me) that's always sold out!  They are out of this world! And the of course most tender and fresh: Parma Prosciutto E Melone, must have is the Heart of Palm Salad with Osteria House dressing, no longer on the menu, but request it and they will make it special for you. :) They are very family oriented, the only time I would give a one star is when they close for 2 weeks and everyone goes on vacation.  That's how the Italians do it, they do it right! Mangiare bene, bere molto, viaggia bene, e giocare duro! (Eat well, drink a lot, travel well, and play hard)
I couldn't give it NO stars... Thought the douche from all the reviews left so i decided to give it a try. Unfortunately I was wrong... Told us it would be less than 10-15 minutes wait. I left after 30 minutes since he was seating everyone who came in after me. When I asked for our table, he didn't even bother to ask for my name. I guess I should have walked out then.
One of the worse place I ever been in Palo Alto! Food is just OK  but the manager was really rude. We were a big table and when our waiter who was a very nice guy brought the check for us, we could not read the hand writing ! Therefore, we asked for a printed check ( instead of hand written one or just an explanation on our bill) and the manager of the restaurant  refuse to do that with a really offensive attitude. He said:  if you are unhappy, you have to leave and do not come back here again. He also mentioned that we did not order enough food ( some just ordered a drink) and he already made so many exceptions !!!! for us which is Not clear to us what he meant ! Never seen such kind of attitude. He also said that the owner of Facebook was there two night ago so we bette shut up because he has his own wealthy customers .. Any ways, i will never go there again and  do not recommend it if you are big group of people.
I have been going to Osteria for over 10 years and they never fail to make me and my stomach very happy! They make the most amazing Veal Piccata such that I will not order it anywhere else. The veal is so thin and delicious with the perfect amount of capers and lemon butter. It may not be the healthiest thing in the world, but it tastes wonderful! I have also had various pasta dishes and the pasta is so fresh and delicious. Even the bread and salads never fail to satisfy. I believe most of the wait staff have been there for a very long time and they are like family. They take a lot of pride in their food and I think it is much deserved!
This place deserves NO star and if the owner were to read this, he should be questioning the MANAGER of the restaurant. My boyfriend and I called ahead of time on a Friday night to ensure that there was a table available when we arrive at the restaurant.  When we arrived at the restaurant, the host told us to wait while they set up a table.  Two couples came in after us and were seated immedately  by the manager. The manager greeted the first couple with hugs and handshakes and walked the couple to a really nice table by the window.  The manager then grabbed the second couple and sat them down immediately, before we could even asked about the status of our table. When we approached the manager regarding the status of our table, he pointed to the table next to the kitchen (which has not been set up) and said that table was ours.  We told the manager that we waited longer and would have preferred the other two tables in the main dining area.  He rudely challenged us, claiming we never had a reservation. We never saw him checking reservations of the other two couples, furthermore, we did call ahead and gave our name saying we will be there shortly. The manager was extremely rude, reminding us that he was the "MANAGER" and implied that he was doing us a favor by sitting us right next to the kitchen at a table where we can feel the draft from outside. There was no way we could have enjoyed our dinner and thus we decided to leave. I would highly recommend not wasting your time calling for a reservation cos' it is meaningless.
I made reservations to take my girlfriend here for her birthday because for some reason she really loves this place. I made reservations one week before, we arrived 15 minutes early, and the place was half empty so there was no reason for the poor seating we received. The food was ok but we received poor service. I can go anywhere for ok Italian food, lousy seating and poor service. Don't think Ill repeat
Was there for dinner with family last night.  Ordered the carpaccio, caesar salad, calamari steak and two seafood pasta dishes.  The appetizers were very good, but we had mixed feedback on the entrees -- calamari steak was fine, but the dish didn't have the "wow" factor.  The spinach pasta with shrimp was overcooked - very disappointing.  It was a very busy night and the waiter didn't even bother to ask us how the dishes were.  Service is definitely an issue here -- this place ranks very low in terms of service among Italian restaurants in the neighborhood.  Definitely would not go back there on my own.
Food was good but not especially so. Our waitress seemed really stressed and rushed. She kept walking away in the midst of our ordering. I guess we were not moving quickly enough for her. Given that there are other quality Italian restuarants around here I doubt we will be going back too soon.
I am Asian, and in this time and age we should not have to tolerate discrimination. I've brought a friend who's also Asian here for lunch before the busy lunch hour when the restaurant had only 1 (one) customer already seated. With the entire restaurant empty, the man in black by the counter "greeted" us with silent, open eyes when I said, "for two." Then he proceeded lead and sit us in a dark corner with an old emergency door behind one of our chairs. Eh..? With the entire open area and lush sunny windows abound, why were we seated there? Of course we've requested later to sit at a more decent table. Moments passed, and as we eat (decent food, btw) we've noticed other customers being led to that same dark corner when the restaurant was not entirely full - and each time these people were Asian. Needless to say, they've also shamelessly requested a different table. As the noon hour approached, the restaurant filled up rapidly. I've turned my head to check things out and witnessed every pleasantly lit table and window spots were taken by Caucasians. Coincidence? I liked the food here, I really do. But that's not enough to suppress the regrets and anger as I left this establishment after leaving the obligatory tips despite the service and attitude that I've experienced.
Decent Italian joint in downtown palo alto. A bit pretentious at times though (they treat you nicer and seat you at a better location if you dress well). Their carpaccio was delicious (though I could've used slightly thicker cuts of beef). Had the Penne Bolognese for entree, one of my go-to Italian dishes when testing the restaurant. The noodles weren't the fresh type and the sauce could've used more tomato. For the price of the food, it wasn't impressive. The atmosphere of this place is worth note though. It feels very Italian and welcoming. Parking is also relatively easy. Would not be back anytime soon though. There are just too many better value Italian places.
This was an enjoyable outing to a nice Italian spot in downtown Palo Alto. When I walked in, the restaurant had a unique, almost odd, feel to it. Think Jackson Pollock meets a classic Italian diner, and that's what you get when you walk into Osteria. There are large drip paintings in the styling of Jackson Pollock hung throughout an otherwise relatively simple restaurant. A row of red and white check tiles runs along the walls, and the tables are draped in white table cloths. The restaurant feels relaxing and peaceful, though interrupted by large vibrant paintings. It's a unique mixture, and yet, it somehow works. Service is very friendly. I was served by about four different people, starting with the hostess who seated me, then a waiter who took my order and delivered the check at the end, a bus filled my water and offered bread, and the chef himself brought out my dish, proclaiming it's "The best pollo parmigiana in town!" Every server I encountered was very friendly, and made for a nice meal. Even nicer was the food; almost immediately after I was seated, I already received a glass of water and an entire loaf of sourdough bread! The bread tasted wonderfully fresh, and service was very attentive, filling my water almost the second I took a sip of it! Following that, I got the pollo parmigiana (chicken parmesan), which was very good! Perhaps the chef was correct, as I couldn't think of a better chicken parmesan in town! It was offered with freshly-grated parmesan cheese as well as freshly ground pepper. The cheese and the tomato flavors came together very well, with an excellent flavor overall. When the chef first offered it, admittedly, I declined the freshly ground pepper, but next time, I'll get some of it; I'll admit that I did add a bit of salt and pepper to aid with the seasoning, but that's a relatively minor shortcoming, and one that's easily correctable (salt and pepper is, of course, right on the table if you want it, and if you plan better than I did, you can even get them to grind some pepper on for you)! That aside, the dish came with carrots and green beans, which made for a really nice complement to the chicken; both of the vegetables were cooked to perfection. Overall, this was a very good experience! I had an enjoyable time at Osteria!
Linguine and vongole is good
the service at osteria is FANTASTIC.  the servers are super on it, so gracious, and make your dining experience extra special. the food was good, not the best italian i've had although my girlfriend has been coming here with her family for literally 25 years. it's up to you!
Having found several nearby restaurant's with long waiting times and not taking bookings, we were fortunate enough to get a table for two squeezed in within 30 minutes of calling, having first screened on Yelp of course! We managed to park close by without any trouble despite the busy streets of Palo Alto and arrived 15 minutes early. We only waited 10 mins max, still prior to our booking time and were promptly seated, table laid with water and bread immediately. Specials were explained fairly shortly after menus had already been left. What followed was prompt response to our requests for both appetizers and main courses, both of which were delicious for each of us. Despite being extremely busy at our arrival, we neither felt rushed or forgotten thus had a perfect pace for our meal on this occasion.
Came by here last Thursday night with a friend for dinner. When we arrived, they seated us with a warning that we could only stay for an hour since someone else had a reservation for an hour later at 7:30 PM. We shared the spaghetti carbonara and a tortellini dish.   They were both super tasty and creamy, exactly to my taste :)  Heck, when I looked at the menu, everything under the pasta selection looked mouth-wateringly tasty. Pros - Service is quick.  They bring out the food quickly and they refill your water glasses promptly. - Pasta is amazingly creamy and tasty :) Cons - Feels pricey for mere pasta.  It was $13.50 for each dish and the portion sizes were so-so, not too little but not huge either. - Long wait (if you get there at the wrong time) since this place is always packed with a lot of people.
I witnessed a progression in the crowd going from families to young professionals in my time there. The walls have murals that suggest lennon meshed with european disco. There are table napkins folded into dress shirt pocket shapes oriented like houses sketched in grammar school rested between utensils and bread plates. Hold onto those as your steaming main platter will be baldly scalding to the touch as it skims by into a skid in front of you. Just how I like it. Got Salmon? Per usual. Moral of the dinner story: Hazelnut upside down flan formally known as creme brulee. Better than nutella. Lemon tart with berry sauce is fine, but the hazelnut pudding structure is decidedly mine to mull over in my mind for keeps.
I went for an earlier dinner here with my mom.  We were able to get right in without waiting, and were attended to by a rather silent waiter.  He didn't attempt to make any small talk, and didn't really speak in complete sentences either.  The food itself was alright, my mom and I both got specials, lamb and sea bass.  The food was cooked well, but the sides (green beans and carrots) were a tad soggy and over marinated.  We split the chocolate ganache for dessert, which would have been good if the majority of the bottom wasn't completely burned...ahh. Our check came and we got a good laugh trying to figure out what it said because it was just a bunch of scribbles. Overall it was alright, nothing too great, but certainly not terrible.
One of the best things going for Osteria is its consistency. My wife's family has been coming here for decades and has never been disappointed. I stick to the carbonara and the most recent one I ate was just as great as the first one I had over five years ago. If you do go the carbonara route, know that it's rich. Loads of pancetta and butter make things tasty, but no one would confuse this for health food. They also do a good job with angel hair pasta, which can sometimes clump or overcook. High marks nearly all the way around.  One star off because the desserts aren't the best (safer to avoid them) and, less significant, the bad art hanging on the walls. A minor point, but these paintings don't do anything to spruce up the place and tend to give the space a dated feel. Luckily, the food makes you forget all about them.
I've been here a couple times before and haven't been very impressed with their homemade pastas.  But my fiance (!!...sorry, its going to take me awhile to get used to the fact that I have a fiance) has been with colleagues and liked it pretty well, so he convinced me to go back and give it another try. This time I decided to ordered the veal florentine, since I hadn't been wowed by the pastas.   It was pretty terrible.  I love veal, and so the veal itself was alright but still far from great (way too thick).  However it was topped with frozen spinach (normally I can't really tell the difference between frozen and fresh produce but frozen spinach always tastes nasty to me) and slimy cheese.   It was a huge portion, but who cares if its not good?   My fiance likes the spaghetti carbonara pretty well.  They don't have a lot of pastas that appeal to me, since most of their pastas are tomato sauce-based and I prefer cream or pesto-based sauces.   The bread they give to start the meal is mediocre and comes with cold, slimy butter, although they did give us olive oil when we requested it. Prices are generally a little high, but not out of line for downtown PA: pastas are in the $13 range and entrees were $16-$20.   Service was fine - a little slow, but not too bad.  Unfortunately I think this place is just not to my tastes and after giving it several chances, I doubt I'll be back.
The food was very enjoyable, especially for the price but the service was unacceptable. I felt rushed and unwelcome. The older blond waitress was the least friendly and unprofessional server I have had in years. I am not a fussy guy but I almost asked for a different waitress. There are too many other good choices to tolerate that kind of attitude.
Where to start.-- I first would like to say if I was overall rating this restaurant on food selection as well as space, I would have only given it 4 stars as it's a pretty tight fit in there, but there food is absolutely amazing!! This is the best Italian restaurant I have been to hands down.  They make their pasta fresh and you can definitely appreciate that once you're eating your dish.  Their service is also amazing as they never like to see your water glass low, and your wine glass for the matter!  Each watier I have had has a very dynamic personality and for some reason all of them have accents which may add to the experience of authenticity! I have tried several dishes here and can't wait to go back to try more! But they have this amazing dish that has spinach noodles in a cream sauce with shrimp and just loaded with garlic!  I can't tell you the name as I can't pronounce their dish names for the life of me (I guess that's the only bad thing) I typically just point at the dish and they say it for me! Again all dishes I have tried have been amazing!
This place is always busy at dinner so make sure you make a reservation. It's another one of those places that have become a community cornerstone. The Osteria has regulars. Like us. The service is exceptional, and the restaurant is small, so it feels cozy and family like. The art on the walls are often changed, and features interesting local artists.  The pasta is made fresh and meals always served piping hot. The prices are so reasonable compared to the surrounding eateries and the quality of food and service  is comparable if not exceeding many. Delicious!
If I could give this place zero stars I would, and I haven't even tried the food. I walked in to this place around 9:30 on friday night, they weren't that busy, I asked the Tool behind the bar with the collared shirt for a table for two. He offered us a table at the front of the restaurant, right by the front door, I had seen a open table in the back when we are walking up so I politely asked the guy (that's too cool for school) that I thought there might be a table in the back and if we could have that table instead. He responded in the rudest possible way with the a look of disgust on his face "I know whats back there", like he couldn't believe I would ask for a different table. It was like I insulated him or something. With much regret he gave us the small table in the back. We sat down for about 10 seconds and then left. No way we would of enjoyed our dinner their after that. I've never been treated so poorly walking into a restaurant before. I will never go back to this place. I can't comment on the actual food because we never made it to the point where they bring you the food, but if the Tool's demeanor is any indication of the type of service they have I would highly recommend not wasting your time going here.
I don't often hit up Italian places, but I think this is one of the better Italian places in downtown PA.  The place is pretty small inside so you might be bumping elbows with your neighbors. I've tried a few items here like the palm hearts and carpaccio, but I think the pastas are what stand out here.  I like the textures of their pasta (I believe their pastas are fresh).  I personally tend to order the spinach tagliarini with shrimp. I've only hit up the place during lunch, but I suggest you call ahead if you want seats.  It seems pretty busy most of the time so might as well be safe.
My mom used to go to 10 to 20 years ago.  The front desk was a bit snotty.  The waitress rushed.  The male help staff was courteous.  Food has dropped at least a notch since my mom's raving about the place. We had the butter lettuce (not as fresh as before) and two entrees.  There are better places for same prices.
I've been here a couple more times and I have to say that the place is starting to warm up on me.  I got to know the front of house people a bit more and although the place is still apesh*t crazy during the prime time dinner hours...I have gone a couple of times for a table of 2 and it was a lot easier to have a good meal and experience with great service.  But like before, the closer the reservation to prime-time dinner hours and the bigger the number of people in the dinner party...be prepared to wait! If you want somewhere that is a little quieter in the room, request for an area near the front door versus the main dining room area.
I think this place is love or hate based on the rating. Lots of people swear by this place and some... Read more 
I just realized that I reviewed this place twice because I love it so much.  I forgot about my first review! haha... anyhow... here is my second review. :P I have never had Italian food that is this good and at the right price.  Seriously, the prices here are great and the food is simply amazing. I order 2 things on there menu... and only these 2 things: 1.  Calamari Steak 2.  Linguine Vongole If you like Italian food then you HAVE to come here.  I have absolutely no reason to go anywhere else for Italian food.  This is the place to be.  Hands Down. NOTE*** DO NOT COME HERE ON A SPECIAL HOLIDAY!  Last time I came here on a holiday they had a fixed menu and it sucked.  I only come here for the Calamari Steak and the Linguine and that's what I like so I should be able to order it.  I was very pissed off that I called and made reservations and they never even told me on the phone that it was a fixed menu that night.  BE ADVISED
I love this restaurant.  I've been going here for a long time now, at least 4 years.  So far I've... Read more 
This place is a tough review.  For food alone, it is a close 5 stars, but other things like tables crammed in together and the constant rush by management to turn tables in a one hour time frame really takes away from the dining experience.  This is a good choice if the food alone is the reason for going out.  If however, you are  dining with friends, or catching upon a conversation, Osteria is not the choice that you should make.  Only come after securing a reservation and please be on time- only fair, but rushing you to finish your lovely meal is uncalled for. Never time enough for desert and coffee! We enjoyed a little bit of a conversation with two other local families seated near us who shared the same feelings.  One gentleman spoke up and asked our waiter if the one hour limit was still in effect and he said yes -that's managements policy! This restaurant could be so special.  Too bad a few things couldn't be tweaked so that the place could run at its full potential.
It's been more than a year since I reviewed Osteria, so thought it was about time.  Had the canneloni for lunch last week and once again, it was pure heaven.  (The elderly owner doesn't make it often but when he does it's usually on Tuesdays.) Other great dishes I've had at Osteria recently: the calamari steak meuniere, which is light, very tender and delicious; several pastas, especially the tortellini in a cream sauce with prosciutto; and the carpaccio, which is as good as I've had anywhere (including Italy). Like Goldilocks' porridge, the service is just right for me -- neither too familiar nor too hovering.  The servers are busy (the place always seems to be crowded) but seem really to care about whether you're enjoying the food.  And another thing about the food: It's served piping hot, on warmed plates.
Tried a new dish at Osteria at lunch today (a daily special): sauteed scallops.  Absolutely... Read more 
If Andy Rooney were a restaurant, he'd be Osteria- the audience is mostly old people, and while the content (food) is actually very good, the delivery (restaurant service) can be like that of a cranky old man.  There is a hostess who isn't nice enough to be a prison guard.  But again, rock solid meal.
My qualifications: I'm Italian American and know how to cook. I grew up on the East Coast and this place does remind of places back in Boston and New York. Positives: My husband and I have eaten here about 10 times and always get the same thing: we split gnocchi with either meat sauce or marinara and the veal pizzaiola (veal cutlet with pizza-like tomato sauce). The gnocchi is light and melts in the mouth and the sauce is pitch perfect - slightly garlicly, just enough oil. You can cut the tender veal with a fork. I never eat the veggies that come with - overly soggy buttery carrots and green beans - and recently the waitress said these can be substituted. Cool!  Sometimes I like the no nonsense-it's- all-about-the-food-ambiance, other times, I wish it had SOMETHING going on. Negatives: too bright lights, no bar and they are pretty snooty if you either don't have a reservation or try to make one too late. This exact same conversation happened twice: Me at about 5pm on a Saturday: "Do you have anything available for tonight?" Them: "I certainly don't" said with lots of sarcasm.  I already know it's a long shot on a Saturday. No need to rub it in. Just be nice. It's easier. Minus one star for that.
My boyfriend picked this place for dinner for his birthday. We had reservations for 6pm on Friday night. When we arrived it was still kind of empty. It did get busy later so reservations would be nice if you are planning on coming around 7. We both ordered pastas. My pasta was a cream sauce and my boyfriend's was a spinach pasta with tomato sauce. The dishes came out pipping hot. Be Careful! My dish was the better of the two but both were good. The complementary bread was soft but came a plate filled with slices of butter with a piece of ice on top. Weird. That made spreading the butter pretty difficult. We ordered the hot chocolate cake with a scoop of vanilla ice cream. It was a great way to end the meal. Price was good. Around $36 for two. The bathroom was a single bathroom for the entire restaurant. Three stars instead of four because we felt that the waiter was rushing us the entire time we were there.
Summary review - 4 stars for the food quality and the prices. You get more than you pay for in my opinion. Now, given that remember that - Wait can be very long - Space can be very cramped - Service can be very slow I will deal with that to get the best tasting Italian in Palo Alto at a reasonable price, but if the above 3 worry you, then avoid Osteria. I personally love this place on the food and the food alone.
The best part about Osteria is that the food is always hot and fresh. There are no heat lamps in this place. Classic, straightforward, delicious Italian food served by professionals that take service seriously. It can get busy and capacity is somewhat  limited so I'd suggest you call ahead or get there early Thursday - Saturday.
I used to go to this restaurant at least once a week for lunch when I had a client in Palo Alto. I haven't been back in over 2 years, but I wanted to bring my boyfriend to try it out since I thought they had good Italian Food. The restaurant was busy, but we were able to get seated right away. First off the waiter didn't come over til almost 10 minutes after we were seated to tell us that he would be with us. We ordered the carpaccio to start with. The meat was very good, but I would have ordered the aioli that was on top on the side. Our entrees were delicious but we thought the side order of spinach was over-cooked and flavorless. I ordered what was supposed to be a chocolate molten cake. The cake was burned at the bottom, and there was no gooey, molten center.
BUONA SERA AMICI !!! SI, MOTO BENE !!! I like Osteria, because we're always welcomed in even when we don't have a reservation and it's a busy night. The food is comforting, and reasonably priced. They carry a bottle of wine that I continue to enjoy (the Cesari Amarone della Valipolicella), something that I haven't seen at other establishments in Palo Alto. Did I mention that for a reasonably nice sit-down Italian, their prices are reasonable? I almost always get the Linguine alla Vongole. One evening there was some kind of a mix up, and we got a table close to when they were closing. The host was very courteous as usual, and reminded us to order quickly since the kitchen would be closing soon. A couple of us were at another location and on our way, so the waiter that evening was particularly rude about the situation. He obviously wanted to go home. But there was 15 minutes before the kitchen even closed. It's pushing it I know, but the restaurant was packed (not an empty seat in the house), so no one was leaving any time soon. When I arrived, I was told my friends had left and there was a mixup. My friend and I were shocked, and the host was terribly sorry. He recognized me perhaps, and apologized profusely, offering me a discount or a bottle of wine for next time. That's customer service! I may have otherwise been very upset. If you give this place a chance and visit it more than once, you'll find that the staff here will remember you. They'll bring you in and make you feel like family. And folks, that's what a homestyle italian dinner is all about... family! MANGIA!!!
Came here for dinner on a whim. No reservations, around 7:30ish on a Saturday evening. It was quite busy and we were told it could be a half hour wait since we did not have reservations. We waited happily, and were seated in just a little bit. I felt pretty rushed right from the start though. They were sort of building our table around us as we sat down and a waitress was already standing there telling us the specials as we sat. The minestrone soup was particularly delicious. I love that it was bean based instead of tomato based and I would absolutely love to go back for another bowl. It also came out insanely fast. I had literally just reached for my first piece of bread which had just been delivered when the soup was placed down in front of me. Again, felt rushed. We ordered the fettuccine alfredo and a penne bolognese for our main dishes. They took a very long time to come out, but were piping hot when they did, still bubbling. Unfortunately that's where the excitement ended. Both of us thought our pastas were merely okay, and pretty expensive for the quality. My other complaint was that in the process of being rushes (I get it, it was insanely crowded and they were trying to turn tables), the staff would talk to us and ask questions while they were on the move. I could barely hear what they were saying due to the acoustics in there and they would be walking behind me or past me while they spoke. I rarely caught what they were saying or even knew they were talking to me about if I wanted cheese, if I needed more water, if I wanted to see a dessert menu, etc. I probably won't be going back. It looks cute, and the minestrone soup was super awesome, but I was too unimpressed with the fettuccine alfredo to drive out there and spend the money for all that.
When I'm not eating the tortellini with peas, pancetta, and cream sauce I'm dreaming about it. I fantasize about the hazelnut ganduja flan, it just melts in my mouth. Whenever I come to Osteria, I always order the minestrone too, it's just the perfect combination of vegetables sprinkled with parmesan for a light entree. If I could afford it, I would eat here every day. All the elements from the food to the service and the setting are in perfect harmony. The setting is Italian, the food is Italian, the service and some of the servers are Italian. Instead of "arrogant", I would say "nonchalant chic". No one is going to come kiss your behind here and ask you a hundred times "is everything okay" at mid bite. However, the service is consistent and dependable. Once they see you here a couple of times they will begin to recognize you. Osteria is not only delectable, but incredibly pleasant as the light from mid day pours in and illuminates the white walls and modern pastel paintings. Nestled at a street angle with large windows all around gives ample opportunities to people gaze. Osteria is authentic. I remember coming here when I was as small as a peanut with my parents, and I there are still some of the same servers over twenty years later! Thank you Osteria for bringing my taste buds to seventh heaven...
yum yum yum. my favorite place of all time.
Ordered: - INSALATA DI CESARE (caesar salad) $7 - TORTELLINI AL PROSCIUTTO (stuffed pasta with prosciutto, cream and peas) $13.25 - RAVIOLINI DI SPINACI AL POMODORO (spinach ravioli with cheese and fresh tomatoes) $13.25 Came on a Thursday evening with a 6pm reservation, and there was no one at the restaurant! o.O But by the time we had left, around 7pm, it started to get busy. Their menu with all the Italian dish names made me disoriented... haha It made me feel like I was in Italy again, having no clue what the words meant. Dinner: My friend and I split the caesar salad. Decent size. It was nice they split it onto two plates. We had lots of warm bread before our entree. haha When our entrees arrived, it was piping HOT!!! I loved my tortellinis with little chunks of prosciutto! I could barely even eat half of my plate! Yummy food! :D Dessert: I was too full! O_O I had read how the hazelnut flan was suppose to be good, but booo it had chocolate! :( Grazie Osteria! I'm glad I got to try Osteria in PA! Overall, I really enjoyed my dinner here!  Service was great and the staff was super-friendly! My co-worker recommended this place and I was a bit hesitant because there were a lot of really good and really bad reviews; and it wasn't very consistent. Tips: - Make reservations Go gree: take VTA #35
I used to come here all the time before I moved to the city. There was this old guy who would make different fresh deserts like Italian wedding cake or Tiramisu. We caught him once at closing time singing an Italian opera (and he was actually good). "Si lo so! Amore che io e te! Forse stiamo insieme!" There are these quirks about the place that are charming. Like the cramped, somewhat bizarre entryway or how they always have the same specials available (swordfish or salmon). I'm not sure why they aren't on the menu since they are *always* mentioned. But really it comes down to the food. Fresh pastas, perfectly cooked veal, excellent risottos, and wonderful deserts. I mean try the heart of palm salad, try the linguine with clams, try the mozzarella. Sure there are a few duds on the menu, but you learn which ones those are and stay clear. I've got so many favorites I'll likely never run into them again. One thing that bugs me: They put ice in the butter dish. Boo! Yes, it probably keeps the butter from turning, but try spreading cold hard butter. I once pulled the ice out and tried heating up the bowl with a flame. What else? It gets busy, so make reservations, and go on slightly off times. Don't get trapped in the minuscule waiting area because you thought of just dropping in at 8pm.
Best Italian Food EVER in the south bay! I frequent this restaurant  A LOT!  especially since I work in Menlo Parkk. My bosses love coming to this place. The bread is amazingly great. Make sure that you request the bread crunchy. The gnccohi is to die for!  I always request that they add spinach and pink auce.
I've only been here for lunch (but many times) and it's good.  While not "cheap", you have to understand that in downtown PA, getting a ham sandwich and chips will run you about $8-12 anyway, so a $10-14 pasta dish (and they're huge here) is not bad. The decor is total old school but who cares for lunch.  My faves are the linguini with clams and papardelle bolognese (you can pretty much get any type of pasta with any type of sauce).  The food comes out very fast and it's a huge portion.  It's very tasty and much closer to authentic than Pasta? or most places you'd find up in SF's North Beach. Definitely recommended for lunch.
Once upon a time, Osteria was "all around" one of the best restaurants in the area. These days, while the italian food is still excellent, everything else reflects the very worst of human nature...rudeness, greed, arrogance. It's become so bad that one is left with such a bad taste in your mouth that no amount of good food will cure it. If you don't have a reservation, you're told that you'll only be allowed to eat for one hour and then you must leave. If you pay the bill too quickly, you're told that you need to move to the hotel lobby next door because the restaurant needs your table. Waiters chase after you right out the door accusing you of not leaving a tip. My suggestion if you want a meal from here? Get Waiters on Wheels to deliver it somewhere else and give him the tip.
We had a reservation for a party of 15 at 7pm on a Tuesday. When everyone showed up, they had another party of 9 at our table in the middle of their dinner, so they told us all to go to Old Pro (a sports bar down the street) and come back in 15-20 minutes when the other party would be out. We came back at 730, but weren't seated til nearly 750. If they can't honor a reservation for a big party on a Tuesday, why would I ever try to make a reservation on a weekend. The menu states that all of Osteria's pastas are homemade, which got me very excited, but truth be told the food was pretty lousy. The wine was good, but overpriced. Service was also pretty lousy - the hosts were rude and our waiter was abrupt and not very present. I'm a restaurant person, I've worked extensively in food service, and I love restaurants. I'd heard so many good things about Osteria that I really wanted to like it, but I honestly don't think I'll ever be back.
I really wanted to like Osteria.  I'd heard from a couple of the most "worldly" folks I know (traveled the world, lived all over the world, born outside the US) that this is a true favorite for Italian food.  I figured it had to be spectacular.  But it just wasn't.  Maybe my friend and I went on an off-night?  Maybe I need to give them another try someday?  But last night's food was no better than average. Service was actually a little better than I expected.  Not warm and welcoming.  Not curt or rudely rushing.  Somewhere in between - gettin' the job done.  But I was ready for awful service that would be offset by fantabulous food so I was actually pleasantly surprised with the service. Wait/Crowd was fine on a Thursday night.  We made a 6:30 reservation for which we appeared at 6:35 and were seated promptly in a cozy corner peeking out a side window.  Yes, I could have elbowed the diner to my left in the middle of her back if I was an aggressive left-handed feeder - but I'm not, so that was okay. Crusty bread with butter was just fabulous - because we were hungry and I personally love bread with butter! Wine selection by the glass was sparse but we're not picky so the "1 choice for just about each variety of wine" was more than fine for us. We shared the "Mozzarella di Bufala e Pomodori" which I was expecting to be like Caprese salad but was a little different.  Instead of just a drizzle of olive oil and a pinch of salt, there was basil, olive oil and (perhaps) vinegar pureed together and served with it.  This sauce reminded me of an Italian salad dressing.  Overall it was nice - but not fantastic. THE ENTREES: I was fine with all the other "average" things about this restaurant due to the fact that I was expecting (as I already stated) fantabulous food.  Pasta to be exact.  There was a generous selection of items on the menu but we finally settled on "Linguine con Vongole" and "Pappardelle Osteria". The linguine with clams was good.  The pasta was al dente and tasted fresh and the whole thing was piping hot and quite a generous serving.  But that was it.  No lightning bolt or overwhelming thoughts of "My God this is some of the best pasta I've ever eaten".  It was tasty and simple. My friend was less happy with her spinach pappardelle.  The dish was blander than we were expecting since it was supposed to be full of prosciutto, mushrooms and tomatoes.  She commented (and I agreed) that it needed a kick.  The noodles were limp and not at all chewy.  They seemed a little overcooked or like they sat in water too long.  Is that how pappardelle is supposed to be?  I didn't think it was but maybe I'm not in-the-know... We had to ask for Parmesan and red pepper flakes to kick up the flavors a bit.  It helped a little.  But really, neither dish wowed us. We passed on dessert; instead deciding to stroll to Fraiche for something lighter. Dinner for two: 2 glasses of wine, 1 appetizer and 2 entrees was $60.  So Osteria is certainly an ok place for some decent food at a decent price.  But I don't think I'll be rushing back nor would I wait very long for a table if I did. It turns out the average of 139 yelpers over time really IS quite accurate.  3.5 stars sounds about right in my book.
Came here twice on someone else's dime. First time I had the veal scallopine. It was pretty good. Second time I had the meat appetizer plate and a veal cutlet. These were delicious! Service is prompt and attentive.
Gasp!  It's taken me this long to write a review about my favorite Italian place!?!  Nah.. that can't be right.  Must be my subconcious trying to keep this precious pasta place  a secret (and the line for a table short for me). Consistently comforting, decadent and a great value for Palo Alto.  I love the cozy seating atmosphere.  Have you been to Italy?  Recall going to any resturant there where you had miles of space b/t you and you neighbor.  That's another plus about Osteria, the atmosphere, the service, takes me back to the best vacation of my life. I read an article by a chef who trained in Tuscany and came back to the Bay Area.  He said that the Olive Garden was the most authentic Italian cuisine he's tried.  He must work there. To me, this is Italian cuisine that resembles what I had in Little Italy in  NYC and in Florence.  The pasta is to die for and the butter, don't know if that's authentic or not, but I want to ask for extra to take home, it's so divine.  I look for things on my plate to put butter on, fettucini with alfredo and extra butter sauce ? Oh yeah, for those carb limiting dieters, try the salmon with spinach entree.  I have no idea what they do to that spinach, but one forkful and I'm dving into it like it's my last meal.  Must have butter in it.
I was craving Italian food, and this place seemed promising. I really enjoyed the pappardelle osteria as it was tasty and more interesting than the usual marinara sauce. The veal ravioli was pretty good but my only complaint was that the lukewarm temperature in certain areas of the pasta. As for the tiramisu, the taste of alcohol too overwhelming for me, so I could not enjoy it. I felt that the service was fast and rushed for a slow night.
We've been wanting to try Osteria for many yrs and finally went for dinner.  It's Italian food that's pretty good but not great. The guy that greeted me was very friendly.  Though the husband was running late he accommodated us once he showed up.  I made a 6pm reservation at lunch time the same day. Iced water given immediately FREE crusty bread (cold) & sliced butter served over ice. - fine. We got: Carpaccio $9 - thin slices of raw steak, onion, caper, lemon & mustard.  Tasted fine, wish there was more meat though. Spaghetti Carbonara $13 - good, portions enough for 2.  We both liked this dish the best. Pappardelle Osteria $13 - large spinach noodles w/ prosciutto, mushrooms, & tomato sauce. - Fine, not as good as Spaghetti Carbonara. Glass of wine $8 - evil husband wanted it so jacked up our bill. Our total before tip $46.55.  Husband said 1 unisex bathroom in the back & by the hotel next door.  I didn't use the bathroom.
This was called the "best Italian restaurant" in downtown Palo Alto, so my friend and I ate there tonight.  Their buffalo mozzarella was amazing, as was my friend's linguine.  I ordered tortellini, which turned out only so-so. Service was extremely fast.  The waiter was also kind to me, when I forgot what tortellini is.  He said it's like a helmet, and did a funny helmet gesture.  He did not mock me for forgetting such a basic pasta.  For that matter, neither did my friend, so I am also rating her 5 stars. The coffee and tiramisu were also good.
My License Compliance Department came here for our Friday lunch. I ordered the Spinach Ravioli. It came out steaming hot. The pasta tasted fresh and was deliciously covered in their home maid tomato sauce. The service was not up to par, but the food made up for it.
If you'd like a heart attack on a plate, come here.  It's SO good to eat... and SO bad for you. A friend and I came here for PA's Dine Downtown.  We had their DD menu, of course, which consisted of an appetizer, fresh gnocchi, the main entree, and then dessert.  We both chose pretty much exactly the same things - scallops, the gnocchi, she had calamari steak, I had shrimp, and dessert ( more on this later). The scallops were to die for.  I personally am not a huge fan of scallops, but I figured, why the hell not, and ended loving them.  I'm not even sure they are on the main menu, that's how far out Osteria went for this whole DD thing.  But man.  They were good.  And BIG.  The gnocchi was fresh and good.  My friend, who is Italian, says that they were definitely up to her standards, which I assume are pretty high. And then the main dishes... although I had shrimp and she had a calamari steak, they were both SMOTHERED in butter sauce.  And when I say butter sauce, what I really mean to say is BUTTER.  As in watch it congeal as the meal progresses.  As in it looks gross but I can't stop eating it butter sauce.  The waitress told us that people drive two hours to get this stuff (specifically, the calamari steak).  It's that good. I can't really remember the dessert, which was probably due to the fact that we thought a painting was about to fall on us (another patron was leaning against the frame and the painting kept on moving around... kind of scary).  But no matter... I really enjoyed Osteria and can't wait to come back. The wait staff is great too.  Our waitress was very helpful and (gasp!) cheerful.  It was almost as though nothing would bring her more pleasure than to answer our questions.  I love service like that.  It is a little cramped and gets kind of loud, but it actually reminds me of Italy that way, so I didn't mind. EDIT 4/26/07  I came here with friends a few weeks back, and cannot express how much I enjoy coming here.  The appetizers are great, and the pastas are divine.  In fact, I would say that I almost prefer just getting a pasta instead of a main entree - they're big enough, and very delicious.
The only pasta that I crave is from Osteria del Forno.... the best pasta I've had outside of Europe!  If anyone has other suggestions, please let me know!  I'm serious.  I can't find another place in the Bay Area and I think they're getting tired of me harassing them for free flan or something. Last time we were here, they had these amazing porcini mushroom appetizers... but my old standby's are: *  linguine al pesto (fresh pasta, amazing!) *  tagliaterini (sp?) with bay shrimp *  veal picatta *  veal saltimbocca *  calamari steak (not what you'd normally expect, so delicate!) *  hearts of palm salad *  alfredo!
In the back of my head I remember going here a few years ago and thinking it was not that great, but we were starving and our original choice was closed so we decided to give it another try. When we walked in, it had a nicer feel to it than I remembered, but when we sat down and saw tape showing through the tablecloth, I was a little skeptical. I ordered the mozzarella and tomato salad and tortellini with prosciutto, peas and cream sauce. My friend ordered the spinach salad and a pasta with shrimp, cream and garlic. Overall I was unimpressed. They had this really potent pesto-like dressing that was very acidic and way too much for the delicate nature of the salad. They also had a bunch of grated red cabbage on the side which I thought was odd, but I ate it to help dilute the dressing. My friends salad was basically just spinach, mushrooms and cheese. Not worth what it was priced. My pasta was exactly what the description said, but that's it. To me the prosciutto seemed more like ham than prosciutto. I felt like I could have made it with pasta and sauce from a regular grocery store. I think my friend enjoyed her pasta, but similar to mine it had nothing special to it. Also to our surprise the shrimp was bay shrimp not regular shrimp. Basically my overall impression was that it was overpriced food that I could have made for much less at home.
Fat noodles were good. They were fresh and homemade, none of that Barrilla dried pasta crap. Service was ok, but our waitress  was kind of white trashy. I was looking over the menu and I couldn't decide. She was kinda impatient and just said "hey try this, this is good" then I was like "why is it so good" then she was like "I dunno, cause I like it".  Then I was like "ummm.... ok, I'll order that". Despite her lack of detail, I actually found the dish quite tasty to my ghetto palate.
I love Osteria! It is a family favorite.  Every time I come I leave out the door feeling great. I get the clam pasta you can get it with a white or red sauce. If you want a seafood buttery plate get the calamari steak.  It comes with a lemon caper sauce. Best part THE PLATES ARE HOT!!!!
Osteria is always packed, but I wasn't too happy with this place... I'd say the food was average (3 stars) but one star off for the fact that people without reservations who came in after us were seated before us simply because they seemed to know the host. It pissed me off to no end. The food comes very fast, so we got out of there fast too.
Mmm, second best Italian in Palo Alto, and best in the University Ave area. Love the pappardelle Osteria (handmade flat spinach noodles). I find that the tastiness of different pasta really ranges, so I hardly ever veer from getting the pappardelle. I like getting the polenta as appetizer too. Wine is ok, pairs decently with the meal but it's not why you go there. No, that's the pappardelle. Have I convinced you yet? Also lovely atmosphere and very homey.
Service - 3 Stars (great waiter but the others kept pushing their way through my seat and the one next to us bumping me so...) Food - 3 Stars. Very, very good, but nothing too original. Ambiance - 3 Stars. It's nice, but hey, its in Palo Alto. Everything there is just ok, but they all think they are the shit. And they're not, mainly because they actually care what every one is thinking of them. I believe most of the people and adolecsent kids here have a very false sense of confidence (they have this strange universal, i'm better than you attitude, but nothing actually sets them apart from the rest of the world). So I give you this comparison to the food at Osteria: "Nothing too original, but lots of nice things to look at." Just like the community.
IT WAS ON "THE" LIST: My list, to be exact. I've been wanting to go here for ages because A) my favorite genre of food is Italian, B) I've only heard good things from friends and from Yelpers, and C) they make they're own pasta! ATMOSPHERE: It's tiny! Service is cold, cold, cold! They weren't rude, per se, but brisk. Efficient. Like robots.  We had dinner reservations at 8:45PM on a MONDAY! What I'm trying to say is, "Make reservations if you want to dine at Osteria." Because even on a late Monday night, they were packed. Good luck with making the reservations over the phone. The robots are cold over the phone, too. FOOD: So that's what fresh pasta tastes like! But first off, I have to rave about my absolutely perfect caesar salad. It was $6.50, HUGE (enough for a meal all on its own), and was probably what a caesar salad was meant to be. I squirted lemon all over mine to mute the anchovy taste in the dressing and was in caesar salad bliss. Loved how my crisp romaine was cut (I don't get places that serve you the caesar salad in whole leaf form and expect you to use your knife when eating your salad) and wasn't drowning in dressing. OK, on to the pasta. I didn't like mine, but I loved my bf's. I ordered the large fettucine made out of spinach with prosciutto and mushroom. Yay! Pasta comes out, literally, steaming hot. Nay! It's hard to eat really, really, really hot pasta. It burns the tongue it does! My large spinach fettucine noodles were way overcooked and mushy - I don't know, is it because the noodles were fresh? Is that how it's supposed to be? My bf's penne with sundried tomatoes, asparagus, and chicken was delicious. The penne was al dente (which makes me wonder if large, fresh, noodles are harder to cook) and the vodka-style sauce was my favorite. His sister had the eggplant and it was prepared well too. We shared the hazelnut creme brulee and it was a perfect finish. IN A MOUTHFUL: Will definitely come back to try again. I especially like how it's not a chain. It's hard to find amazing Italian food in the South Bay, but I keep looking!
Normally, I would give Osteria 4 stars as the food has always been good.  However, last  night, I got the gnocchi and was pretty disappointed.  The gnocchi was about a 2.  They were very dense and doughy.  Gnocchi should be light and fluffy with a nice potato flavor (potato gnocchi).  The creamy tomato sauce was good, but there wasn't enough. I"ve had the veal piccata here before, and it was excellent.  The fettucine alfredo sauce is also very good, but not enough sauce to pasta ratio. I would come back but I'll probably stick with the veal next time.
I wish I weren't so critical of the food I eat as I am only a simple "cook"/foodie that likes to dine on good eats. But, shoot, if you have a choice between paying $15 at one restaurant compared to another, you are allowed to be picky as far as I'm concerned. You're paying THEM to cook something for YOU that you cannot replicate (this is the main factor on my mind when eating out). Osteria offers a delicious, delicious hazelnut flan with chocolate drizzles of gooey goodness. It's worth the $5. Its definitely on the medium-larger size portion compared to other fancy places and is less costly while providing the same quality and indulgence. Osteria also offers a nice, professional, and somewhat cozy ambiance. Seeing that this is Palo Alto and NOT a college town like I'm used to, one of the first things I noticed was me and my 4 fellow college friends sitting amongst a sea of old professionals and working folk. No families, no young groups like ourselves, more like 40-60 year olds. That being said, the restaurant was bustling. Every table was filled when we first arrived so we had to wait for 15 minutes. However I did call in beforehand and request (not reserve) a table for 4. The server at the front door remembered my name immediately! "Sarah right? Oh yes I remember everything." It was a nice surprise. :) In terms of decor, if I have to be picky, it wasn't classy inside, it was like what a house from a 70 year old grandma and grandpa would own with the pastels and white walls. No booths nor strong colors or fancy dishes. Now to the meal! I researched what to order. I wasn't expecting much since this was Palo Alto (I'm not a hater...) but peeps on Yelp said to try the fettucine with wild mushrooms and truffle oil(?) I forget. It was meh. Tasted like they used all of these ingredients: olive oil, butter, garlic, garlic, garlic, garlic infused olive oil, mushrooms, fettucine - in that order of quantity. I felt like I could make it and I could make it better. Parmesean cheese was good (sp) though. Also my friend ordered linguine with clams. I made a remark about "I wonder if the clams will be fresh--with shell and all?" Lo and behold my doubt was on point! The dish came out with a lot of clams...just the meat, no shell. Likely they used canned clams. Alas, I could also make this dish. Osteria vs. Cafe Pro Bono.....I would choose Osteria. They probably get a 3.5 star, and I round up for their awesome service.
Me and my boyfriend came in here on a whim when we decided to drive to downtown PA and take a shot in the dark. After passing a few other restaurants, we decided to stop into Osteria. Apparently you need to have a reservation, but luckily we got in early enough that they sat us anyway! (We arrived around 7PM) Their creamy chocolate hazelnut flan is TO DIE FOR! But I'll get to that in a bit.. I ordered their Fantasia pasta.. rich taste and very flavorful! All their pasta is fresh so I was immediately pleased :) My boyfriend ordered the gnocchi in their "pink" sauce.. so yummy! I'm not generally a fan of gnocchi so I was surprised when I had a bite! It was so tender and tasted very fresh. Their house chianti is amazing as well. Now for their dessert! They had a nice selection of different desserts but when I saw the chocolate hazelnut flan, I flipped. Chocolate and hazelnut are two of the greatest things to have ever come together. When it arrived, I was disappointed at how small it seemed (since my boyfriend and I decided to share a dessert!) but even with us sharing, it was the perfect amount. After the rich pasta dinners, the dessert is perfect. It was so creamy and had so much flavor.. my boyfriend and I could not stop talking about the taste bud-gasm that was their delicious chocolate hazelnut flan. We even joked around about coming back just to eat 10 of those bad boys. (Which probably will turn into reality) Definitely recommend!!!
I finally came here after reading wonderful yelp reviews about this place.  The portions were good and the entrees were definitely reasonably priced.  The salad was supposedly pretty good as well. What I liked about this place was that it had a good noise level.  A good noise level refers to enough noise during the meal to make sure you don't feel like you need to have some really hushed conversation about your favourite TV show.  It also give you a feeling that you are dining with other people in the restaurant.  The noise level isn't intolerable to the point where you can barely hear yourself talking either.  I really liked that about this place.
The Ambiance is Delightful: Osteria is always comfortable. The warm lighting and welcoming interior provide an intimate dining space. The food is ok, but not always great. It is a place to have a so-so chianti and a plate of pasta. The pasta is wonderful, but some of the other items are mediocre. For example, at a recent lunch, I ordered the shrimp, avocado and heart of palm salad. The dressing was good, but oily, and the shrimp were a touch old. Osteria is one of my favorite places for Italian food on the Peninsula, but don't order the chicken. It's great for a wonderful plate of pasta. Also, if you are specific about what you would like, the fish dishes can be wonderful, if rather buttery. Everything is buttery/oily. The bread is pre-buttered, if you take food to go. The spinach with the salmon with beurre blanc is insidious in that the oil content could be and is, as far as I can discern, quite high. That said, the spinach and the salmon are delicious. The food though, reminds me of "add enough butter to anything." Actually, the salmon with beurre blanc is great, and the best salmon you will find in downtown Palo Alto. Unfortunately, I don't think it is on the menu. The atmosphere is what makes this place so wonderful, and the pasta dishes indeed are fairly good. The walls are covered with large abstracts, which offer an eyeful, but really the decor is warm. The restaurant is small and welcoming, and while the food is not always stellar, the wine and pasta keep people coming back. Osteria is usually filled to capacity for dinner. 3.7++
3.5 stars  - what an interesting mix of reviews, a few really don't like this place at all...what a shame. I have to admit that I'm not a fan but for other reason - smelling like food after dining there.  Folks from my last work place like this place - fast and tasty.  I always declined because I just don't want to smell like food the rest of the day - yuck! However, I went there for dinner Friday night because a friend hasn't been for a while...I was thinking, why not somewhere else in Palo Alto?  but whatever...  Honestly, the food was good and it was fast.   Wine selection isn't there but I don't expect it - I see Osteria as a neighborhood mom & pop place so you need to set expectation accordingly.  Go there for the food and you'll be fine - want service, ambiance and all...may be disappointed. Oh, back to the food...we shared a carpaccio - WOW, it was fantastic!  It may very well be one of the best I've had - so fresh, sweet...nearly just melts in your mouth...the chopped purple onion, capers and horseradish mayo were perfect with it.  I'm so tempted to go back just to have that!  My pasta was piping hot and tasty.  The dessert of the day was very good too.  Overall, we had a wonderful dinner. Back to the service - they are very nice to their regular patrons, as they should.  They can appear "rude" to others but I think it's just their way of speaking and such...frankly, they won't care if you don't come back.  Because they do get very busy - they normally will not sit you until your party is there.
I haven't had much italian around Palo Alto, but I was pleasantly surprised by the quality of this food.  The portion felt a little small, but that's probably a good thing.  This beats any crap italian place you'd find in your typical 'little italy' type places. There were many choices to please any palate.
Came in on a Thursday night-very packed for a weeknight. Make sure to reserve a table before coming. I came in with a friend without a reservation and we waited patiently for about 10 minutes, and the host was nice to let us sit early since we didn't bug him. Food is excellent, had the cappelini pomodoro, a hearts of palm salad, and a wonderful polenta with mushrooms and tomato sauce. Pricing is quite reasonable given the quality of the food and location in Palo Alto. Service is a little slow, but hospitable. I recommend this place, especially its pasta and make sure you have a reservation!
After hearing rave reviews about this place from my friends, I was very excited to finally dine at Osteria. The food at Osteria tends more towards the hearty rather than the delicate.  The presentation left a lot to be desired, and the flavor profile of the pasta and mushroom dish I had was rather simplistic.  They replaced the porcini mushrooms in the dish I order with shitaki (though they did ask me beforehand), which gives you an idea the level of effort they put into designing their dishes. The food was rather forgettable, but seeing as the prices are reasonable for the area, it wasn't a complete waste.
Apparently I yelped too fast... Just went here again, and the service throughout the majority of the night was standard, but the ending was horrible that it ruined whatever goodwill Osteria had from the last visit. We were a little over an hour in and getting a last drink of water before leaving.  Apparently the owner/receptionist man thinks we're going to sit there for another 2 hours so he rushes up to me and says fairly verbatim - "I need you to leave because I need to turn your table.  I'm running a business, you understand?" Wow.  I've never been treated like that before.  I was so stunned I forgot to get his name or give some retort.  Mouth agape, I departed, vowing to not willingly patronize Osteria again. PS: Stick to the core pastas - we ordered 3 of the specials pasta and they aren't good.
The first time I went to Osteria, probably around 2002, the service was horrendous.  I haven't been... Read more 
After looking for a good Italian restaurant online with my boyfriend, we chose to go to Osteria. When we got there, it smelled delicious. I went to put in our names knowing there would be a wait and one of the waiters/owners/hosts was a complete jerk. He had an attitude that you wouldn't stand for being a first timer...he acted like he was too busy for us...we chose to take our money else where. We went to Bella Luna down the street and had the best dinner and service..something that we could tell that Osteria couldn't offer. I don't care how good the food or price is at this place, I won't step a foot in the door again due to the service we received after we walked in the door...Huge Jerk! Go to Bella Luna...absolutely delicious and great service.
The food met our expectations. Don't think there needs to be any more convincing. Try it =)
I don't get the long lines and wanna-be pretentious hostess. Seriously this place is not all that. In fact, I don't know why I keep on returning here but I guess its better than Olive Garden (yuck). First time I was here, I couldn't believe the long wait, the hype and their snobbish attitude. Soup was mediocre and my dish was just "ok". I also didn't appreciate how they always try to rush everyone through their meal. Relax, I will eat my food and go in less than an hour. Second time and many trips after... I stick to a simple dish and remind myself that this is way better than the OG. I even got used to their rude hostess and didn't even mind when they asked us if we can move to another table. I guess low expectations pay off in the end.
I had Melanzana Del Vegetariano, and it was tasteless even after I added salt and pepper. Eggplant and spinach just really don't go together, topped with a thick layer of cheese, not so good. I barely finished half of the plate. Add one star since I at least  got full by eating the bread and butter. Totally should have gone for the Carbs. Everyone who ordered pasta seemed to be happy.
When our company first moved downtown, we would try out Osteria frequently.  Back in our old digs, Cafe Pro Bono was our place, so Osteria seemed like it would be a natural replacement. I've been here several times, but I just haven't found anything outstanding yet.  The carpaccio isn't bad, but it isn't great.  I do enjoy the prosciutto with melon, however.  And the bread is just bland... I've tried the sole, the salmon, and the gnocchi.  All are pretty good at first, but I grow tired of it by the end of the meal.
This place has horrible customer service... They have decent pasta and sauces. It's too bad that the service sucks so badly that it takes away from the restaurant and the food itself. My boyfriend brought me here for my birthday and had made reservations a week in advance. I arrived 2 minutes early and asked to be seated. They refused to do so until my boyfriend arrived-- and he did, ONE MINUTE past our reservation time. Instead of seating us they gave away our table to a couple who had arrived without reservations. When we asked the waiters about our table they shrugged their shoulders and told us to sit and wait. So we did-- for another 10 minutes. My boyfriend and I did get a table-- in a corner where my chair was bumped into by the people behind us. We bit the bullet and ordered our meals-- I had the seafood pasta and he had the veal. When our server brought our food she forgot to ask us if we wanted cheese. So we sat and waited-- 15 minutes for cheese We kept trying to get her attention but apparently she was too busy walking around in circles throughout the restauarant. I'm never going back to this place. I don't care if they're some kind of a staple to Palo Alto's dining scene... their food isn't anything special and their service just plain sucks. I'd rather give away my money than to eat at this place.
My husband loves their parpadelle with meat ragu. Food is not bad. But I don't understand why an Italian trattoria has to be so dark in lighting. Service? Well, when they packed so many tables in such a small space, they probably didn't plan for a good service.
I rated this restaurant two stars for the food only. The service deserves a big fat zero.  The host and the way that they handle their loyal customers is downright rude. My first visit - my girlfriends and I were celebrating a birthday.  We had just finished our deserts and paid the bill when the waiter asked us to leave because there were people waiting for the table.  Ok, most of my friends refused to return...but I did. My second visit - again having a great time with a girlfriend.  We paid our bill and were enjoying our drinks when the waiter came over and asked us to move to the hotel lobby to finish our drinks.  RUDE! Third visit - the place was pretty empty and we arrived early without a reservation.  While we were being seated, the host said we could stay only an hour because they needed the table. I have been a loyal Osteria customer (lunches and dinners) and I love the food, but I just can't continue to be so embarrassed in front of my friends.  I completely understand that you need the table to turnover...but really - I have NEVER had a restaurant consistently ask me to leave.  On the other hand, you guys get away with it because your restaurant is always packed.
I give this place 5 stars b/c as an Italian living out here from NYC and experimenting with "Italian places" in Northern California equivalent to licking the ass of a donkey. I like the homemade pasta, Italian wine selection, typical East coast rude service from 65 year old experience waiters.  Also, I'm from Italy to the comment about butter, it's pretty standard. And affordable!  (Previous review left on 7/4/07) (New Tirade after 7/17/07) WENT THERE LAST NIGHT AND IT WAS HORRIFIC!  I have recommended this place to so many people too!    I'm really sorry San Fransicans, but there should be a city ordinance, state law that sourdough bread should never be permitted within 200 feet of an Italian restaurant.  Next, we all know turnover is the key to making a nightly profit, but, not when we are fuming and vow not to return.   I'll admit here that I have tried sneaking the Safeway brand tomatoes by, seeing them for .75 a can but that bright red pasty pith just doesn't go away regardless of how you condense it down....  Well I saw that pith and recognize it anywhere...  WAIT - I ALMOST FORGOT!  THEY GAVE ME A SPOON WITH MY PASTA DISH!!!!!!!  UGH!! NEVER TRUST A PLACE THAT GIVES YOU A SPOON!  I WAS RAISED TO WALK OUT, BUT JUST DON'T HAVE THE GUTS TO ACTUALLY DO IT, BUT SHOULD HAVE. FXXX THIS!  EAT AT MY HOUSE!  I know it's awkward, bring your date, you regional colleagues and friends in Biotech, yep, up to my house, have a seat, you bring the Brunello, and the world will be a better place. Phew! I feel much better now - thank you.  :)
Ambiance:  Perfect!  Sofisticated and relaxing.  The only criticism I have is that the tables were too close together. Food:  Perfect!  Osteria makes their own pasta, which came out just the way I like it.  I had their Ravioli special (crab-filled ravioli) in a tomato cream sauce which had a hint of nutmeg.  It tasted great with the pasta and some bread. Price:  Reasonable. Service:  Quick and friendly. Recommendation:  I would definitely recommend this restaurant to anyone, except large parties.  The place is small, and you should probably call ahead for reservations.
I came here for a casual Italian meal down in Palo Alto two weekends ago.  Always had passed by this place as it had a 'old-traditional' style and feel to it. Decided to try it finally after needing a place for some dinner after doing some shopping at Stanford Mall. Ordered the Pesto Linguine.  Plate of pasta.  Didn't wait more than 6-8 minutes and it was served to me!  I was surprised that it came out so quickly and it arrived HOT.  The pasta tasted so good and the pesto sauce was great!  It was special enough for me because the pasta tasted pretty fresh and the temperature was to my favor. The price was pretty good as it came out to be about 12-14 dollars per person.  Not too bad. I would definitely return for a casual meal and even try some of the other pasta dishes.  They do produce the dishes well! I recommend!
I hadn't been here for years, and to tell you the truth I don't think the last time I came that I thought it was good.   However, since I keep hearing about how great the food is, I decided to give it another try.  It was also one of the only restaurants that was open on Labor Day... Food was good. I had the chicken, my date the veal.  We started out with salad and carpaccio to share.  All of it was good. The pastas looked amazing, but did not try them.  We were sent a tiramisu by the manager for dessert and it was so decadent we couldn't finish.  It really was a lot of food for two people....
I like this place a lot. It has a very homey/local restaurant feel. I've been here a few times over the past 6 years, and returned recently for dinner with a few friends. Made a reservation over the phone. It does get crowded on most nights, so I would recommend a reservation. It's near an underground parking garage, which usually has plenty of room on the weekdays. I had the tortellini with prosciutto and cream. Mmm...delicious! I also sampled my friend's carbonara which was nice and another dish that had spinach noodles. Everything here is pretty good, fresh, and reasonably priced. The food came out really fast, they must have everything pretty much ready to go. Still tasted fresh though. The crowd tends to be a bit older though. Mostly 30s and 40+, with a few grad students lurking around. I felt like we were some of the youngest people there, and I'll be 30 next year!
If your idea of Italian food is Buca di Beppo or Olive Garden, please stop reading this because you don't deserve Osteria. No really, stop reading this and go play in traffic right now. If you love fresh pasta, this is where you need to be. The pasta comes out piping hot and you can taste the al dente. Get the tagliarini verdi!! The only complaint I have is the layout which is very tight quarters. I wish they could buy out their neighbor and expand. Due to the limited seating capacity, I'd suggest you reserve at least 5 hrs in advance if you're planning to eat there around dinner rush hour. Primo casual dating venue.
Fantastic pasta.  Really enjoyed the fresh mushroom pasta I had here. Also had the best chicken of my life here, really really tender buttery chicken with a side of the most succulent carrots in the world.  Wowee. This place is almost always packed, but decent table arrangement keeps you from feeling like you're eating with the people next to you. Reservations are almost a must unless you come really early or really late. Can bring your own wine in but theres a corkage fee.
I have now been here three times, with the latest being tonight, so I feel I have a good handle on Osteria. Everytime I've been there, it's been absolutely packed.  Don't even think about going here without reservations. Nearly every entree I've ordered or tasted here is above average to excellent.  Try the gnocchi, veal (I believe there are 3 or 4 variations), or spaghettini carbonara.  The mozzarella and tomato appetizer is excellent as well. Okay...onto the complaints...most of which were only an issue tonight.  It all stems from the fact that this place is popular...which is a testament to the food, but it's almost too popular for its own good, if that makes sense. Tonight there were no less than a dozen customers clogging up the front area.  Unfortunately, this is also the path that servers take to deliver dishes to the patrons.  It was absolute chaos, with waiters bumping into each other and customers. Towards the middle and back of the restaurant, there are larger tables that are nicely spaced out for medium to large groups.  It seems like the front is reserved for 2 and 4 seat tables.  My gripe is that these tables out front are so packed together it's a little claustrophobic.  I could have reached out and touched the back of the dude next to me with my elbow tonight! I think they would be much better served to take out a couple of tables to make a little more room, and maybe set some benches or small tables outside for people to relax on while they wait for their tables. The service seemed a little rushed and impersonal as well.  Our water glasses sat empty for a good 15 minutes, and when our dishes came out they were rather unceremoniously plopped down on our table. However, as is always the case with me, if the food is great, it can make up for a lot of other shortcomings.  The food here is consistent and tasty, and will keep me coming back. Instead of fighting to find street parking, just head over to the big underground parking structure kitty corner to the restaurant.  Skip the dessert here and walk 2 blocks to Gelato Classico after.  Mmmmm. Food - 4.5 stars Ambiance - 4 stars Service - 3 stars Value - 4 stars
Excellent specials this evening and the guys enjoyed the marrow from the osso buco. Even the green beans were tasty!  The hazel nut flan was divine. The only downside was the service. We were a reservation party of seven and felt like we were rushed from the minute we were seated until the minute we walked out the door. Antipasta was not even partially done when salads arrived. Then entree, dessert. Slam bam - we are out of here! Love the food, barely tolerate the speed by which we must eat it.
I'll give it 1&1/2 star for food.  To cut to the chase regarding food, it was decent, but forgettable.  And service was old-world aggressive and apathetic.  Unless you're an elder Italian man, you would not find it charming. Met a girlfriend there for dinner on a weeknight.  I made reservation for 6:00 and got there 10 minutes early, but couldn't get seated before she got there; which was 6:08. As I sat there at the front, I noticed that all the nice tables by the window were being given to people who just walked in.  I knew because I heard them ask about availability for walk-ins.  And soon enough, even the decent tables in the middle of the room were occupied. She finally got to the restaurant and we were seated... next to the bathroom.  The moral of the story:  I got punished for making a reservation. Never again.
Probably a 3.5 I got the tagliarrette (sp?) with a cream sauce and shrimp. Small shrimp, overcooked pasta, not much taste to it. However, the bread was good, as was the dipping sauce, and they had probably the best caesar salad I've ever had. Service was 4.5.
Good carpaccio and spaghetti carbonara (when was the last time a carbonara stood out?). The double chocolate ganache (their chocolate lava cake) was very good - better than other decent chocolate lava cakes nearby such as Gambardella's. The salad and our other entree ("pancetta pappardelle"?) were merely okay. Decent prices considering its expensive location in downtown Palo Alto. I subtracted one star for lack of ambience/atmosphere (maybe the lighting was too bright?) and because this place was merely "okay" when compared to Italian-style restaurants in other cities such as North Beach, Little Italy, the North End or South Philly.
okay.. i must update since i ate there for lunch today. FRESH PASTA!!  it is STILL EXCELLENT -- the BEST i've ever had.  when it comes to italian, a place really needs to impress me. my favs?? PAPPARDELLE OSTERIA -- large spinach noodles w/prosciutto, mushrooms, tomato sauce CALAMARI STEAK MEUNIERE -- lemon butter sauce the gnocchi is another dish to order. other pluses, dishes are about $10. oh, the staff even came out to find us 5mins after we left the restaurant to get our little box of leftovers. if you give osteria less than 4 stars...you are either: 1) too crazy picky (critical) 2) hard to please -- DO NOT DATE this person 3) doesn't know how to order =p - - -
as i said in another review, i am not usually into italian restaurants... but my gosh, FRESH PASTA??... Read more 
I went here for lunch yesterday and had a wonderful experience. I ordered the Fettuccine Alfredo, a dish I am currently addicted to like nothing else! Unlike other Palo Alto restaurants, they serve HUGE portions. I ate 1/4 of my dish because it was so huge. They also serve free, fresh sourdough bread with all meals. I could have just had the yummy bread for dinner...it was *that* good. The service was good and the restaurant, as many Yelpers below have noted, is close to one of the bigger parking structures in Palo Alto. The tables are a bit close to one another, but that's my only gripe. The reasonable price and service makes this place a 5 star restaurant on my list!
Osteria does not live up to its hype. I was extremely disappointed the first time I ate there. The sauce on the pasta I ordered was far too creamy to be authentically Italian (I am convinced that no one eats this way in Italy on a regular basis, just as no Chinese eat MSG-laden sweet-and-sour pork), and I could barely taste the truffle. The dessert I ordered, the gianduja flan, was pretty good, but seemed to be, again, too creamy. The food also came really fast... perhaps a little too fast? I sound harsh right now, but I think it's mainly because I expected so much more... Overall, it was a decent experience, with average food.
As far as Osteria in Palo Alto is concerned, to me, it's an institution. I don't know how old Osteria is, but my first time in Palo Alto nearly a decade ago, Osteria was where I was taken, and it's been a favorite ever since. The place is small, the seating is a little cramped, but it is clean. The food is reasonably priced, voluminous without being overbearingly so, and good.  An ideal place to go when you want something familiar and comfortable, while being just fashionable enough to go on a date.
I went to Osteria with my husband and aunt & uncle for dinner.  All of us were treated like second class citizens by the manager Mike.  He is arrogant, frankly lacks customer service skills, rude, and probably racist.  The experience left us with such a sour taste in our mouth that it ruined the evening for my family.  The one good thing was several customers who saw what happened left with us, even though they had reservations. Our reservation was at 6:30, we arrived 10 min early, and waited for our aunt & uncle who arrived at 6:45.  We could tell Mike was annoyed with us, but instead of letting us know that we were late and it may be difficult to seat us, which we would have appreciated, he unwillingly sat us at a tiny corner table by the kitchen meant for 2 people.  As soon as we signed the check at 8 pm, he came and told us to leave because others were waiting.  On the way out, my aunt tried to speak with him about the way we were treated, he cut her short and said "you all were 45 min late, I don't need to explain anything to you."  I then corrected him that we were 15 min late, but he cut me off and told me to get out of his restaurant and he did not need to speak with me. I noticed that Mike favored certain customers and gave them best seats in the house as soon as they walked in - even without reservations.  I also noticed he did not ask some groups who were seated before us to leave even after they finished dinner, but he asked us. I've been here enough times and enjoyed the food, but the way they treated me and my family, it was unacceptable. If he doesn't  want to serve certain customers, then make it known from the beginning. Don't take our money then kick us out. Other Yelp reviews shared similar experiences, I wonder if the owner cares.
Osteria is a pretty cute little Italian restaurant, but I think I would go back more for the ambiance than the food. Some things we tried: - The Mozzarella di Bufala e Pomodori (appetizer of mozzarella, tomato, and basil) was actually really good.  It tasted fresh, and the sauce that it came with was really flavorful. - The Penne Fantasia: the only thing I liked about the dish was the sun-dried tomato.  Make sure you get a little in every bite, or else the rest of the dish is pretty unexciting. - Spaghettini Carbonara: Our waiter said this was his favorite dish, but I thought it was pretty bland.  Meh! - The tiramisu was really good, and came in a big enough portion to be shared between four girls. The food was alright, but one last note to be nit-picky -- I didn't notice until the water poured the wine, but my glass was really dirty.  I could see brown rings from the person who drank before me :(  They were quick to get me a new glass, but they just poured the wine from one glass to another.  AHH, not very hygienic!
My morals are pretty questionable.... I have to throw it out there.. I feel so much better now. Do I bat my eyelashes at the waiter to make sure I get an extra piece of bacon next to my eggs?? hells yes! So we get here... and host  guy is totally in to wifey.  did that help us get a seat right away... hells yes.  Did I say anything or mind.. hells no!  As he continued to openly flirt with her like I was freakin invisible (mind you, I'm 6'2 250 lbs, not the hardest person to miss)... we got drinks and maybe an appetizer or two out of it... did I say anything.. hells no. I see a recurrent theme with the management being rude to patrons, and making them wait... and the possible "soup nazi" situation.  Come on now.. that was funny on TV, not in real life. With all that jibber jabber out of the way.... the food is good, actually it's really good.  Is it worth is to put up with the nonsense?  Probably not, but maybe if you have your arm candy, and the creepy guy is in to her... you've got the hook up!
Solid place for italian food. The shrimp were, for lack of a better description, "large and in charge." And if my shrimp are "large and in charge," I'm in a good place. The ingredients were good and the prices weren't too killer. Everything was pretty saucy, and it was portioned right. In the end, the wine kicked ass.
The decor is a little dated, and the pasta is a little over-sauced, but overall this is good food. You won't get a bargain, but it's not overpriced for what you get. In fact, you get too much. I'm continually astounded at how large some people expect portions to be. The portion I got for lunch was, at the very least, two meals. Add to that the chunk of (quite good) sourdough bread that was much larger than my head, and I had more than enough to warrant an afternoon nap. So quit your whining -- if you were whining -- order a glass of red wine, and have some great conversation over a decent plate of pasta. This isn't a place to show off to acquaintances. It's a place to eat with your friends. Mangia!
I was very satisfied with Osteria. The menu was very authentic Tuscan - that's why there's butter instead of olive oil on the table (Northern Italy is the land of cream and butter, Southern Italy is the land of olive oil and tomatoes). I got the Insalata Speciale (Special Salad), and LOVED it. I could already tell with the first bite that I'd be craving it for a long time to come. It had butter lettuce, endive, lots of shredded fresh radicchio (=not bitter), and an amazing dressing. If you like crunchy salads, get this one. I also got the homemade spinach raviolini stuffed with cheese. It came with a fresh tomato sauce, as in, they blended up tomatoes in the kitchen, and briefly simmered it with garlic and herbs. It was not intense on flavor, but I really appreciated the freshness of the whole thing. My boyfriend had the Pappardelle Osteria. We also saw two other people eating it. He really thought it was too bland, with barely discernible pieces of prosciutto, if any, and thought the sauce was too bland. I then ordered the Doppio Cioccolato, the molten chocolate torte with vanilla ice cream. It got better with every bite, especially the slightly crunchy sides that were still ribbed from the ramekin. All that, plus a glass of wine, was just under $50. Only downside was the small table, and the extemely flustered waitress- she brought me beer instead of wine, stepped on my boyfriend's foot, and set down bread plates at our table while we were waiting for dessert, then picked them  back up again quickly and ran off mumbling something (I guess they were the wrong sized plates, but we wouldn't have noticed). Either way, she was really nice, and so was everyone else - I didn't detect a shred of snobiness or coldness like the other reviewers. We even showed up 15 minutes late for our 7:30 reservation on Friday night, and they had a table ready for us. I loved it,  but I'm going to have a hard time getting my boyfriend to go back.
I've been on a mission to catch up with a bunch of friends over dinner and last night the restaurant of choice (hers) was Osteria. She'd lived in Palo Alto for years but somehow this place had escaped her despite the good things she'd heard about it. Well, now she was there. We were seated immediately and given menus. Very traditional fare...pastas, pizzas, salads, etc. Now, this is not to say this is a pizza joint...rather think very upscale Tuscan fare. Our very Italian waiter came by and took orders...we both ordered the Mozzarella di Bufala e Pomodori (simply imported buffalo mozzarella cheese with sliced tomatoes, basil and olive oil). Fresh and delicious. As a matter of fact, we were going to split one order but when it arrived I immediately called for another. For entrees, I ordered the Tortellini al Prosciutto (stuffed pasta with prosciutto, cream and peas) and my friend ordered the Gnocchi alla Lucchese (a red house sauce on gnocchi). I left nothing at all on my plate and the remainder of the gnocchi went home for the next day's lunch. For dessert I went with the lemon cheesecake with raspberry puree and she went with the gelato. We killed both. The service was very good. The ambiance warm and friendly...very neighborhood. Although the menu wasn't particularly creative the food was expertly prepared. Osteria is a very nice evening out...no pretensions, just good food.
One of the managing partners bought food from here and brought it to the office for our staff meeting. He ordered the pancetta and fettucine, the spicy penne marinara, ceasar salad and steamed veggies. I loved the fettucine with pancetta; had a nice touch with the cream and peas. Looking forward to dine here and taste their gnocchi!
A three star rating from me is "average". I went here for lunch today. It was nice, and we got there before noon, so it was easy to get in and out quickly. The meals were reasonably priced for lunch in downtown PA, you could get just about anything on the menu for under $12, and they are very generous and attentive with the bread and water service. I had the spinach pasta with shrimp and garlic, and it wasn't very garlicky, which I consider a plus. Alas, it didn't have a lot of flavor period, but still, the fresh pasta was nice. The food was fine, but not memorable. Also, the waiter, though nice, acted like he couldn't wait to get away from us, even though my friend and I are all no muss no fuss orderers who don't waste time and are super-friendly good tippers. He seemed nervous and like he wanted to escape the front of the house. I wish him well. We'd probably eat here again if we were in the neighborhood, but we wouldn't crave it.
Everything about this place was okay.  I've heard a couple people who really like this place, but I guess I just got a different experience.  The hostess was a snob, the waitress looked and seemed impatient to serve us, we made reservations and stuck us (three people) in a two person table in a corner. This place gets three stars because it's not pricey, and I'm willing to go back and perhaps my review will change next time.
My best friend and I used to eat at Osteria regularly. We always ordered the fettuccini with porcini and tartufi, and we always left happy...until tonight. It had been around three years since our last visit, but the menu is the same as ever. We ordered our fettuccini. When it arrived, we did not smell truffle oil, nor did we taste it. In fact, it tasted like lemon. We told our waiter; he came over with a bottle of (what he claimed was) truffle oil and doused our dishes with it. It tasted even more like lemon. We told the host, who took our dishes away. Turns out the chef had been using lemon oil, not truffle oil. I'm not sure how he could have failed to notice that. The waiter kept saying that the chef was too stubborn to listen to him; the busboys kept trying to take away our bread; and no one offered us anything in the way of compensation. A free glass of wine would have been appreciated. Anyway, eventually, our waiter brought us the correct dishes. We could smell and taste the truffle oil, but the pasta was oversauced and too rich and overall disappointing. It used to be good. I doubt I'll ever eat there again.
We went there last night. Excellent! And great price for downtown Pali! We split a Cesar (plain), fetticini (actual fresh pasta!!!) and an AMAZING Calamari (with 2 beverages $44). Wow, it was sooo good.  This will be a mainstay !!!!
HEADLINE: Consistently warm, embracing, delicious ... a culinary refuge The family and I have been coming here to this little place on Hamilton since we moved to the Bay Area back in 2000. This little hole in the wall is a favorite of mine, my wife's and now my college age son who likes to bring his girlfriend here on special occasions. For starters, across the board, the family favorite is their Carpaccio. Paper thin raw beef served on a chilled plate, seasoned delectably with olive oil, mayo, hot dijon mustard, capers, red onion ... just freaking fabulous. It truly is something to savor. It is the best I've ever had around the world including the best haunts in New York, Chicago, London, San Francisco, Hong Kong, Shanghai, the Caribbean, Dallas and Philadelphia. The benchmark against all other Carpaccios are measured. My personal entree favorite here is the Calamari Steak ... wonderfully thick and succulent calamari steak, triple dipped in an egg wash, pan fried to perfection, with a lemon butter white sauce, served with their famous butter-braised vegetables ... usually string beans and carrots. Absolutely mouth watering. It literally melts in your mouth. I've got a Pavlovian response going on here right now as I'm typing!!!!!!!! The wife generally goes for a pasta ... usually their Carbonara ... it is always satisfying, especially in the Winter months when you want to settle down with a deep bowl of steaming creamy pasta and chase the chill and rain away with a nice Chianti ... which they always have!!! The lad enjoys their lamb dish ... a nice portion of succulent sliced lamb and a nice gravy to go with it with vegetables and potatoes. Their Italian lemonade is something he looks forward to as he doesn't drink ...... yet. Make no mistake, the tables are on top of one another, and the place seems to always be packed. The plaster walls, glass windows and tin ceilings make for an acoustic bombast on busy evenings, but I personally believe it only adds to the place's charm and ambiance. We have found ourselves upping the decibels to get a word in edgewise on occasion. Busy nights could be a little tedious for a romantic evening for two, but it always delivers a terrific 'family get together' in the best Italian sense of the words. Service and attention have always, always been at a very high standard. Reservations are highly recommended. Like I said above, it always seems packed ... a true testament to the quality of experience that awaits. Business lunch, or family dinner, or dinner with dear friends from out of town, this place has never disappointed in ten years. Rock solid. Manga!!!!!
This place has good, simple Italian dishes.  I love the spaghetti carbonara, it really is a standout dish.  The linguine with clams is also good. I'd give this place 4 stars but for the fact that you're packed in there like sardines.  It may not be great for a date, no privacy and it can be loud.
Fine food, fine service, real Italian flavor all around. Must try the deserts, they are a Godsend. I should mention the chairs are a bit uncomfortable and the place can get loud on a busy night.
I've only been to this restaurant once, and I can't wait to go back. From the outside, the restaurant would not be amiss on a real Italian street. On the inside you will find a pleasant ambiance that is bright, yet warm. I had the veal in a (lemon?) cream sauce with capers... so good! Like people say, it seems like the service can be spotty, but at least the food is spot on.
Osteria is classic old school Italian If you want a tasty plate of pasta for around $10 a plate it does not get any better. Great bread, butter leaf salad is great. Quaint setting, nothing fancy just good Italian. If you like butter you will love Osteria.
This is a popular date place for the BF and I. We discovered it one night when we walked by and the place was packed and it was a weeknight. A packed place on a weeknight has to be a good sign. We always tend to order the capellini (thin pasta, tomato sauce) and the veal with cheese/spinach on top. We're always thrilled with how good it tastes and how quickly it comes to the table - probably within 5 minutes. We also really like the antipasti dishes as well as the salads which are very fresh. You can't get in without a reservation so you definitely need to make one. The place can be a tad cramped and noisy and the background music is not traditional music but always a weird contemporary selection. But! The food is great, hot, the waiters are fun and the ambiance certainly make for a fun time. And the prices are very fair for downtown Palo Alto.
I went here for a friends birthday dinner.  We had a group of ten and I made the reservation about a week and a half in advance. We had a 7pm reservation and the restaurant was packed.  From the moment we sat down I felt like they were rushing to get us out.  I ordered a Cesar salad.  Besides lacking in presentation I thought the lettuce was wet which is a major fail in my opinion.  For dinner I ordered some sort of pasta with shrimp and cream sauce.  It was a HUGE portion.  I really liked my dinner and would get it again if I went back. I am giving them a three stars. -1 for a mediocre salad -1 for rushing the party out of the restaurant
I've been enjoying Osteria's delicious, fresh, handmade pastas ever since I moved to the valley 5 years ago. This is the best Italian restaurant in Silicon Valley- IMHO. My favorite starters are either the fondo (artichoke bottom with shrimp) or caesar salad. For main dishes, their pastas never fail to amaze me`. For more adventurous eaters, the papardelle and gamberetti are unique spinach-based pasta dishes topped with amazing sauces. For traditionalists, Osteria serves an incredible fettucine alfredo that is unbelievably light for a cream-based dish, accented with hints of nutmeg. If you're in the mood for a non-pasta main dish, the melanzane (eggplant) or salmon are always delicious. All this for an average of $35-50 for two, depending on whether you decide to add drinks/dessert. For a delicious lunch or dinner at an incredibly welcoming and romantic (yet family-friendly!) gem of a restaurant, run, don't walk to Osteria in Palo Alto.
I'd last eaten here 5 years ago, with subsequent attempts thwarted by 90 minute waits on a friday night. Monday night is much saner, and walking in around 9pm, it was easy to get served. I remember the pasta being really good 5 yrs ago but we were starving and drawn to their prix fixe menu. For $24 per person, we got  a salad with beets on top, a porcini risotto for the primi, wild salmon and saltimbocca for the secondi, and some espresso flan thing for dessert. It was very reasonably priced for the amount of food, the portions of which were very large. The salad was decent, nothing stellar. The risotto was delicious in flavor but overcooked. The salmon was very good, altho it was pan fried which is not my preparation of choice. It came with perfectly cooked vegetables, carrots, and beans. The Saltimbocca had cheese inside, and was merely decent, but again the portions were gigantic. We were stuffed before dessert, the flan was so incredibly delicious we were compelled to shovel it in down our maws, certainly among the best I've had. The service was fine, although it seemed like the staff was itching to get the heck out, cos there were very few people in the restaurant by the time we were eating. The wine list does not list any wines by the glass, but they brought me one anyways - I had a Pinot Grigio that was  very good, and reasonably priced at $7.50. I doubt both of us needed that much food, so I skipped breakfast and lunch today. I'd like to go back and do the pasta sometime..
This is my favourite Italian restaurant!  The prices are very reasonable, especially for Palo Alto/University Ave area.  Their spaghetti carbonara is *to die for*...this is my benchmark dish for many italian places, and very few get it right.  This is the only place I've been to where their pasta dishes rival those that I've had in Rome.  I think the fact that they make their pasta fresh in the restaurant makes a huge difference. I've also had some of their other dishes, such as the bruschetta (as good as you can get in other places), and beef carpaccio (excellent!).  Also, if you're craving some meat, I highly recommend the veal.  There were two or three different veal dishes, so I forgot which one I tried (I think it has some cheese sauce), but it was awesome! The ambiance is very good, it's "nice" without being too stuffy or snobby.  It's always crowded though (for good reason), so always make a reservation, even for 2 people!  I've been to fancier and/or more expensive italian restaurants, but I always keep coming back to this one.  Definitely a must-try!
This place was ALRIGHT.... not bad but not exceptionally great. The price however was very decent.  Our group of five and a bottle of wine only came to a total of $100! I had the Carbonara. It was extremely oily and garlicy. I tried my friend creme sauce tortellini and that was better than the Carbonara I thought. you guys.. when your order comes.. its seriously a HUGE HEAP of pasta.  No veggies on the side or anything... so the price and portoin is decent.. food is decent... service was great. oh and yes this place is pretty packed.. make reservations.. and its really stuffy inside...
This place is hit or miss. The pasta is fresh which is awesome, but it can be inconsistent sometimes. I like my pasta a bit al dente, but I feel like the pasta there is always a bit over cooked. I would recommend the spinach pasta with shrimp. The papperdelle was a bit bland and not memorable. The veal with mushrooms is good, but wasn't so good the second time I was there. For appetizer, I enjoyed the polenta. We ordered the carpaccio and it was awful, stay away from it. The place needs some ventilation. It is quite warm all the time. I would recommend making reservations.
Very good. I think it's a high quality Italian restaurant. I give it three stars because it's just as good as most of the usual Italian places I visit. The food is fresh, the portions are ample, and the special salad is delicious! The prices are pretty standard ($13+ for pasta dishes, $8 for my basic salad). The atmosphere is nice, and the restaurant is ALWAYS packed. I visited this with a group of friends only after making a reservation. I ordered the Insalata Speciale and the Pappardelle Osteria. The pasta dish was supposed to be "spinach noodles".... I dunno where the spinach is. Perhaps they used microscopic quantities in the pasta? The noodles certainty didn't look any different. All of the other pastas that my friends ordered (one ordered the special Veal ravioli and another the penne fantasisa). The pastas were all good... but the all have the same basic tomato-based flavor.  The salad was great, but they put a little too much dressing for my liking. So... food taste: 4 stars (nothing like the crappy chain restaurants that are tasty but bad quality) service: 2-3 stars (meh) ambience: 3 (it's a-ok)
3.5 stars Osteria gets really packed for dinner, even on weekdays, so make reservations! My husband and I are super impressed by the speed of the service here.  After the waiter takes our order, the food is on our table in 5 MINUTES FLAT!  Thus, our growling stomachs are huge fans of this restaurant.  I've never seen this kind of speed at any other Italian place.  (Note: We didn't order appetizers - just a main pasta dish.  If you get appetizers/salad, you might not get the 5-minute phenomenon) Their pasta is fine - tastes good but isn't great in any sense.  My only complaint is that a lot of their pasta dishes don't come with meat - booooo.  One peculiarity: they literally just wrap your leftovers in foil (pasta in foil? who'da thunk?) and stick the foil ball in a paper bag - no takeout box.  I guess it's more environmentally friendly.
I wasn't really impressed. Made reservations which is good because it's not very big. Their house made pasta was OK, but I've had better. Going the lighter option way by ordering the grilled fish of the day was completely countered with veggies drowning in so much butter it started solidifying again. Don't get me wrong, I love butter, but this was overkill. I didn't feel our server was intending to pay any attention to us as if to assume his tip was automatic. Stopped by didn't ask if we wanted drinks just said he'd be back then when he returned he asked if we were ready and good to go...no starting with a drink or appetizer, just hurry and order everything so I can get my next table seated here. Food came out in a reasonable time, but really lacking in any type of service, this isn't Olive Garden so next time humor me with a little attentiveness, but not sure there will be a next time.
I really like Osteria. It's probably my favorite Italian place in Palo Alto. It can get pretty busy because it's a very small restaurant but it's worth the wait. The dishes come out in large portions that are also freshly made and hot. I've had the Tagliarini with shrimps, the Linguine con Vongole, and the Pappardelle Osteria. I love both the linguine and the pappardelle. You can taste how fresh their pasta is! I've also tried many of their appetizers and their veal entree is not bad...
The restaurant was good. Service was attentive in a non-invasive way, the waiters were helpful, the food was fresh, etc etc etc. This is an overall great Italian Restaurant, perfect for an early relaxed dinner in Palo Alto. One star off for putting me into a cheese-induced coma. I think EVERYTHING we ordered was first and foremost covered in cheese... For those of you who are into the "cheesy-gooey", this place is heaven.
Spinach ravioli w/ cream sauce was alright. Carpaccio just so so. My coworker had the veal which he said was better. Wouldn't go back though.
I finally made it to Osteria after having been to Cafe Pro Bono several times and wanting to compare the two, tomatoes to tomatoes. I made a reservation - and believe me, you'll want a reservation - and showed up about ten minutes early. They seated us immediately! Our server was attentive, courteous, and helpful, and we had no trouble ordering some dishes. Our appetizer - buffalo mozzarella on tomatoes - was delicious, as were the two mains - the gnocchi and a special dish, lamb medallions in demi-glace. But the execution came in an absence of inspiration, and the whole experience was unfulfilling. We left hungry, as the portions are just a bit undersized; plan on ordering salads and mains per person, as well as appetizers to share, when you eat here. I'd say that in just about every way, Cafe Pro Bono is better, but Osteria is still a pretty darn good restaurant. Just don't expect anything crazy.
This place is amazing. Italian people I know say that this is the only place in the local area they would be willing to eat at. The pastas are huge, generous portions and all their vegetables are nice and fresh. My boyfriend and I have become regulars. I've never been disappointed with anything I've ordered. The service is always really friendly, though admittedly a little rushed on Friday and Saturday nights - their busiest times (you'll definitely need a reservation if you want to eat here on either of these evenings). The lunch menus are a favourite of mine -- the pastas come at more reasonable prices and slightly smaller servings. For the quality of food you get here, I really don't understand why places like Pasta? round the corner are so popular... once you've eaten a plate of basic bolognese here and one anywhere else, you'll see why I (and many other friends) don't even bother at other Italian places anymore. There's a huge non-pasta selection, a decent wine list. Crowd is mixed with Palo Alto yuppies, families, and Stanford students looking to treat themselves.
I make reservation for candidates' lunches all the time here at Osteria but never been until recently when friends asked where I wanted to go for my birthday dinner - oh, yea definitely here (and free for me!)!!!  We didn't make reservations but luckily there was a cancellation so they squeeze us in - literally ... into the thinest table for 3 and my friend is a big guy! hahhahhahahhaa.  but the food was worth it!  SO good -- had the shrimp scampi dish filled with lots of garlic.  Had their beef carpaccio with union & capers was awesome.  Service was alright - they definitely try to rush you out of there.  I was trying to finish our bottle of wine but my friend felt bad that we were holding up their table (um, the waiter kept staring at our table!). Definitely make a reservation!
I will not return. We made reservations for 8:30 on Saturday night. We arrived exactly on time only to be told we would have at least a 10-15 minute wait. About 15 minutes later, someone comes out to tell us the table they were going to seat us at is still eating dessert. This is really poor management. Finally, they sit us at a table which would barely fit three people comfortably (there were 4 of us). Our water and bread does come very quickly. The bread is typical sourdough. Nothing about it was memorable. The waiter comes over and has no clue what personal space means whatsoever. I could see his pores when he spoke to me. We had to ask for the specials and then he asked for our choices. We were clearly not sure and yet he said nothing. Finally two ordered and two asked for recommendations. The waiter replied, well what you ordered is pretty good already. What?! Our table ordered some mozzarella and tomatoes to share. Neither great or fresh. We ordered the papperadelle, taglia-something-er-other and another name I can't remember. Basically, two spinach pastas dishes with prosciutto and tomato sauce. Once spinach pasta with cream sauce and shrimp. Once pasta with chicken and tomato cream sauce. The pastas were way over cooked. My pasta was so soft it was hard to eat. The chicken was dry. The shrimp clearly from a frozen bag. Nothing was good. Oh, we had to ask for wine twice. Then once our meal was cleared away, we had to ask for the dessert menu. We were hoping at least dessert was good. We ordered the chocolate volcano dish. You know the one where the middle should be molten ganache. The whole dessert was cooked all the way through and tasted like bad mushy brownie in the middle. The table itself was also in the worst possible place. Anytime the waiter or bus boy passed by my friends seat they hit her in the head with an elbow. It got a little ridiculous towards the end of the night. The only reason this place has 2 stars are the bus boys. They were so nice and attentive with our water and bread. Everyone and everything else was horrible.
I'm a regular here, but have recently moved away, and DAMN do I miss this place! Love the staff, as I know almost all of them from eating here regularly throughout the years, they're all so friendly and down to earth. They really treat customers like family. Food is just incredible. I must admit I have had a couple things like the flatened grilled chicken that was a bit bland. But who goes to an Italian restaurant for grilled chicken?? Stick with the pasta dishes - you can't go wrong. I've had many of them and they are definitely the most satisfying, authentic pasta dishes I've ever had (and I'm a foodie, I've covered a lot of ground in the food world).  ALSO, If you're down with lamb, they have the BEST lamb medallions in Marsala sauce. I don't normally even like lamb, but this is the best I've ever had. The veal scaloppine is exceptional with tons of delicious mushrooms!  Also, prices are excellent here, about $12 for a huge portion of quality, homemade, fresh pasta. ***Recommended dishes*** Appetizer: Carpaccio (out of this world good) Buffalo mozzarella, tomato, and basil w vinaigrette Dinner: lamb medallions (a special, not on the menu) halibut (also a special) Scaloppine Di Vitello All' Osteria  (veal scaloppine pretty much w mushrooms & artichokes) Tagliarini w/ shrimp (thin spinach pasta w light cream sauce, my favorite) Fettucine con porcini (w/ light tomato sauce, mushrooms and truffle oil) Penne fantasia (sun-dried tomatoes, asparagus, and chicken) tortellini al prosciutto - w/ cream sauce and peas (another favorite) Dessert: Flan brulee (the hazelnut and vanilla are both amazing) Tiramisu strawberries grand marnier Note: Yes this place gets packed for dinner, so arrive early, or late to ensure no wait.
Still amazingly wonderful and prices are not bad.  Noisy, but delicious.  Really delicious.
My fav. Italian place outside of Italy!  Everything I have had here is wonderful but what I always... Read more 
This place does get crowded, and it can be noisy, so just keep that in mind if you go. I usually try to get there before 6 PM to avoid any waiting. Their pastas are all fresh, and to die for. Every person whom I have taken here has been impressed. My favorite pastas are the pappardelle and the carbonera. I also really like their Mediteranneano shrimp and their beef carpaccio. Be sure to save room for their hazelnut flan for dessert!
Condescending and rude waitstaff but flawless fare gets Osteria three stars. Definitely get a reservation (even on Wednesday nights!). Food: -Mozzarella di Bufala con Pomodori ($7.50?) 2 large slices of meh-quality tomato topped with thick slices of fresh mozzarella are set between a delicious puddle of garlicky pesto (?) and shredded radicchio. No olive oil, though. 3.5/5 -Insalata Espeziale ($7.00) A bed of fresh butter lettuce is topped with shredded radicchio, pesto dressing, and a few endives. I really enjoyed this simple dish and felt the portion was just right. -Carpaccio ($9.00) Looks just like the picture some user already posted. Seemed very fresh and had plenty of toppings (red onion, a sauce, capers, lemon wedge...) -Penne Fantasia (~13.00) Fresh penne, chicken, and asparagus stalks in a tomato-based sauce. Got good reviews from my companion. Notes on service: Expect to be treated like an imbecile if you're under 30 and/or ask the waiter to repeat the special of the day. And don't ask if there's outdoor seating. There's not, and they will just proceed to scoff and seat you in the darkest corner of the restaurant.  Fun! ---after nom-nomming on aforementioned food...--- I got my credit card out to pay for the meal and set it on the table. The host at the front grabbed it and walked away to swipe it before I had even seen the check. When I asked for it back he acted affronted and was completely unapologetic. Weird.
Thank you Osteria for your amazing Papardelle.  I have missed it!  There aren't many things that make me want to come back to Palo Alto, but the Papardelle is high on the list.  Prices have gone up a bit since I was last there, but the pasta exceeded my expectation.  Grazie! Yes, this place is a little homely, and yes, it can be impossible to get into, but is home to one of the best pasta dishes I've ever had, the Parpadelle Osteria.  (I'm giving 5 stars on the merit of the food alone.)  The ribbons of pasta are homemade and delicately thin, but the perfect way to soak up the sauce.  Thinking about it always makes my mouth water...
Linguine con Vongole! Linguine con Vongole! Linguine con Vongole! Osteria's is the BEST italian restaurant I've ever been to. They have the best Linguine con Vongole (Linguine with clams), hands down. Their other stuff is good too. I refuse to eat at any other Italian restaurant if I am in the area. If I had the money, I'd buy their recipes. Just thinking about this restaurant makes me hungry for their food.
Osteria is the Italian restaurant of my choice.  I love their pastas and their appetizers ( especially the carpaccio) are great.  Unlike many pasta dishes at other Italian restaurants, which are mushy and bland, the pasta dishes here taste great.   I especially like their Angel Hair Pasta and Linguine with pesto sauce. The tables are a bit small for larger parties.   This place is always packed and crowded.  I would recommend making reservation to avoid a disappointingly long wait, especially at dinner time.
While Osteria is very competent at the Italian pasta that is their staple, I can't help but feel like I just ate something I could have whipped up at home (and I am NOT a good cook at all). Located one block away from University Ave, this downtown Palo Alto restaurant stakes its reputation as a no nonsense Italian destination. Unfortunately, that means that you'll be subjected to average food that will cause you to forget it the minute you step out the door. I came here in a large group, so I was able to view/sample many of dishes on display. The bread, while abundant, was not warm and there was no olive oil, just butter (a serious fail in my book). The dishes themselves, while of large portions, lacked that special flavor or bite that would leave you closing your eyes as the food was in your mouth. Altogether, I was not impressed at all, and I feel you can easily find better Italian at other places.
Is there a 0 star option? I just want to note that this is my first review on Yelp and that I felt compelled to write this review given how we were treated at this establishment. My gf and I went out on Friday night for a casual dinner. Decided to give Osteria a call to see if they had a seat. Guy on the phone said they had seats opening up and to come down. Then, asked for my name. When we showed up, we were told by the guy at the front to have a seat and that a table would open up shortly. As we waited, two other couples came in after us. They were seated shortly afterwards by some greasy looking dude. He didn't ask which party arrived first...just went ahead and sat the other two couples down. We brought this to the attention of the guy that initially greeted us and he seemed apologetic. He pointed to a table in the corner, near the kitchen. This was disappointing, since the other two parties that were sat ahead of us were sat in the main dining area. The greasy looking dude came by to ask us what the problem was and we explained to him what happened and expressed our displeasure with the service. He didn't seem apologetic, told us he was the guy on the phone we spoke with, and asked us what we wanted. We said an apology would be nice. He continued to go back and forth with us and asked if we had a reservation. I told him we did, and he argued we did not. WHY WOULD YOU ASK ME FOR MY NAME THEN?? As if not having a reservation would justify sitting down two parties ahead of us. I reminded him we were customers, and he responded by letting me know that he was the manager. DOES GOOD CUSTOMER SERVICE NOT APPLY TO THE MANAGER?? Obviously, we chose to leave at that point. The greasy guy (you'll excuse me if I fail to remember that he's the manager here) doesn't know when to shut up and has the nerve to respond by saying, "I think that's best." Really? YOU THINK IT'S BEST THAT YOU JUST LOST TWO CUSTOMERS FOREVER B/C OF YOUR OUTSIZED EGO?? I have a hard time thinking that the owner would agree.
A very mixed experienced here, which surprised me since it had been highly recommended. My overall impression: food good but not great, atmosphere a bit chaotic, and service strange. Here's what we ordered: *prosciutto and melon *pasta bolognese *tortellini w/prosciutto The food: The prosciutto was tasty and not overly salty, as can often be the case. The melon was fine as it should be, since how can you mess up melon? My tortellini dish came out quickly and was piping hot, and had a nicely textured cream sauce with peas that made it light and airy.  I tasted my companion's bolognese and the tomato sauce was tangy and had good layers of flavor. The atmosphere: rather chaotic considering it was early (before 6 pm), and there seemed to be a lot of fuss about where to seat people as crowds started to gather, even though it's a small place anyway. Speaking of seating, I found the chairs very uncomfortable, which is why I didn't order dessert...I needed to stand up! The host seemed intent on conversing with folks he already knew and making small talk with the kids, which was fine, but it was rather loud and dominated the whole place. Service: We seemed to have 3 waiters which was overkill, all of whom asked us a lot of the same things over again. My main complaint is that I was still eating when one waiter seemed to think I was finished, and when I asked him to wait, he didn't want to believe me.  Rather, he stood  by the table because apparently he thought I'd be done in the time he was still standing there. Totally not relaxing and not what you want when you're eating out. Will probably not go back, they are friendlier and the atmosphere is better at Il Fornio and, for that matter, Olive Garden. Also a little surprised that at that price point, the bread was not heated.
I'm finally at the end of my California posts, and it finishes with our first meal: Friday lunch in Palo Alto at Osteria. It was the four of us grabbing lunch before driving into city. Osteria is a small, neighborhood, Italian spot in down town PA. We had a very nice meal, complete with fresh pasta, salads and bubbly. Erica and I split a very good Caesar salad. The greens were california fresh, the croutons made in-house, and the dressing did not overwhelm. It was a very nice salad, plenty large to share. The pastas were also made in-house, and it showed. The noodles were tender and fresh, very well made. My complaint though wasn't with the pasta, it was with the sauces on both dishes. Erica ordered a pesto pasta and I choose a marinara with pork. The first issue was quantity, there wasn't enough sauce for all the delicious noodles on the plate. But more sauce would not have changed the fact that neither dish's sauce contained enough flavor. Alyssa ordered a a fried calamari steak that was probably the best dish at the table. I've never seen a fried calamari steak before. All in all it was a nice lunch and a good way to start our weekend. The champagne was tasty and we loved our salads. The fresh pasta was great, but the sauces need some work. It's a bit fancy and I think pricey, but a fun location and good vibe for a neighborhood Italian spot.
I was so excited when I heard that my friend made a reservation at this restaurant for her birthday. I've been wanting to dine here but never did (heard lots of raving reviews about this place). I was the first person arrived for our party and when I checked in at the front desk, a mid-aged man (I think he's the owner) was not friendly at all. He didn't even look at me (or say anything) and pointed his finger to speak to a younger man that happened to be the hostess. I thought that was very rude! My party was late and while waiting, I realized that the restaurant was so popular. They turned down a lot of customers who did not make reservations, or if they did get a table the hostess told them that they could only stay for an hour..interesting. As we were dining, I could also tell that the restaurant expected all guests to order, dine and leave immediately as soon as they finish eating.. that's a bit rude I think.. especially since it's an Italian restaurant, not a chinese fast food joint! The food was ok! I like the desserts that we ordered (Hazelnut creme brulee was amazing and the Fresh Strawberries and rasberries with custard were delicious). The appetizer (Mozzarela and tomatoes) was also very fresh and yummy. I did not like my entree..I thought it was BORING! The waiter recommended the special of the day, beef shank in tomato sauce. It's like a beef stew and served with brown rice. The flavor was just so so and it wasn't something that I would usually order in a fancy Italian restaurant. I tasted my friend's shrimp pasta and I thought it was pretty good, darn!! I should have sticked with pasta!!! The birthday friend got the Veal cooked with asparagus and mushroom, it was just ok and the portion was tiny (lots of mushroom and veggie, but not enough veal). The other friend got their special too but it was the grilled salmon. I didn't taste it, but I thought the salmon looked very dry. The prices were pretty reasonable ($14-$20 for an entree, not bad).. I thought we would have to pay more, but this is definitely not as great as I was expecting..but possibly because I didn't order the correct item on the menu. I will give the place another try in the near future but will order their pasta dish (on the menu they said they are freshly made) and hope that I'll have a better dining experience. In general though, I agree with most people that said everyone is so snotty! BTW, the mid-aged man (the owner) came to our table to refill our water, he spilled (a lot until the table cloth was drenched) and DID NOT ACKNOWLEDGE OR SAY SORRY, very weird!!
Shockingly rude behavior by the host. We had a nice meal and a wonderful waiter but as our party of six chatted after our meal and after paying an expensive bill, the "host" came over and told us to move on as there were many people waiting for a table.   We were all dumbfounded as such behavior would be shocking at any restaurant but was even more unbelievable at an expensive restaurant such as this.
Good food. Portion small. Setting nice. Prices normal for palo alto, $10-$15 for lunch.
Yes, I'm a fan. Haven't been there in a while... but boy is it good.  It's excellent Italian food served up in a comfortable environment. Not prissy stuff here. My favorite is their pasta fantasia.
Strong 4 stars. We came for lunch. On the outside, this looks like your average semi-formal oldschool Italian restaurant. Their secret is their pasta, all of it made fresh and cooked al dente. Our group had: - spaghetti carbonara, which had juicy pancetta and a delicious wine sauce - the special of the day, cannelloni with delicious linguica inside - tagliarini with shrimp, shrimp were a bit small but that did not harm the overall quality of the dish. Now if they were bigger, that would be the pasta dish of the gods, but oh well. - calamari steak We also shared a carpaccio ($8) between the four of us and it was very good; I was actually surprised at how much meat you got for $8. A comparable dish in an Italian restaurant in the city would have run about $12 to $15. However, I think the service of the carpaccio needs a bit of improvement - they put onions in one lump on top of the meat, capers in another lump, and a glob of mayo in the middle. This is all good except when you need to eat the last, mayo-soaked piece. Some people are into that, me, not so much. When I eat raw beef, I want to taste beef, not mayo. :) This place might be one of the best deals in famously overpriced Palo Alto. Not that it's dirt cheap, but it's cheaper than similarly nice places and they really give you bang for your buck with generous portions and fresh ingredients all around.
I like this place and not only because its where I went to dinner with my girlfriend for the first time... but that helps A LOT The food is simple Italian.  The pasta is good, not over sauced, not over embellished.   The prices are good and the portions are standard, not Bucco Di Beppo dinosaur portions but not tiny either. If you are looking for Olive Garden style "Giant pasta shells stuffed with our Italian three cheese and shrimp blend, smothered in our special mushroom, sage, Marsala sauce... developed high in the mountains of norther Italy at our exclusive and magical chef training facility"... you won't find it here, and if you do like that then you'll love this great Chinese place i know of called Panda Express. Anyway, its good, its simple and its priced right. Maybe make reservations if you are goign later in the evening when it gets crowded.
I have been in this classic Italian place twice, but have had lots of take home also. One of the best experiences, which made me fall in love with pasta for the first time. I was served by a wonderful lady Marta who was happy and playful. We had eggplant parmesan which was so yummy. The spinach salad is simple but  the best. Overall it is a great place for a special date night.
When I first moved to the south bay I had a friend from Maryland who came to visit because he was in California for  school. During Thanksgiving, it was too expensive for him to fly home and I decided to work overtime (2x pay!). On Thanksgiving day we wandered around downtown PA looking for dinner. We saw the doors to Osteria were open, so preceded inside to see if they were still serving. Turns out they were having a family (20+ people) get together and the restaurant was actually closed. Instead of turning us away, they invited us in and we ended up having wine and dinner with the family. How's that for a first impression of a restaurant? I haven't been here in a while now but this also used to be a staple of the Italian ex-gf and mine.  Tiny, cozy restaurant with a small but tasty menu. Service has always been friendly and attentive. It indeed can be too crowded at times but that's reflection of providing solid food and service. I'd say for a better experience going during the week and avoid the over hyped weekend crowds.
I like the homemade pasta and the Italian waiters. We can usually get in and reservations are easy. We like the gnocci and any pasta. Setting is cute and can be romantic although loud at times. The dessert is good, too. Haven't been there in a little while so I don't remember what my fav. treat of theirs is.
Definitely my favorite Italian place in this area. It can be a little pricey, but it's downtown Palo Alto, what do you expect? Plus, the portion sizes are pretty generous, so you will definitely leave with a satisfied belly (and, in my case, a doggy bag of leftovers!) My favorite dish is the Penne Fantasia. It has chicken, asparagus, sundried tomatoes, and a light creamy-ish sauce. The saltiness of the sundried tomatoes is nicely balanced by the milder sauce and simple chicken. And the asparagus is soft, but still crunchy-- just the way I like it! Other dishes I've tried are Gnocchi alla Lucchesse (I'm probably spelling it wrong, but you get the point). The gnocchi was very chewy and soft. The Penne Bolognese was pretty good, too. I can't remember what else was at the table, but whenever I come here with people, everyone is happy with their food. One thing, though, is that they don't have regular sodas like Coke or Pepsi. They have Italian sodas, ice tea, and ice coffee for a whopping $3 or sparking water for $4.50. Yeah, I'm sticking with my water. The atmosphere is very cozy and sweet, and the waiters were pretty friendly for the most part. This place is always full around lunch and dinner, so I try to go after the lunch rush (plus, my grumbling belly makes the food taste all the more delicious) or for an early dinner. Basically, try this place if you like Italian food (or even if you don't!)!!
I think people have to realize this isn't Bucca di Beppo (however you spell it) nor is it a Cheescake Factory. This is pretty close to authentic Italian as you're going to get in the area. Yes, this also means authentic Italian service which people seem to nail in previous reviews. The interior is also very Italian. It can be cramped and loud, but it makes for an unmatchable atmosphere that makes the food taste very Italiano. "Yay! I'm a fan." The food is very very good and the prices aren't Palo Alto, surprisingly. It's also very consistent and this is hard to come by these days. I always recommend the daily specials and their selection of wine is actually pretty decent. They also have a good dessert menu and good desert tastes, but I was scolded once for going only for desserts... this is a no-no unless you're friendly with the staff and come in at the right time before closing. If you haven't been here, please give it a try over Buca mi Boobies or Cheesefake.
Update. Stopped by with my parents at around 9PM on Monday night - the place was pretty empty, which was a welcome change. The hostess was busy chatting with her friend to notice that she actually had to seat people - great. Upon sitting, I saw that one of the only tables in my line of sight consisted of an older couple. Not that I have anything against older people (unless I'm out clubbing), but the guy was holding onto her hand the whole time and periodically sucking on it. It wasn't even the romantic type of angle where they're both sitting up staring into each other's eyes - he just looked like he was blowing the table. Fascinating. Anyway, we all decided to try the lamb special (MR unless you ask otherwise) and some type of shrimp pasta dish. The lamb was properly cooked and flavorful, very surprising. Veggies on the side were very buttery. The pasta wasn't as flavorful but the two foods complemented each other nicely. Tiramisu desert was above average. Overall, much better experience than my previous visits.
I've only been here a handful of times, but overrated still comes to mind. Maybe you'll get lucky... Read more 
This is one of those few places in Palo Alto where you actually get what you pay for. I've been coming here for several years, and Osteria has never failed to disappoint. The pasta entrees here are amazing as well as their starter courses (I have always had success with their carpaccio and spinach salad). And for a reasonable price of about $30 per person, you can have an amazing meal. The wine list is rather slim, but you can easily manage that by bringing your own wine. I'm not quite sure what the corkage fee is since every single time I've brought my own wine someone else would pick up the tab, but I think it's definitely more economical than purchasing from their wine list. The service here is definitely friendly when compared to all the other restaurants in the near vicinity. There are several things that you need to prepare yourself for if you decide to eat here though. Waiting time - you should definitely make reservations and still plan on having a short wait unless those reservations are for an early or late dinner (I've never had to deal with crowds for dinners before 6:30 PM and after 9 PM). The seating is slightly cramped, but they manage to make the setting work. And although the atmosphere feels a bit classy, since it is near the heart of Silicon Valley, you can feel comfortable wearing simple clothes (e.g. jeans and a t-shirt or polo shirt) and not some of the fancy shmancy clothes that some people do wear here. If nothing changes (which it hasn't for the past few years), you can still find me here for plenty  more years to come.
A downtown Palo Alto classic! Years and years ago I used to work just a few doors down from Osteria which was how I came to discover it on a lunch time outing. On the one hand, it was fabulous to have a great place so close for a great lunch. On the other hand, its proximity was dangerous on many other levels, namely my wallet and waistline. How can a carb-addict in good standing like me resist walking a few doors over on most days and getting a plate of warm pasta and fresh bread for lunch or an early dinner? Memories of post-lunch food comas aside, the food and service was always great and the ambiance was always cozy and warm. A few memorable plates that come to mind even now are the fondo di carciofo (artichoke bottom with shrimp), the minestrone soup, the Caesar salad (with or without anchovies), the tortellini al prosciutto in a yummy cream sauce with peas, the pappardelle with prosciutto and mushrooms, the melanzana (eggplant parmesan), and the calamari steak. To be honest, I never ordered a meat or chicken dish because I couldn't pry myself away from the pasta. But there is definitely one thing that will always stand out my in mind when thinking of Osteria - the hazelnut (gianduja) flan. Oh sweet hazelnut flan. Imagine a cool, luscious flan meets a jar of Nutella, but better. The flan can be shared if you want to be modest and settle for a bite or two. If you have no shame, go ahead and have one for yourself. Can you think of a better dinner than fresh-made pasta, good wine, and ending with hazelnut-chocolatey goodness? You can make amends with your trainer or your conscience on another day.
Visited on 8/8/09. Small restaurant, so make reservations if you can.  They do fit as many tables as they can into the small space. Food is good, nothing spectacular.  I had a caesar salad and the spinach noodles with prosciutto, tomatoes and mushrooms.  Reminded me of chow fun.  I think it was about $13 for the pasta and I got a good sized portion.  They make their own salad dressings which are good. Our waiter was a little bit of a spaz.  Running all over the place, sweating.  Always in a hurry.  None of the other waiters were like that.... It was about 85 degrees outside and it was hot inside the restaurant as well.  It certainly made the dining experience moderately uncomfortable.
The food quality here has really gone down.  Calamari steak is tough and the vegetables on the plate are cold.  Always crowded which is nice if you like the energy but not so nice if you want to hear yourself.  Also, the service is spotty at best--they don't keep the water glasses refilled.  Because of the reasonable prices, this used to be a reasonably choice for eating in Palo Alto.  No longer.
The wine is excellent and the calamari is delish!!! Highly recommend this place:)
My boyfriend and I always marveled at how good this restaurant smelled and how popular it looked every Tuesday night as we were walking to trivia at the Rose & Crown. So, Valentine's Day rolled around and the weekend afterwards we had our V-day dinner here, after I checked Yelp for its pedigree, natch. :) Even though I made reservations ahead of time, we still waited a good 20 minutes for a seat, which we didn't mind too much and was kinda understandable, given that it was a Friday night. Food-wise, we had the mozzarella and tomato for a starter, which was good. Then I had spinach pasta with garlic and prosciutto and he had some ravioli. Both were pretty good, and we had plenty of leftovers. The dessert was awesome - a hazelnut-chocolate flan. YUMMM. I think I preferred my recent birthday dinner at Cafe pro Bono to this meal - less cramped restaurant and much more mellow vibe, but that's just personal preference. I can see how some would enjoy this place's atmosphere just fine. Overall a good experience.
I didn't expect much, but got a lot. I didn't like being seated in the corner or the tile floors (I felt like I was in a bathroom, we sat near the window where the food comes out on the Ramona side). But the service was great. The guy in the front with the glasses always greets every patron with a smile and is very enthusiastic and attentive. Our waitress was an older lady with lots of energy. The prosciutto and melon was ok. Lots of meat, not enough melon. The artichoke and shrimp appetizer was pretty good. The sauce is tangy - their version of salsa I suppose. The Osteria Pappardelle is really delicious. It was REALLY good! The noodles were like Chinese chow fun noodles but thinner and they didn't stick together. And picked up a lot of the tomato and mushroom sauce. Would come back.  Very soon.
I like Osteria! The atmosphere reminds me of the 90s, which isn't necessarily bad. :) Plus, I've had excellent dishes: shrimp pasta and I think some sort of chicken or fish entree (that doesn't appear to be on the menu anymore). Sometimes I haven't been too impressed with the place either, though. We had a rather cranky waiter once, and often it's just too busy. Despite the bad times, I still like eating here. :)
I came here for a firm lunch so it was your normal business lunch crowd. Service was friendly. Food was fantastic. The desserts are amazing.
A quaint, cozy, Italian restaurant nestled in the heart of downtown Palo Alto. I personally think the food is excellent! Not your average Buca Di Beppo, Olive Garden, Macaroni Grill, chain of restaurants.  You're paying for quality, not quantity. Although, portions are suffice. As for the service, this isn't a restaurant where you dine and cut out.  I would only come here if you are at your leisure.  The service was slow.  Expect to kick it for a hot minute if dining for two.  I think it's the food preparation that slows things down and that's a-ok with me if the food comes out tasty!  It's also best to make reservations - especially for dinner.  I like the fact that this place has a mixed crowd! I don't recommend this place for groups, especially loud groups!  Good for couples or for a family of 4. Just go here without having any expectations.  You'll enjoy it better!
When my friends and I are in the mood for fluffy airy gnocchis and veal piccatas in PA - we go to this quintessential Italian restaurant!  There's always a warm atmosphere- the hostess ever so gracious... Also I love their hearts of palm salad and yes- my favorite- freshly baked bread! distruggere poco a poco!!!
A good, but not great Italian restaurant in downtown Palo Alto. The service was lacking, with long pauses throughout dinner.
Aggregate of 3.5 stars is right on the mark.  I'll give four stars because I had a pleasant meal and really had nothing to complain about. Enjoyed a very slick appetizer of raddichio leaves graced with the presence of gorgonzola--spread the gorgonzola, wrap it up, and voila.  Pretty tasty.  Not to mention pleasant to look at. I'm a sucker for spaghetti carbonara and I'm always amazed how different it tastes at different establishments.  Osteria's version was very good, with a heavy emphasis on olive oil.  If I go back I probably won't be able to avoid ordering it again. I stole just a bite of my buddy's cheesecake.  That sounds wrong and, to some extent, lewd.  Anyway, it was solid and very traditional, just how I love it most.  No fancy Oreo crust, not smothered in berries.  Backed by a mellow cappuccino, it was a nice end to an enjoyable meal.
I think this place is just great. I haven't been to Osteria in probably 10 years, but it was like I was just in there yesterday. The place was still packed, the stangely amusingly abusive host was still there, the wine list was still brief, but wonderful - and the pasta was outta this world. Northern Italian goodness. The friend I went with lives in the area, but had never been -- I think he's going back. Had to deal with the standard b**ls**t Palo Alto parking situation - which I had mercifully forgotten about - but the food made me forget about the road rage pretty quickly. ...weird driving by my ex-father-in-law's house, though.
How could this good an Italian restaurant be hidden in the heart of Silicon Valley? We're talking old school.... the veal is fresh, the pasta is homemade, and the 60 year-old accented waiter looks at you a little funny when you ask for a diet coke with lunch. This place is the real deal, meaning what it lacks in cool is more than made up for with fresh ingredients, authentic preparation, and a kind of homey-ness that makes you want to be a regular. Listen to the specials, and if nothing catches your ear have the polenta and then the veal. And for God's sake, don't be a mamalook, and have a glass of wine with your lunch. 'Medigan.
The veal saltimbocca and scampi were good, as was the antipasta.  The prices were also fair, but the service was very rushed.  We had to hold onto our plates twice as the server tried to take them away well before we were finished. This is definitely a step up from good cheap places like Pasta?, and is much better than the Niebaum-Coppola place a block over. The decor is nice but is quite cramped.  I almost knocked down a painting on my way back from the mens' room as they really pack the people in. Anyway, I'll be back.
They don't have iced or blended espresso drinks. Caesar salad - tasty with FRESH garlic croutons Chicken Parmesan - nice thin tender and tasty with fresh green beans and carrots Hazelnut Flan - I guess I like hazelnut now - it's that good Cheese cake with raspberry sauce - good Cappuccino - fine Service - ok
I found this place to be quite charming.  Make sure you make a reservation though.  My boyfriend and I were lucky to get a table on a Monday night!!  It was 9PM and still packed!! Also, bring your appetite..... they practically give you an entire loaf of bread when you arrive! Overall the perfect date spot!!!
This is probably one of the best Italian restaurants in the Bay Area.  It can be crowded, and it's probably best served for smaller groups or dates, and the wine list is pretty lacking, but focusing strictly on the food, it's pretty unbelievable. Osteria is a little far from me, so I usually go to Pastaria in Los Gatos, but I think Osteria has a much better menu.  Pastaria, in my opinion, is strictly a pasta joint whereas Osteria has a better selection.  They've got more appetizers, more salads, more pastas, and more meat and fish dishes.   I spent like 10 minutes figuring out what I wanted to eat. I had carpaccio, a radachio/endive and gorgonzola salad, and linguine and clams with a tomato sauce (my standard).  It wasn't done the way I'm used to, I prefer chunks of tomato and a somewhat lighter tomato sauce, but it was still excellent. Did I mention the portions are gigantic?  For the money, Osteria beats out Pastaria.  If it wasn't so far from me, this is where I'd go.
Hmmm..how can I give this a fair review if I think I ordered the wrong thing? But then again all the dishes on the menu should be good at a great restaurant. Their pasta is great- from what I tasted from my friend's Penne with Chicken and Tomato Cream Sauce.  It was cooked perfectly al dente, had nice tender chunks of chicken, and the sauce was delicious and creamy.  But I ordered the Grilled Swordfish- it came with sauteed carrots and green beans...very ordinary and loaded with butter. The swordfish was cooked well but just kind of boring. Their house salad was also surprisingly good--beautiful butter lettuce pieces and a great tasting green vinaigrette. Bread- plain sourdough, not warm :( If I had ordered my friend's pasta dish I would have given Osteria 4 stars. Their service is fabulous- friendly, warm, funny and makes you feel like you're in a family-owned restaurant. Come here for a comfortable (slightly cramped though), warm, family atmosphere, great pasta (I'd skip the swordfish), and great service.
I was intrigued by the Tuscan cuisine and real Italian pietanze but it was just fine. I ate "Tagliolini verdi con gamberetti" and they were pretty good. However my colleagues took a Carbonara and a porcini mashroom pasta and they did not taste so good to me. I was good with what I got but probably not all the entree on the menu are good.
Here's the problem with Osteria: the food, while reliably delicious, is often overshadowed by their unpredictable customer service. My family has frequented Osteria for over ten years now, long enough to get to know the management and the wait staff very well. The newer employees don't seem too interested in fostering that kind of relationship with the regular patrons, an aspect of the Osteria experience I've always considered quite charming and fitting for the intimate atmosphere. Yes, that might seem cliquey and intimidating for new diners, but hey, the regulars keep a business on its feet during slower times of the year and a little special treatment goes a long way. And that's one of the things that I always loved about Osteria: that it feels like coming home to family. That delicious first meal, the friendly faces, the familiar surroundings... It was always a pleasure to return to the Bay Ara and pay the staff at Osteria a visit. Over the past few years the wait staff I came to know and love have made their exits, a steady series of departures that I suspect were inspired by the manager, who rarely (and thankfully, given his unpredictably rude manner of interacting with employees and patrons alike) makes an appearance anymore. The food, however, is wonderful, hands down the best Italian food I have tasted in the Bay Area -- and that is, after all, what we're here to Yelp about. (Based on the culinary delights alone, my review of this place is a healthy 5 stars. Alas, making a disgruntled patron out of a faithful patron is not the wisest of business moves, especially when public star-ratings are involved.) Be sure to make a reservation, because the place is packed every night of the week -- so packed, in fact, that couples hoping for a table at 6:00 PM are frequently told that the next available opening won't be until after 9:00. Plan your visit in advance!
GOSH! I ATE LIKE A PIG! Nice and cozy, old fashon Italian restaurant, it seems like I went back home! I had the Carpaccio, good but... (i'm a little spoiled, I know!) The Carbonara was HUGE! I could not have a dessert after finishing it! Go check it out, if you want to taste a fairly authentic Italian flavor at a reasonable price
I wanted to order Fettuccine Con Porcini E Tartufi (fresh pasta with porcini mushrooms and truffle oil), but was told this came with tomato sauce, which I'm not a fan of. The waiter asked if I would like to substitute the tomato sauce with white wine sauce. Delighted, I say yes. My delight quickly dissipated when the dish came. The pasta was grotesquely overcooked. The mushrooms were mushy. The sauce was bland in a garlicky kinda way. It was unpleasant, almost to the point of unpalatable. But contrary to quite a number of reviews highlighting bad or rude service, both our waiter and host were nice. We were there on Monday night, which seemed to be a slow night. Maybe that was why they could afford good service.
What can I say - I've been a "regular" for over 12 years. I love it. The pasta is fresh, the service is almost always excellent and the overall food preparation and presentation is top-notch. Oh and you gotta love a restaurant that will mix-and-match whatever is on the menu for you - talk about allowing substitutions! My current fave is the calamari steak. Oh and the tiramisu is pretty damned good too but my FAVOURITE dessert is the strawberries with the sour cream/grand mariner sauce - try it and if it's not FABULOUS I'll pay you back! Luv & Hugs and happy dining!
feel this place is maybe overrated! It's so crowded, the service is so slow, the food is, all right, taste not bad, but not that special neither! However, I have to come back every couple month. Why? because I love their chocolate lava cake. That's really one of the best I had in this area.  The cake has a crispy shell, filled with rich dark chocolate liquid .The cake is always served pretty hot. On the side, is the vanilla ice cream. Yammi! Because of this, I will come back again and again, tolerate their bad service + crowd atomosphere.
I've driven by here for years and finally made it inside for a meal. This is definitely a no-frills italian restaurant. The food was so delicious! We started with a bay shrimp/hearts of palm/artichoke starter and polenta covered in a sweet tomato mushroom ragu - not to mention the huge chunk of sourdough bread they gave us to sop up the yummy sauce. The petrale sole was great - my cousins ordered the pasta and I kinda wished my fish had come with some pasta. The pasta itself looked very fresh and very tasty. For dessert we shared a tiramisu that apparently spent the holidays soaking in rum - it sure packed a punch! I'd definitely come back. Lunchtime wasn't too crowded - so I'd probably come back then.
Cute, cozy, italian restaurant where you get served by cute, old italian men (almost made me feel like i'm back in italia). This place gets REALLY crowded during dinner so i HIGHLY recommend making a reservation. We made reservation, and end up still waiting for an extra 20 minutes before getting seated (apparently the ppl at our table decided to chat it up after paying they bill and just wouldn't leave). This is why i have to bump the place down from 4 stars to 3. However, the hostess was apologetic, so that was nice. If you love mozzarella, get their imported buffalo mozzarella as your appetizer, SO good. Another must is there molten lava cake in the dessert section. SAVE ROOM for it, you won't regret it :]
After a failed attempt to watch a movie. We decided to head across the bridge over to PA and grab some Italian. We got here at 7 and had to wait till 8 for a table. We Had the Mozzarella Di Bufala con Pomdori, the tomato was just ok, but the cheese was very good. PARMA PROSCIUTTO E MELONE, this was also very good, i had to ask for more bread so I could get every bit of that sause. Main Entree:  TAGLIARINI VERDI CON GAMBERETTI, the spinach pasta with shrimp and garlic cream sause.  I forgot how hot the plates are when this came out.  OMG, the plate was almost as hot as my date for the evening.  (haha) Anyhow, This dish is always very good one of my favorites here. Food here is excellant, while the service may be lacking based on your appearance / age.  This place definitely hits the spot, just expect to wait in line if you do not have a reservation.
We ate out at various restaurants in the area for our 15 day visit to Palo Alto while helping our son set up an apartment for grad school. The four of us went back to Osteria 3 times during our visit and for Italian nothing else came close to the piping hot, full of flavor meals that we ate here. Our family has been eating Italian food around the globe for years, from the North End in Boston (haven't found a restaurant there that was as tasty as Osteria) to Italian restaurants overseas some were equally great but  s lot more money.   Go to Osteria you won't be sorry. The Linguine Con Vongole  fresh tomatoes and clams  is the best I've ever had (I wish I was eating it now).  My son and his girlfriend eat here once or twice a week, and they are college students, that's how reasonably priced the menu is.  My husband said the Spaghettini Carbonara pancetta, cream and garlic was his favorite, full of flavor and the best he's had anywhere, he had my son pick up and order and fly it cross country when he came to visit this Christmas for his Italian Family to try!  My sons favorite is the Gnocchi Alla Lucchese, and his girls favorite is the   Fettuccine Con Porcini E Tartufi  fresh pasta with porcini mushrooms and truffle oil. I would have liked to try some of the other dishes on the menu but I couldn't get past the clam sauce for fear I'd never get back the West Coast again I ordered it every time. The clams are so small and tender and the sauce is full of flavor.  The pasta on all our dishes is cooked perfectly to order every time.  It was never overdone or underdone which is a quite the challenge for other restaurants in the area to get right every time. Since my son is living there they have tried many of the nightly specials and other items of the menu and I've heard week after week how wonderful the food is and the service and the staff are all friendly and extremely efficient from the time you sit until you leave.  He said the Spumoni is his favorite. dessert, so tasty!   I think he does make reservations though because it does get very busy. After writing this..... I think my son is going to have visitors sooner than he thinks, Osteria  is worth the trip from Cape Cod to California!
Tried this restaurant a few times, by far it is the most authentic Italian restaurant I can find in the Bay Area (not include SF). I am not Italian, but I just traveled to Italy last year, and love the food so much. I can't really find one good Italian restaurant in the Bay Area, you will never find me eating at Olive Garden. Osteria is more home cook family style Italian restaurant. Most of the dishes are good, sometimes exceptionally good. When comes to dessert, it definitely depends who is the 'dessert chef' of that day. That can get a little inconsistent. Once in a while, it is pretty good, but NOT always! Overall, I would give it a 3.5 stars, but given the price performance factor, 4 stars is good to go! I would like it better if the restaurant can be roomier and they need to improve their 'service'. The service is no so good anymore!! Happy Eats!
I had a mixed experience here. We came for lunch and ordered: the carpaccio appetizer, a mushroom/veal+carrots/asparagus plate, and a seafood pasta. The carpaccio was awesome. It came with incredibly thin slices of tender beef topped with capers and aioli.  I'd definitely get this dish again. My veal dish was excellent. Decadent and rich with bold and earthy flavors. The veggies could've benefited from less butter, but I wasn't complaining (although my heart might've been). The seafood pasta was also delicious, until we discovered a hair in it! The hair ruined my girlfriend's appetite, which was unfortunate because the pasta was scrumptious! We were pleased with the restaurant's response - our waiter apologized and took the plate back and asked us what we would like done. We requested that there be no replacement and that it be taken off the bill, to which they obliged. If it weren't for that hair I would give this place 5 stars.
I'll start by raving about their pasta-- absolutely delicious.  The fettucine w/ porcini and truffle oil is perfect.  Great for vegetarians and the mushrooms are just fragrant.  My friends get the lamb medallions and spinach pasta everytime we go-- I've had a taste and would recommend.  I love the zabaione dessert but it's offered on weekends only. My only pet peeve is that the servers clear your table before everyone is finished eating.  I wonder what is their rationale.  There's got to be one- either culturally or for the aim of getting us out faster so they can get more ppl in.  Either way, it's not particular to the waiter as it's happened to me multiple times.  I'm a slow eater so I don't appreciate this. Needless, it's not enough to keep me from coming back.  Love the food.
Fresh, tasty pasta. Piping hot. Wonderful service. Did I mention piping hot? Just about all I need from an Italian restaurant. (and the carpaccio is fantastic) (so is the tiramisu)
Look how many positive reviews there are for this restaurant.  Well deserved too! This is Italian food like my Nonna cooked.  It's always dicey (pun!) for me when tasting Italian food, I want it to be just so, not too much of this, plenty of that.  I was soooooo happy the first time I ate here!  (lunch) I've dined here for dinner plenty of times and curiously, they always find a seat for us within a few minutes of arriving, regardless of our lack of reservations. The wait staff is fantastic, friendly and consistent.  They know many of the patrons and it's a warm atmosphere while enjoying the fantastic food. We've tried many items on the menu, and believe me, you can expect the best tastes and presentations, whatever you choose!
The Linguine Vongole white sauce is by far the best that I've had in all my travels. A great cozy little Italian Restaurant that I always take clients to for dinner. The Carpaccio, Prosciutto Melon, and Calamari Steak is to die for. All in All I must say the food is excellent, however the service is tolerable. If they had some extra space it may be a little more comfortable to eat here... Not ideal for large parties...
One of the better Italian restaurants in the area.  It's a super popular place so make them reservations!  The waitresses and waiters there are real nice!  I haven't encountered the snooty attitudes I've been reading about... Anyway, you can't go wrong with their food.  The poached salmon is really really good.  People think salmon and tomato sauce?  YES!  Try it.  And the eggplant is really good too.  I always have a hard time debating between the two- also, the spinach as a side!  YUMMY.
I went here on a Saturday night without a reservation. The place was packed and all the waiters/maitre'd were extremely busy. That said, they were able to find a table for me and served the food promptly. I wouldn't anticipate being so lucky normally, but their help is a testament to the quality of service. The food was outstanding. I had tortellini with meat sauce (can't remember the menu item name). The pasta was a little softer than I normally like it, but overall it was a good meal. Highly recommend you take someone that you like here. Just make sure you have a reservation.
Delicious!!! I went there last night and am still thinking about the meal!  I had the polenta appetizer, the tortellini with prosciutto, and the chocolate hazelnut flan and it was one of the best meals of my life!  The polenta appetizer had the most delicious tomato and mushroom sauce over the most delightfully crisp crusted polenta deliciousity. The tortellini was fabulous and the hazelnut flan was orgasmic!!!! - and this is coming from someone who doesn't exactly like chocolate. It looked pretty packed in there but luckily we got there right before the dinner rush. I would definitely recommend reservations in the future though. Although it looked like a lot of families (not necessarily those with children) I would still say it would be a great laid back but impressive date place in downtown Palo Alto.
Super delicious Italian, the first place in a long time where I wasn't disappointed by the lack of favor or texture of the pasta. I was deciding on a couple of pasta dishes and the waiter helped me choose the penne fantasia. Boy am I glad he did. It was a multi-layered party of flavors in my mouth, but not too salty or overwhelming. The homemade pasta was cooked perfectly, chicken was soft, and the asparagus and sun-dried tomatoes added just the right amount of taste and texture in the mix. My bf ordered the tortellini al prosciutto, stuffed with veal. He loved it too and he's the pickiest eater ever. We were lucky to be seated right away on Memorial Day. The last time we tried on a Friday night on a whim, it was an hr wait so we went someplace else. The service was great, we got our dishes within 10 min (pretty damn fast) and the host was really welcoming even though we weren't dressed for the restaurant (in hiking clothes). We will definitely come again to try other dishes on the menu.
Had dinner here on a Friday evening --- Ordered the special of the day 1. Halibut 2. Lamb Both dishes are good and in a good portion --- where you still have room to taste the wine =) I'll come back again to try the pasta!
One of the best Italian restaurants in the Bay Area. pros-pasta and appetizers are great.  My personal fave is the carpaccio and the Pappardelle Osteria. cons-small and crowded creating a noisy ambiance and you may find yourself budded up to the next table so minus 1 star.  also parking's a bitch but that's typical for that area of PA on a Saturday night.
Just okay.  The food was good, but maybe a little overpriced for what you get. Interestingly, as great as a lot of food in Palo Alto is...I haven't found an Italian place worth frequenting.  Weird.
I was literally dragged to this Italian restaurant by a group of friends, most of whom were Italian.  I must admit, this is not the kind of Italian restaurants I would choose in first place, since the menu looks rather ordinary to me, but ok, you never know ... I opted for homemade fettuccine with wild mushrooms and truffle: it was nothing more than average. In particular, the sauce was tomato-based: I have never heard of a tomato based sauce with truffle (???) and, if any truffle was present, its fine flavour had been completely overwhelmed by the tomato.  What a pity! Add to this that the pasta was slightly overcooked. Other remark: (not-homemade-but-good) bread served with butter.  Guys, come on! no olive oil? Ok, in Italy restaurants usually serve just bread, without any olive oil or butter (exceptions exist, though), but it's undoubtful that a good bread and a good olive oil can always make an excellent match (I do actually like this Italian-American habit). But leave the bread & butter to French Bistros or Belgian restaurants, please. Note: my gf's dish, namely eggplants topped with mozzarella, spinach and tomato, looked and tasted great. Desserts summary: 1- my tiramisu was soft and creamy, maybe even too much: the mascarpone was undistinguishable from actual cream (the latter doesn't in fact belong to the original recipe); 2- the gianduja flan that I strongly recommended to a friend (I had the sensation it could have been good) was indeed awesome. My Roget Champagne was excellent and the Italian waiter was very friendly, but maybe a bit overworked: I asked the olive oil an he told me where they buy the bread every morning :-D Conclusion: truly Italian restaurant, but an average one with some peaks of excellence.
I usually look at Yelp and say, hey there are 300 reviews of this restaurant, why do I need to write one.   On the whole, the smart reviewers balance out the stupid ones and you get a good even handed overview. Sometimes, however, there is just too much idiocy.   Thus, I break out my keyboard. First, I will give you my review, then I will tell you specifically where others have gone wrong, because  the wankers who run yelp don't let you comment in-line on other people's stupid reviews. I have traveled in Italy and eaten in 3 star Michelin restaurants (yes, a real rating system only needs 3, not 5 like yelp).    I have also eaten in many typical "osteria" there, and the Osteria in Palo Alto is a shining example of what an osteria should be, and exceptional not just for the U.S. but even in Italy. What is an osteria?  It is a small, usually family run establishment, with a close, communal atmosphere, often shared tables, and you get food that is excellent and fills you up without emptying your pocket; something that your Italian mother might make.   It is not french haute cuisine with small portions you taste a little at a time, it is not california fusion cuisine that explodes your palate, it is food with history and done well and it is a place with people who remember you because you have been there  many times before. In all these respects (except perhaps the communal tables), the Osteria in Palo Alto excels.    What astonishes me, is that more people around here do not appreciate these things. There are two things I get here I cannot get elsewhere: -- excellent pasta served piping hot  (do you know how hard it is to keep food really hot in the restaurant business?) with my choice from an excellent wine list -- waitstaff that remembers the regulars, and who actually have experience waiting tables and who are over the age of 25.  If they treat you bad, it is because you deserve it. You should go, order the pasta, a nice glass of wine, and be happy. The veal isn't bad either, and I've always been satisfied with anything I've ordered here.  :) Just like in Italy, if you are going to go, it is best to make a reservation.    People in Italy expect you to make a reservation anytime you go to a restaurant, not just show up like in the U.S.   I mean come on, it is an osteria -- you are basically going to someone's house, call before you go! If you go on a friday or saturday night, don't expect to get seated right away, or at all if you don't have a reservation.  If they are busy, or it takes a while for someone to get to you, realize that it will be much much less than the time you would have had to wait in Italy.   Or to fly to Italy. Unlike Italy, you can order take-out here.  If you can't stand the waitstaff (the feeling is probably mutual), don't deprive yourself of the cooking. Ok, on to the stupid yelpers, I've limited myself to year 2010 1 star posters with exceptional stupidity, but I reserve the right to update my review at anytime: Lily S.  -- actually complained that her entree coming out in 5 minutes was an attempt to "rush" her, and is obviously paranoid when other people look at her. Grace A. -- was surprised that the waiters at this restaurant were not her slaves.   Needs someone to yell at her more regularly. CL. -- thinks that they deserve to take up a table forever at a busy restaurant without buying anything.  Must think they are at a coffee house. Vanessa C.  -- first says the restaurant was busy, but that they seated her right away.  Then, knowing that she is sitting in a busy restaurant, is mad that the waiter takes a while to come over.  Doesn't know how spinach sugo is supposed to be made, and probably didn't eat it with the pasta like you are supposed to. Matthew K.  -- Admits he hasn't tried the food, and uses the word "Tool" to describe a human being, need I say more?
This place is always hopping! We were able to get in without a reservation on a Friday night within 30 minutes. It smelled so delicious, we had to stay! Yes, watching the owner/manager dole out some wine to his favorites made us feel a little less special, but it really didn't take away from our evening. We got a nice bottle of wine when we sat down and some scrumptious parma prosciutto e melone with some fresh lemon. We also got the gorgonzola e pane -- I love cheese and this gorgonzola was so strong I had to cut about half the cheese off. The linguine con vongole was yummy - so many little clams. The gnocchi was also good. Love fresh pasta!
The Osteria is my favorite restaurant in the Bay Area.  The food is fantastic and very reasonably priced.  Pasta is where these guys really shine but everything on the menu is very good.  Furthermore, I don't think any of the entrees are more than $14.50 and that includes a number of great dishes with chicken or veal.  Oh and one secret insider tip... order their coffee it is the outstanding.  If The Osteria was a coffee shop, I'd never step foot in University Cafe of Coupa Cafe, which are both great in their own right. There is something to the complaints about the service at the Osteria.  There can be long waits on Friday and Saturday nights but my simple solution is to eat there on Wednesday or Thursday.  The remarks about the severs are only really true of 1-2 people and while these guys are gruff they aren't rude.  Most of the folks who work their are very friendly and quite good at providing attentive but not intrusive service.
Great value for the money.  Our group ordered 1 appetizer, 4 entrees, and 2 desserts for a total bill of ~$80 and we were stuffed and had enough leftovers for one person's lunch. We ordered: - Buffalo mozzarella appetizer with tomato, basil, and pesto sauce - the best buffalo mozzarella I've had in the U.S., though it obviously is not as good as the stuff I had in Capri, Italy.  What distinguishes this buffalo mozzarella from the stuff that's sold across the U.S. is that the texture is spongy and not elasticky, like a rubber ball.  Though, as stated, it is still not as good as the ones in Italy that are more porous throughout rather than porous in shreds. - Eggplant entree with tomato, spinach, and mozzarella - Wow!  The dish retained the integrity of the individual ingredients so beautifully while producing a fresh and wonderful combination of flavors.  It is difficult to cook every ingredient to its individual perfection, but this dish accomplishes just that.  The spinach, so often wilted, clumped together, and overcooked in other lasagna-type concoctions, was just at that state of converting from crispness to tenderness.  The tomatoes were saucy enough to lend moisture to the dish, but yet retained its individual composition enough to pick up in forkfuls.  The mozzarella was just the right amount to add a touch of creaminess to the dish.  This was, by far, my favorite entree of the evening. Fettuccine with bay shrimp, garlic, and cream sauce - Unexpectedly light and full of strong garlic flavor, a delicious dish that incorporates just the right sauce to pasta ratio. Pasta carbonara - Good dish, though a bit greasy for my taste.  To be fair, this is traditionally a very heavy pasta entree comprised of butter, eggs, cheese, and bacon, but I would have expected Osteria to have done a lighter take on it. Veal with mushrooms, peapods, and carrots - The vegetables were all done nicely, very tender and buttery, but the veal was a disappointment - tough and dry. Hazelnut brulee - A very interesting dessert that I have never seen at any other restaurant.  It is actually more like hazelnut flan, drizzled with chocolate sauce and a very light caramel sauce.  The combination of flavors was quite good.  I actually would not have liked the flan without the sauce because it tastes VERY strongly of hazelnut to the point where it was overwhelming for my palate. I also had a refreshing glass of lemon soda that I really enjoyed.  It may have just been San Pellegrino, but it definitely hit the spot.  It was sparkling lemon goodness without being overly syrupy or sweet. Overall, this experience was highly enjoyable.  There were a few dishes that fell short of expectation, but for the price, the quantity, and the stellar quality of some of the food, this was a truly worthwhile experience.
Good food and service for a reasonable price - not too many places  in Palo Alto can say yes to all three, especially the Reasonable Price part. Despite other reviews, we had excellent service. Coming at 6:30 on a Tuesday night the place was 80% full, but they seated us without a reservation immediately.  Our waiter was right there with the specials (turns out they were Salmon and Halibut).  He recommended a good red wine by the glass and took our order when ready and constantly was there when we needed him.  Salad of Spinach with Pine Nuts and Feta was great and delivered quickly.  My wife had the Halibut and it was good.  I had the Porcini Mushroom and Oil Pasta with Tomato sauce which a previous reviewer did not like and thought it was good, but not great.  Actually too much for me, but a big appetite would love it for only $13.  When we were ready to go, our check was there quick as was the credit card payment. All in all a perfect experience for what we wanted.  Nice atmosphere, though crowded and not plush.  Good food quickly delivered at a reasonable price and friendly good service.
I'm not sure why people love this place so much - perhaps I need to go during dinner and not lunch. My colleague and both had Veal dishes and they were pretty forgettable.  Veal was of average quality and the service was average. If you go in with no expectations, I don't think you'll be disappointed, but if you go by some of the raving yelp reviews, I'm pretty certain you'll leave unimpressed...
I'm Italian and grew up on Italian food, and I think the food at Osteria is really yummy! I like Osteria better than Bella Luna.  I need to return to Cafe Pro Bono to decide if I like that or Osteria better. Mangiamo!
went there for lunch today. To me, it is a decent lunch place with reasonable price. The bread was good, but somehow they served butter with ice in it. A little bit weird to me. The noodle is very fresh as I can tell, and they put just right amount of sauce. I ordered Pappardelle Osteria, and it tasted pretty good for a lunch pasta. If you are a heavy meat lover or expecting something spectacular, you probably will be disappointed. But it is definitely a good lunch place around Palo Alto
I've been here several times now and usually the place is packed. If you make a reservation, don't expect to necessarily eat promptly. I'm going to have to agree with the past 2 reviewers (Mabelle A. and Stuart R.) on this one. It's good Italian food, but it's not GREAT Italian food. The service is decent, don't expect miles of smiles or anything. They basically just get the job done politely. They make the pasta there and you can taste the freshness. I think that is what makes it popular. Still, I haven't had a dish there yet where I just HAD to come back to eat it again. Restaurant Ideale in North Beach edges it out in my humble opinion. If you are going to dine in Palo Alto, I say pay a little more and go for a memorable meal at Evvia. Your reservation will get you in there more promptly if you have somewhere to be and the food is quite memorable.
We live in Palo Alto and we always wondered why there's always a line. So many people wanna eat there. So reserved a table. The food was ok but too expensive. Don't know why the people are waiting for that restaurant. I think it's not worth the money. Know better restaurants. Specially on University Ave which is close by.
The best food and friendliest service in Palo Alto.  Every meal I have ever had over the last 14 years has been fabulous!
So the reviews on here had me skeptical to come, but I am so glad I tried it.  The food was *excellent*. The service was a bit on the curt side, but they were busy and I was hungry, so I didn't mind.  They may have been brusque but my water glass never had less than an inch missing my whole meal.  I had called ahead and made a reservation but I don't think we needed to at the time we went (8pm on a Monday) it was beginning to empty out as we were eating our salads.   I had a caesar salad that was excellent, and the veal with spinach and cheese, and let me just say, wow.  The veal was perfectly cooked, the spinach was delicious, and there was a perfect amount of cheese for me (I do love cheese).   My only disappointment on the consumable side is that they only serve wine and beer, no liquor.
This place is the best Italian Restaurant in Palo Alto. The food is homemade and delicious! The veal saltimbocca is one of my favorites, as well as any pasta dish on the menu. We've celebrated many birthdays there and the staff is always helpful when we decorate the tables with confetti and flowers. We also bring in a cake from Prolific Oven and they are never upset that we didn't get their dessert. They're always gracious. I hate how the restaurant closes every July, but I just hope it's because the staff has gone to Italy to vacation and learn to make more GREAT food!
Osteria is all about food, don't wish for fancy atmosphere nor attentive service . They reminded me of those Italian restaurants on the streets when I was in Rome. Their pasta is always at the right temperature (cheese would just melt... yummy...). They also serve Spaghetti alla Carbonara (no egg, no cream - just olive oil, pancetta, black peppers and cheese), it's different from most restaurant. It's hard to find Carbonara w/o any cream in america!!! I keep going back for their lunch! Great place for authentic Italian food!
If you like great homemade pasta, you can't beat Osteria.  Traveling through Italy and haven't found pasta better. I have been coming here since they opened, starting with dates with my now husband -20 yrs.  My first meal after my kids were born was a plate of parpadella smuggled into the hospital. Waiters are friendly in a gruff kind of NY way.  Great bus service - never run out of bread or water! Best Items: ravoili and parpadella. Minus:  Noisy with tables close together but is a plus if you like the energy that comes with it!
Overall I give it 2.5 stars. I thought the food was ok and heavy, though, (*disclaimer*) Italian is not my favorite.  Our server was impatient and rushed, which was awkward in this small, intimate Italian setting.  It was annoying, though the manager was friendly and helpful. For an appetizer, a group of 8 shared the 2 dishes of the ALFREDO pasta (3.5 stars).  It is a very good Alfredo sauce, which I normally don't like.  It has a dash of nutmeg, which gives it a unique taste.  They make all of their pasta in house too, so even though I'm not into pasta, I thought it was good.  For dinner, I had the GREEN BUTTER LETTUCE SALAD (3 stars).  Very good.  The dressing is delicious and the salad fresh.  I also had the VEAL SCALLOPINE (2 stars), which came covered in mushrooms and artichoke hearts.  I thought is was ok.  The veal could have been more tender and the sides of green beans and carrots (standard on every main dish) were covered in butter/oil and I mean seriously layered - worse than tanning in the 80s.  I never thought veggies could require a Lipitor.
Cute Italian place that is cozy and intimate. Apparently, it is fairly hard to get into, but we happened to come by in a lull and got in immediately. Bread brought out immediately and some fairly healthy lower carb options if you don't feel like indulging in pastas. I recommend the Petto Di Pollo Paillard (flattened chicken over some tasty grilled spinach) and the halibut or sole for fish dishes. All of these have some fairly buttery sauces, so you can only get so healthy :)
This is my fav Italian place when I don't want to leave palo alto mt view area, pastas are always really good  and made from scratch. The service is a little inconsistent, ie they don't even try to hide the fact that they seat people out of order when a regular comes in. I would recommend reservations but even that may mean you have to wait.
I am always on the lookout for good Italian.  This place has great pasta- for sure.  Best I've had in the South Bay.  I used to live in Rome and it is very difficult for me to find Italian food that doesn't taste overwhelmingly American (a certain mass-produced flavor).  This place totally hit the mark with both food and wine- unpretentious and damn good.  I wasn't into the bread at all- it was shockingly mediocre when compared to the deliciousness of the homemade pastas.  The service was very awkward and weird, but technically flawless.  The host was not very nice at all- by far the coolest and nicest people working here were the busboys/guys who fill the water glasses.  Still four stars cause I KNOW I will be back for more delicious Italian food.
4 of us decided to get an early dinner on a Monday night before strolling over to see Roman Holiday at The Stanford Theater. We made a 6 pm reservation; the restaurant was almost vacant but the greeter proceeds to seat us at the worst table in the restaurant, by the bathrooms. Of course I objected and requested a round table by the window. Why do restaurants do this? Note to restaurant staff: Save those tables for those that *didn't* make reservations! Anyway, I loved my pasta vongole. Very flavorful red sauce with a kick of red peppers, garlic and lots of clams. One of the best versions I've had and for dessert, the hazelnut flan is a winner. Absolutely delicious. I'll definitely be back to try more and just make sure you have a reservation as it was packed by 7pm.
Osteria is my favorite Italian restaurant, and there's a reason it has a lively, always-crowded atmosphere.  They have amazing food, a wonderful, friendly staff, and great service! My S.O. and I have been going to Osteria for years.  It's "our" place, and we love it! We were going off a friend's recommendation the first time we went, and we were not disappointed.  The pasta was fresh, the cooking was creative, and the food was delicious.  We went back, again and again, because of the food. Also, we were students when we started becoming regulars, and Osteria is reasonably priced for the Bay Area and Palo Alto.  It's not cheap but it is reasonable and the portions, especially if you order a non-stuffed pasta dish, are more than generous. We came back so much that the servers got to know us.  They know exactly how we like everything, and always make sure everything is just so.  They are friendly, courteous, and attentive. By the way, try the spaghettini carbonara.  It's my favorite, and it's amazing!
Okay. right off the bat, italian food is hard to get wrong.  Keep the pasta marginally chewy, moist and bouncy, and the sauce rich and flavorful  and you usually have something good going on.  The base flavors are usually not too complex, garlic, basil, wine, rosemary, thyme, sage, pumpernickel, oregano, parmesan/romano, onions, and tomato. And all the combinations between them usually produce relatively similar flavors. Osteria isn't bad.  It's a standard italian place which serves standard italian food.  They have some good carpaccio paired with melon.  Other than that, theres not much creativity going on.  But you know what? that's alright by me.  Sometimes too much creativity = gross flavors.  So osteria gets a solid 3.  Not amazing, but not bad either.
Have been here 2x.  Once at least 4 years ago for lunching with my classmates.  And then a little over a month ago for dinner with a bunch of veg heads.  Needless to say this place bangs out consistency - how often can you really say that?  Best part - ordering the cheese tortellini with bolognese after being the one to offer up the idea of sharing plates to my non-meat eating pals.  (Couldn't resist it and glad I didn't.)  Also the spinach salad seems so simple but was divine and the house Chianti and fresh bread are not to be missed.
I had a terrible experience at Osteria.  In my opinion the food is mediocre and  the service is horrendous at best.  We sat down and within 5 minutes and  the waitress was on us to order.  She gave us exactly 60 seconds before she came back again to ask us what we wanted. I ordered and no joke my entree came out in 5 minutes time.  I thought well this is nice and then realized the point was to get us in and out in ASAP. From the time we sat down to the time we left it was a total of 45 minutes and that's only because I took my time eating and drinking my coffee. They did try to get us out quicker by slowly taking things off our table one by one and giving us piercing stares.  If only the food were good it might have made up for the horrible service.
The food was great, fresh, and fast, but it feels like an Italian restaurant dumbed down for America.  Given that the majority of our nation is fat, because we have no sense of what good food is...Osteria is nice, but that's it, just nice.  Not orgasmic.  Not something worth writing home about.  But if you want to try something new that's not that expensive, come here.  Else, I'd try Pasta?  No seriously though.
This place used to be the family go-to Italian restaurant: good food at good prices.  However, I was disappointed by my visit yesterday, particular in light of the many past years of good food. We had the Linguine Vongole (clam), the Papardelle osteria, the green salad, and two desserts.  The clam linguine was good as usual, but the papardelle was radically different from what I was used to.  The desserts were okay.  The green salad (and the dressing!!) was good as always.
I give this place 4.5 stars. It's one of my favorite Italian restaurants in the bay area with many loyal customers crowding up the entrance. I usually end up ordering the same items - carpaccio and linguini bongole with wine. For a restaurant in Palo Alto, the prices are fairly reasonable. Warm  and romantic environment (though it can get a bit claustrophobic) and decent service. Can't wait to go back!
We went there for a department luncheon almost two years ago. The food tasted fine. The dining experience was about average. Nothing to complain about. After we returned to our respective desks, all but two people started feeling sick, wiping out nearly our entire department for half a day. What sucked for me was that I had to take the local train from Palo Alto to Millbrae, which meant walking to train station + waiting for train + train ride = throwing up every ten steps to car + hours of misery = second (hopefully, last) food poisoning of my life.
This is my absolute favorite place for pasta in the bay area! I don't know why the ratings are so low.   I love their fresh pasta, and I haven't found any other place that has comparable pasta.  Their sauces are always excellent and never too heavy. You can't go wrong with the Pappardelle Osteria pasta.
Food was excellent, really kind of a gem in Palo Alto. Prices aren't too bad either. The only big complaint I have is that the one time I went there, we had reservations and we waited for over an hour just to get seated. The entire time we were waiting, about 20 old Italian people in various groups walked in, greeted the waiters and owners like they were the Corleones in the Godfather, and then were immediately seated in the obviously empty tables. The waiter did his best to pretend like we were the very next table, but it didn't take a rocket scientist to figure out that the owners basically hooked up their friends, and everyone else has to wait. I guess I can't complain though, my grandpa used to hook it up at Chinese restaurants all the time.
I never knew that any restaurants in sleepy downtown Palo Alto can get this busy on a weeknight.  After all, this ain't Manhattan and with the exception of a select few (myself included) people eat their home-cooked dinners Mo-Fr, or sometimes Th. But it doesn't seem to be the case at Osteria, so I discover the Wednesday evening I went there for a long overdue reunion / b!tchfest session.  At 7.30, people were loitering outside of the entrance and there was not one empty table inside.  Thankfully one of us were in the know enough to reserve in advance, and we were seated in no time. Perusing through the menu, I saw the usual antipasti, zuppa *minestrone - what else* and insalate, as well as other non-pasta entrees.  While I was tempted to try the veal saltimbocca, my friends kept raving about the fresh made-on-the-premise pasta so I felt compelled to try linguine con vongole (linguine with clams and tomato).  Another dish of note was tagliarini verdi con gamberetti (thin spinach pasta with cream and prawns).  We washed it down with a bottle of amazing Italian pinot gris (I know, I know.  To all you wine snobs out there - I don't care if this varietal sits on the bottom of the rung.  It tasted good and that's all I cared about). To be perfectly honest I'm not sophisticated enough to tell the difference between fresh and pre-made packaged pasta, and am never a big fan of Italian food in the U.S. (non-touristy Italian food in Rome, on the other hand, is another story), so while I found the pasta reasonably yummy, I don't think it would ever make it to my list of occasional comfort food cravings.
I've been going here for years and my wife has been coming here since childhood. Though the tables are way too close for comfort, the food is excellent and comes served on the hottest plates around. I know you're not supposed to eat veal, but the lemon veal is my favorite and carpaccio is off the hook. From a value standpoint it can't be beat. The waiters are friendly too. You should try it if you haven't been there yet.
I don't understand why this place is always packed. It's very loud and NOT romantic. I made a reservation a week in advance and we got seated immediately (not a bad first impression). Cold bread arrived shortly after that, but the waitress took her time. Once she finally addressed us, she had an attitude. When asked for the wine recommendation, she recommended the most expensive one. Who does that? We've been to far fancier restaurants than Osteria and have never been recommended the most expensive wine. The food was bland, but maybe we didn't order the "right thing", but there shouldn't be the right thing if the restaurant is good. I only ate a third of my pasta and politely asked to get the rest to go. My pasta was wrapped in foil. Thanks a lot!
I have been hearing about this cute Italian joint for the past two years from my lovely roommate, Vivian. She definitely built up my expectations, describing their fresh and delicious pasta, made with only the best and freshest ingredients. I was so excited to finally try out Osteria this past weekend, and it was absolutely, hands down, wonderful. I attended a gathering for a friend's birthday, and although we had a large group of nearly 20, the staff was very accomodating and extremely fast! I ordered the spaghettini alla carbonara, and it was amazing. The pasta was cooked perfectly and was piping hot. Vivian later told me that they make their pasta fresh everyday, and I believe it. The sauce was so creamy, yet not too overwhelmingly rich. The bits of bacon were so yummy. I tried other dishes as well, including the spinach ravioli, spinach linguine, and the gnocchi, all of which were very flavorful. This had to be the best Italian food I've ever enjoyed. I got a sneak preview and a small taste of their dessert as well with the "doppio." It's a rich, satisfying chocolate dessert. It's hard to desribe, but just think of a flow of chocolate lava, and you've got the idea. I would definitely recommend trying out Osteria, and I guarantee that once you try it, you'll be dying to go back, as am I! :]
Osteria has been around for a long time in Palo Alto, outlasting the many restaurant changes in the area for a reason. The italian food is very good. It has a nothern Italian flavor to its dishes, focusing more on veal and pastas rather than pizza and other more americanized faire popular in newer establishments. We came late on Saturday (about 9:30pm) and did not have to wait for a table. (Actually, nobody in Italy eats dinner before 9pm!) The Carpaccio (thinly sliced raw beef) was excellent, although they served it with chopped red onions and a butter/mustard aioli (my guess) with the tradtional capers, with only a small dash of fresh ground peppers and olive oil. I prefer mine with dry parmesan flakes and more pepper and olive oil to go with the lemon wedges and capers, and without the aoili, to make a great mixture of flavors and textures. Their interpretation reminded me more of Lox, but it was good!  The Tomato Slices and Mozzarella Buffalo with mint leaves was excellent. Both of these dishes creates a great antipasta intro to your main meal without filling you up, and that is why I love them. The Fettucini con Portabello was served piping hot in a tasty tomato and mushroom sauce, and the Linguini Pesto was simple and light, not overdone with olive oil to make it too rich to eat. Both were served in good sized portions. The wine list is ok, but the wine by the glass selections are limited. The total for 2 appetizers, 2 pasta dishes, and 2 glasses of wine plus tax was $66, so this is pretty reasonable for a nice place. The service was excellent, as we had one of the older Italian waiters, who chirped "Si", "Grazie" and "Prego" to our requests, giving a little more authentic feel to our pleasant and satisfying dining experience.
I went here on my department's tab and I still didn't enjoy my experience. I ordered Polenta with mushrooms and tomato sauce as an appetizer and it was a huge mushy mess. Polenta when it is done well is not a mushy mess, btw. Not only that but the waitress chastised me for not finishing the food on my plate. The main dish was adequate, but so unmemorable that all I remember was that I didn't hate it. I had strawberries with cream for dessert, and that cream came right out of a can. We had a large party, and the wait staff couldn't wait to get us out of there and they let us know it. All in all, I wouldn't go back there even if the food was free again, and that is a lot to say.
I had the shrimp pasta here.  The shrimp was TINY.  And the flavor was just bla.  Bf got the chicken pasta.  It was alright, but nothing special.
Delicious food for a reasonable price? Yes!
Osteria is a solid cozy Italian joint, maybe the best of its kind in the area.  The space is just a little snug, the servers are friendly, and the chefs make their own pasta.  The pasta is quite, quite good.  I've tried the pappardelle Osteria, which are wide flat spinach noodles with prosciutto, mushrooms, and tomato sauce, and the penne fantasia, which comes with chicken, sun-dried tomato, asparagus, and garlic.  Osteria also does a decent Caesar salad and an artichoke and shrimp appetizer that's juicy and simply delicious.  I haven't had any meals here that I would describe to my mother over the telephone, but like I said, it's a solid spot.
Is this what a diner in Italy would look like??? I knew the decor/ambience was not going to be much based on the reviews but expected more from the food. It was average to below average. I tried the mozzarella and tomato salad. It was two dollops of cheese on 2 thick slices of tomato with some green sauce. Next! I ordered pasta with chicken (Pasta Fantasia) which was very bland and just missing flavor overall. The saving grace was the Hazelnut Flan which was pretty good but it was too little too late. I ain't going back. No flame emails please but I would rather go to Olive Garden.
The two words for this restaurant are Fast & Cozy. Let''s explain, but I will to it fast. My time is cramped. Just like this place. Talk abour overrated. So I went here for lunch today. It was my first time, but I have heard goood things about this place. As I understand the situation, it is impossible to get in here for dinner. I do not understand that. The way we had lunch I would think they can turn over 20 tables per evening. They way they set up this restaurant it reminded me of the 4 train leaving Yankee Stadium after a Red Sox game. Table for 2 sat 6, Tables for 1, sat 3 and so on and so forth, Newton. So there goes cozy. As for fast. Wowsie woosie. We had three main dishes. A salmon, a chicken, a pasta. It came through in 5 minutes from ordering. Maybe Iran had their nuclear reactor in the kitchen as the fish flew in from being nuked. My god. We had bread, main dishes and an espresso and that 100 meter man Bolt would have lost his world record by the speed on this place. Bing, bang boom and we were out of there. Now, I will say this, the fellow I ate with wolfed his pasta down hsi throat faster than gravity. I am still strying to figure that out. As for the food. I would say fair at best. I think my salmon was frozen. My buds chicken looked dry and the pasta was raved about by my other bud. So there is goes. Bread was solid and plenty of butter. The price for this experience was cheap so if you put it that way, assume and hours worth of time and it food 10 minutes to eat, they make $300 per table per hour. Maybe that is how they judge it. For me. Mediocre food, done too quickly and in super cramped conditions. Two stars for you and no bread.
On this not so busy night we were able to get a table in about 20 minutes.  Our server a not so friendly gentlemen provided us with some bread and announced the specials for the day. We ordered some wine which he thought smelt a bit corky, he was right, so we returned the wine and got something else. The food was okay, I had the spinach ravioli. I think the most upsetting part of the evening was at the end when we decided to split the tab amongst ourselves providing 4 credit cards. The first waiter who attempted to pick up the tray, walked away not knowing what to do with 4 credit cards. The owner/manager came up to tells us this: "I usually only accept two credit cards but your waiter insisted I take the cards so treat him nicely."  I have never ever heard anything like this before. If you are not going to accept the cards just say so dont do us or anyone any favors and ask for a tip in return. Ofcoruse I was going to tip the server, I didnt need to be reminded. We all walked away very disappointed.
Went here last week for my Mom's birthday and I was NOT impressed.  We had to wait about 20 minutes to sit down even though we had a reservation and our whole party of 13 was on time.  The service was sloppy and rushed...I got bumped in the arm 2 times without anyone saying excuse me and yet somehow I was the one apologizing.  Not to mention when they brought out the birthday cake they didn't even have the candles lit AND they asked who's birthday it was when it was obviously my Mom who was wearing a big birthday pin.  By the way, where did the fresh strawberries from on top of the cake go??  They definitely weren't on any of our slices of cake.  The food wasn't bad....average.  Apparently the poached salmon was really good but I didn't get to try it.  I don't think I'll be going back here again.
This place is just your typical italian restaurant. The food was good as was the service. The one thing that stood out was that they didn't have AC (might of been broken) they day I visited and its was over 100 degrees outside. This definitely made my meal very unenjoyable.
Love the staff here and the food tops even that. My favorite dish here is the vegetarian polenta. The Cabernet Sauvignon we had along with our pesto gnocchi was the perfect combination. The ambience is very cozy and European and the crowd is classy. Definitely a great date place.
One of the best Italian restaurants I have been to, very traditional. The food like the service there is quite exceptional. Signature dishes has to be the calimari steaks pan-fried with butter sauce and veal and prosciuto roll. The veal and vegetables were slightly overcooked but the taste was amazing with the great sauce. Get reservations cause this place fills up fast.
If yelp had negative stars, this restaurant would receive a -5.  Without any hesitation, I can firmly say that I cannot recall any moment or dinning experience that I've had where the service of a restaurant has completely turned me off from their food.  And from seconds of walking inside, we were greeted with the most disingenuous and discourteous service imaginable.  I do want to point out that the credit and responsibility for such an unforgettable experience shouldn't solely be placed on the rude young hostess or the unmannerly waiter who appeared to have been forced to serve us, but also to myself, for being accepting of such appalling and misdirected service.
great service, delicious food, cozy ambiance -- what else could you ask for?! i love love love this italian place in downtown PA. i highly recommend the grilled chicken breast with spinach and carrots. SO GOOD! this place gets packed so definitely make reservations or enjoy an early bird dinner (before 6pm)!
I went back to Osteria for lunch a few weeks ago, and it was not as good as the first time.  I had the tagliarini verdi con gamberetti (thin pasta with shrimp and cream sauce), and the pasta was overcooked.  The gnocchi alla lucchesse (gnocchi with house tomato sauce) was very dense.  I also tried some of the spaghettini carbonara, which was a bit rich for me.  Portion sizes were still big enough for two meals.
Amid a sea of overpriced, mediocre food in downtown Palo Alto is Osteria, which offers reasonably... Read more 
Over the last 7 years, we have been customers at Osteria.  But not after this evening's experience of extremely rude behavior by one of the regular wait staff. Although we made a proper reservation, the nice hostess seated us at a location where our baby's stroller would not disturb other diners or the waiters' path, and our assigned waitress was prompt and courteous, another regular wait staff who was not even assigned to our table service immediately criticized us for bringing our stroller (note that the table behind us had two babies, one of which also had a stroller). When our daughter squealed, the same rude wait staff subsequently approached our table and remarked: do you know that this is a restaurant? Never have we experienced such horrible customer service, even at a McDonald's.  Osteria may be a longstanding restaurant in Palo Alto, but it's not a family friendly restaurant and its rude wait staff needs to be fired. This restaurant deserves 0 stars.
this place was packed on a fri night.  the clientele is mainly families, so it's not necessarily a place for you to come for a date.  i got a ceasar salad to start and the linguini w/ clams, and my husband got the capellini pomodoro.  he loves peas and asked our server if he could just get a side of peas sauteed w/ garlic, and the waiter sounded perplexed but obliged.  then he thought sounded rather good and wanted to eat that himself. the portions here are huge, so we had enuf to take home.  the food was fine but nothing too exciting.  we liked the bread that came w/ the meal, but the butter that came w/ the bread was ice cold and actually even sitting in some water.  they should at least be able to warm up the butter.
I agree with the guy who asked if there was a .5 star rating. Let me first divulge that in all my foodie experiences in NYC, Boston, Italy, France, etc. I have never eaten at a restaurant with service as bad as Osteria.  There were four of us dining (imagine, a special birthday celebration) and we had dinner that amounted to a five-course meal plus wine. Not cheap. Not only did the wait staff insist we hurry up and pay because other people were waiting for a table, but the manager agreed with them and didn't try to appease us. We were there less than 2 hours. I understand the practice of turning tables, but not in this supposed fine dining establishment. Other people waiting for a table who observed this left the restaurant and told us they would never go there again. I suppose the food was good though the poor service left me with such a bad taste in my mouth that I can't tell you of anything that was spectacular. Don't wait for the bad servers to be fired, they've been there for years. This place has always been noted for poor service and many locals will tell you this.
I'm Italian, so if I go to an Italian Restaurant, I hope it will taste almost as good as my Mom's cooking, but I never expect too much. If I order something, it's got to be something that I can't get right myself.  Tried a few pasta/ravioli dishes and they were good, not great, same with the veal. But once I ordered the Gnocchi, I got hooked on them......they are light, fluffy and tender, the way they should be. I order them with 1/2 white Alfredo sauce and 1/2 Bolognese. As good, if not better than my mom's. I understand the owner's wife makes them herself.  The Carpaccio is the best and presented nicely. The sauteed spinach is excellent . Service is good.  Reservations should be made - it gets very busy and loud in there and stuffy too.
We've been here 3-4 times. Very crowded. Forgetaboutit on a Friday night or when Stanford gears up for whatever. I can't complain about the food but I always get the same thing. My b/f had good and "eh" experiences with the gnocchi and another pasta dish. Service was fine...they always seem really friendly. The ambiance is on the loud side because it is always so crowded. And if you have a crying toddler or baby...its louder still. I know that's not their fault. The artwork on the wall is big, ghastly and overwhelming for the size of the room. But, now I'm getting picky..
We used to frequent Osteria whenever our out of town friends wanted to try more authentic Italian fare.  They never disappoint with the freshly made pasta and simple, but truly delicious dishes. Last time we went our friends brought their two babies in tow and all the service staff were so nice to them...it's sometimes hard to know how kids will be welcome in cozy restaurant, but they were wonderful!
Why does this place get so many good reviews??  The food tasted like it was made 3 days in advance and slopped together in the microwave before arriving to our table.  We had the linguine with clams and a stuffed veal thing - both did not taste fresh.  I seriously don't get why this place is always so packed.   I have absolutely no desire to return...I'd rather eat some spaghetti with a bottle of Prego.
I went to Osteria today for lunch. Not bad. I was told that I have gone here before but I don't remember. It didn't stick out in my mind ... I think that it's because there is nothing special that sticks out as spectacular. The Food is average Italian, the service was above average but ehh ... in a "Yelp" word ... A-ok. I had Fettuccine Porcini and it tasted fine. Decent but nothing in my head that screams WOW.
Best Italian in Palo Alto...the pastas are second to none.
Really not good and pretty expensive. The menu is limited and disappointing. "Spaghetti with olive oil".....please.
Don't know what's the hype about this place.  Sure, it's home made pasta... but you also need to know how to cook it to perfection (not into a blob because you cooked it too long - this was on several occassions, and only the Cabonara plate seems to hit it Al Dente). The other entrees were okay, but basically just drenched with butter.  For sure, most people will think it's tasty... coz well it's either drenched with butter or garlic.. but that's certainly nothing 'spectacular'.  The calamari steak.. again butter everywhere, and the breading sucks.  Probably made from egg batter... okay but not spectacular.... Lastly, the guy, who's probably the owner, with glasses, darkish brown hair who smokes outside once in a while is REALLY annoying at times.  He was very rude on several occassions..  I'll stop bashing at him, but really need to make this point for future visitors. BTW, Pasta Pomodoro (Santana Row) is probably better than this.  Spend you money on the chain, not on this.
Wonderful little home-y restaurant in the middle of downtown PA. The pasta - especially the angel hair - is great. Great prices, especially for the area, and the service is awesome.
Simple, simple Italian fare at a reasonable price, even for non-Palo Alto standards. Carpaccio was... absolutely... fantastic. I was only somewhat satisfied with my spinach noodle ravioli entree, but my friend's pasta dish with the restaurant's namesake was delicious. On a cold day I could probably just have the carpaccio and their minestrone endlessly... Would definitely come again.
Sadly, this place has changed so much in the last year that it's hardly recognizable. It used to have charm, brusque waiters, good food, good prices and a certain ambiance.  Now it still has good food, good prices and probably the rudest greeter and hostess that I've encountered in  long time,  They have squeezed as many tables as they can into the place and as you're trying to eat you are constantly bumped by the waiters who have no room to navigate We were allowed barely an hour to eat our meal before drinks etc. started being removed from the table. We had to grab for our glasses in order to finish our drinks. To make sure we got the message they removed everything from the table that they could. We had brought friends with us and were mortified at the treatment.  I should also add that we have been coming to Osteria for 22  years but Saturday night was our last time.  In these difficult economic times we try to support local businesses and I would rather give my money to a business who values MY  business and treats me respectfully.
Exceedingly average in all respects other than Osteria has a great corner location.  The menu is very traditional simple Italian which when done right is a personal favorite.  You can't really screw up Insalata Caprese if the ingredients are fresh, and Osteria does this and other dishes fine.  The disappointments are everything is terribly average, the wine list is bad, and the service is average.  Once every few years I go in hopes Osteria has finally gotten the energy to deliver great food.  After 6 visits I have officially given up.
Came in last night for a first date.  Luckily we had a reservation because the place was packed! We were sat at Bobs table right by the window. I had the gnocchi and Brannan had the chicken and spinach and both were delish! We split the pudding with fresh berries and chocolate sauce. It was amazing! Awesome vibe, awesome food, awesome service.
minus 1 star for old man who cleared our plates and water before we were done. came here for lunch the bread was YUMMY! and good value. soo much food for the $$, that I could have pasta for leftovers later... delicious. drooling just thinking about it I had penne with red sauce. yum!
linguine con vongole (pasta with clams and tomato sauce) was tasty. i want to make this at home! bread was cold and unappealing so i didn't touch it.
I actually didn't try the pasta but had chicken breast in a sauce I found to be too rich. The service is mediocre and slow. But the friends I ate with found their pasta to be delicious so it could be my own personal experience. I don't intend to go back though.
The prices are high and the taste is low. Low as in "Nasty, what am I eating?" sort of low. I'm never going to go by Osteria again. The Creamery down the street as better food that this stuffy restaurant.
EDIT: I had to change my rating from 5 to 3 stars... the food again was simply delicious but I've noticed that each time I've left Osteria I'm left incredibly thirsty for the rest of the night. I never thought of the possibility of an Italian restaurant using MSG - but that must be it, sadly. Original review:  Whenever I think about my travels in Italy, so much of what I think about is the amazing food. I happened to have the best food in Tuscany, and coming to Osteria, I felt it was the closest to Tuscan food as I've had in the US! I had the tortellini and it was delicious. I savored every tortellini and made sure to have every last bite. I broke the rules and ordered a red to go with my meal, a Chianti, which I also thoroughly enjoyed. I had the warm molten chocolate for dessert and that was divine, as well. I can't wait to go back - I will be making a reservation soon!
Really, I'd like to give this place 3.5 stars, but since I'm restricted to whole numbers, I'm staying conservative. We came here a bit late on a Friday night so we wandered over to Gordon Biersch to while away our 45 minute wait for a table.  The restaurant seemed to be full of regulars, which seemed like a good sign.  The restaurant's decor was nothing to write home about--peaceful waiting room pastels--but nothing to complain about really either. Our waiter was this old-school guy who spoke maybe 10 words to us the entire evening but served us efficiently nonetheless.  However, it was when I asked for extra parmesan cheese and he just left the whole bowl of cheese on the table for me that he really won me over.  I'll admit it, I'm a whore for parmesan cheese, and while I'm sure I'm doing a horrible disservice to good pasta by putting so much cheese on it, tough.  I like cheese.   And I like it when a waiter is down with that instead of getting all snooty about giving me only one or two stingy grates. The pasta was well-cooked, and my husband's veal piccata was tasty, and he said it was the most meat he's ever gotten at a restaurant when ordering that dish.  So, we'll be back.
After having a reservation and waiting for 45 minutes as "locals" or more valued reservations were seated ahead of us with later reservations we walked out.
Yet another decent but not great Italian place in DoPA (that's Downtown Palo Alto for the rest of you).  The food was good, but not great.  The service was very fast.  The prices were pretty fair for what you got. I found the tagliatelle to be a little overcooked, and for a place that boasts of their homemade fresh pasta right on the menu, that's a little too much to bear.  All in all, I'll probably go back here and try a few more dishes, since it's certainly fairly priced.  But it's not the place I'd go if I was trying to impress somebody.
Mediocrity defined. It checks the boxes of what people think of as "Cucina Toscana," but that's all. I've eaten here several times (when I worked nearby, it was always the restaurant of choice when I wasn't doing the choosing), and not once (I'm not exaggerating) did I have pasta that hadn't turned to mush by the time the steaming noodles, served on a hot dinner plate, had cooled to an edible temperature. The place is charming at first sight but over time takes on the feel of a corporate chain; if the safety of a chain is what you want, you'd do a lot better to walk around the corner to Il Fornaio.
Probably the best pasta in the bay area.  And their bread is very yummy.  I also need to figure out the recipe in their salad dressing.  It is probably also the best I have ever tasted.  They lose a star because their staff is sometimes a little rude and because I have to snuggle with total strangers while I'm eating and endure constant butt to face contact due to how close together they place their tables.
We've lived in Palo Alto for years and never tried this place. Now we have, we won't be going back. I do not understand why Osteria remains popular and  crowded. The menu is ordinary, basic Tuscan with no surprise or individuality. The room is crowded and noisy with huge and (we thought)  ugly abstract paintings on all walls. The real disappointment was the food. The bread was good ol' San Francisco sourdough, fresh, almost the best thing we had. It is served with a few pats of butter. What Italian restaurant doesn't at least have olive oil on the table? My wife's "caesar" salad had never been in the same room as an anchovy, and the romaine was cut in huge pieces, 2-3 inches square. The cheese on it was powdered, not grated, and flavorless. My spinach salad was supposed to have pine nuts; I found one (1) pine nut. The cheese in it had little flavor. My wife chose the day's special, lamb tenderloins. The meat was good and cooked as she ordered it, but it was accompanied by green beans that were grossly overcooked to limp steam-table texture. I ordered a papardelle pasta "Osteria." The pasta was grotesquely overcooked, the heap of it on the plate collapsed like a pile of mush. The sauce was a fine mince of eggplant, tomato and onion with a mushy texture, bland color, and little flavor. All in all an unpleasant dish and I ate less than half of it. I was of course offered "parmesan" for my pasta; the waiter carried a bowl of the same fine-ground sawdust that had adorned the caesar salad. I am sure this is the same stuff you buy in cardboard tubes with a shaker top in the grocery, and its relationship to Italian Parmesan is in name only. It's junk, and a restaurant that uses it has no concept of flavor and no respect for the cuisine. I was prepared to mention a few of these things to the waiter, but he never found the time to ask us how we liked our meal. Spalti,  on California avenue, is a far better Italian restaurant -- better food, better service, nicer room. Il Fornaio, two blocks away from Osteria, is also better in every way. There's just no reason to go to Osteria.
The Linguini con Vongole was fantastic (especially since I hear they make their own pasta), and I loved the Chianti wine that our group ordered. The linguini tasted even better when I re-heated the leftovers the next day! Prices were super cheap (around $13 for the dish I ordered). Minus one star because the place was WAY too crowded... Our table was tiny, and walking through the restaurant feels a bit claustrophobic. Also, we had made a reservation for 7:30, but they didn't seat us until close to 8 (which kind of defeats the purpose of a reservation). Loved the food, though ~ great-tasting Italian and good wine for a recession-friendly price.
Osteria has a wonderful combination of great tasting food, solid service and an environment that is energized. One of the waiters (Aldo) is great and has been serving us it seems, for 20+ years. We have never had a bad meal hear, and we walk out each time, full and happy. The original Osteria is in SF, and is very good as well. We would agree that not everyone would like Osteria, but for our family, it is our number ONE Italian restaurant, and has been for a long time.
Osteria has the best pasta in Palo Alto!  Although always crowded, it's a great place for business lunches because they are quick (very quick) and the food comes out piping hot.  The carbonara is my favorite - its not on the lunch menu but they are always happy to make it for me anyway.
Glad me and my girlfriend found this place. The food is good, especially with the homemade pasta. The service can be good and then ehh sometimes but the food comes out super fast. Also, the prices are very reasonable. Perfect place to go on a date since Ostera has this cozy ambiance. We have been here a couple times and I've tried something new each time and everything has been good so far. We will definitely be repeat customers. And oh yeah, make sure you save space for their hazelnut flan...BOMB
Finally a solid 4.  I felt like I was in a funk for a while - giving out a lot of .5s.  Anyway - the food here is fantastic.  The salads are huge and the meals are really flavorful.  I got the chicken marsala and it was quite yummy.  Reservations are almost required if you don't want to wait forever to eat.  It is a small little dining area and quite intimate with the other restaurant patrons.  My friend and I came here though and despite tables being close together - we heard each other just fine.  Osteria somehow uses their space efficiently.  Service, also good, we weren't rushed at all.
Service is RUSHED here, but they are courteous and will bring everything out immediately. This is not the place for a leisurely meal though. The food came out super fast and was really hot, fresh off the stove.  We had the sambuca (spelling?) and parpardelle.  The dishes were simple  enough that someone could them make at home, if they are inclined.  Everything was good, but nothing stood out. Got spumoni and cheesecake. desserts are all around $5 each and appropriately portioned for one person. I would go back again.
This is my wife's and my favorite restaurant in downtown Palo Alto. We probably eat here 3 times a month. Pros: Service: the host, waiters and bus boys are very friendly, professional and quick to remember you if you visit frequently and greet you with a smile. It reminds me of an old school, neighborhood Italian restaurant from New York, specifically the Bronx. White table cloths, good fresh food, fast, friendly service, fair prices and a feeling that you were a welcome family member and they looked forward to your next meal there. It's a place that quickly becomes a habit. Food: The carpaccio is the best I've ever had (and I've had a lot). Big portion of bright red meat with capers, chopped onions, dijon mustard and olive oil and fresh-ground pepper to taste. My other favorite appetizer is the prosciutto and melon. Nice salty prosciut over fresh juicy melon slices. The pastas are hand-made fresh daily and it shows -- they are incredibly soft and light, and delicious. Our favorites are the special veal ravioli, the regular spinach ravioli and the parpadelle. The spaghetti carbonara is delicious: salty prosciutto cubes, garlic, egg, black pepper and the right amount of oil. Rich but not nearly as heavy as many other versions of the same dish, probably because they don't appear to use much if any cream. They have a salmon poached in tomato sauce which is also very good, as well as some grilled swordfish and salmon. Best of all, the food comes piping hot (a major focus for my wife), with the plates obviously having been in the oven (the waiters carry them on folded napkins) and steam pouring off the pastas. We rarely have room for dessert but the hazelnut flan is good and the affogato (vanilla ice cream with espresso poured over top) is my favorite. Value prices: The food seems under-priced, with the pastas in the teens and the meat entrees around $20. Cons: Seating: The room is very small and the tables are small and practically on top of each other, as an (understandable) result. The room can also get a bit hot and loud when the tables are all full, as they usually are. It can also be very hard to get a table as a walk-in without a reservation because the place is very popular (probably for the good food at great prices) and is always packed for dinner. We have had to wait 10-15 mins ourselves on occasion, even with a reservation, but what are you gonna do? I think that's the nature of the beast with a restaurant with only this many seats. (It reminds me of a famous Yogi Berra saying: "That place is so crowded nobody goes there anymore!) The food: Is probably very rich. The salads are a little heavily dressed for me and the vegetables with the entrees come drenched in butter. The wine list: Is not great. It's fairly limited with not too many wines I know are good or well-priced. The upside is they allow corkage for only $17.
This is a good Italian restaurant.  There is not a large selection on the menu, but it is all good and well made.  This is a good place to take a date.
Came here to eat a year ago and had the linguine vongole, but I remember I didn't like it because it was served in a red sauce and because they used canned clams.  Then I came back to try something new like their tagliatelle with porcini mushroom sauce.  I liked the fact that they seem to use fresh pasta but it's always overcooked.  Fresh pasta when overcooked gets mushy and that's how Osteria serves their pasta.  My husband got the spinach pasta with shrimp in cream sauce.  I liked the fact that they didn't drown their pasta in cream sauce, but it was still a little overcooked for my tastes.
My recent meal here was very good. If you like proscuitto, order the appetizer. It's superb. My pasta "just okay." The place was SUPER crowded on a Wednesday night and we had a 20 minute wait. So there must be a better dish on the menu than my choice. Looking forward to coming here again.
I really liked this place.  The food/pasta was fresh.   Prices were awesome- very reasonable.  My only complaint was that it was very crowded, and that waiters, patrons, etc kept hitting the back of my chair on their way to their table, the restroom etc.
Osteria is considered by many to be Palo Alto's best restaurant. And i believe them. Food and service is always excellent. Service is top notch and knowledgeable. Food is prepared by an experienced chef and is always hot. Definitely make a reservation, there's no bar and a small waiting area.
This place could use some ventilation...seriously. After bringing my boyfriend here for his birthday, we couldn't even stay for dessert cause there was something in the air that was burning our eyes soooo bad.  Must have been smoke from the kitchen or something.  Not a good experience. What to expect? Traditional Italian food.  Don't come here if you're expecting any new combination of flavors.  The pasta is homemade and very good.  Though the whole idea of having just a plain pasta dish (with no interesting vegetables) for dinner is really not my thing...I mean if I'm going to be eating THAT many carbs at once, it better be worth it.  My boyfriend's eggplant dish was good. Our waiter was kinda spacey and it was really hard to catch his eye if we ever wanted something. Oh, but the *biggest* disappointment was when I asked to have my pasta and our spinach side dish wrapped up to go.  I get home and open the bag and all I see are two lumps of foil.  After slowly unraveling each ball did I discover the food all balled up inside. Gross!!  What the heck!!!  What happened to even a cheap lil to-go container??  For all the presentation effort they went to when they first gave it to me, they certainly treated it like garbage when wrapping it up.  Not cool. This place was overhyped for me.  I'm not rushing to go back.
Not my mother's Italian, but still one of the best Italian Restaurants in the south bay. Try the calamari steak it creates memories and dreams. Really outstanding. Never had a meal I did not like. Make sure you call early in the week for reservations that weekend or you will not be seated. Try anything on the menu and you will be pleased. Ciao
Consistently excellent northern Italian food, with very friendly service and a moderate price (my favorite kind of place ;-)
I was excited to try this restaurant since I read great things about it online, but I was quite disappointed with the experience.  The food is good--my gnocchi was fantastic, and the sauce was fine--but the service was terrible.  They overbooked, so many of us with reservations were forced to wait an extra 15-20 minutes to be seated.  It seemed that there were only two servers for the entire restaurant, so our waiter took approximately 15 seconds to take our order and then never came back.  If the service were improved, I would happily recommend this restaurant, but until then, I won't be back.
A few of my coworkers and I had been recommended this place and were told that this restaurant was probably the "best in the state" obviously they haven't left Palo Alto. We had a reservation and some of our party were running a little bit late and while we were seated we were constantly harassed by the wait staff and what looked to be a manager. While I would understand if this place was busy and it was dinner rush, I could see how this possibly could pose a problem. However there was our party, a known crazy woman that walks the streets of Palo Alto and a party of 3 that had been seated a few minutes after us. One of the employees kept walking over and asking us where our party was and when would they show up in the span of 10 minutes. I assume the one had grown tired of us and sent either a general manager or another waiter to harass us. This time he got down to our level in my friends face and "politely" told us that if we had noticed the other wait staff start looking angry or "hostile" that it would be a good idea that we order our food. If this is what is considered customer service in Palo Alto and especially at Osteria I have no idea how this place is able to survive and continue its business. While this was a horrible experience and probably due to our age since we were the youngest ones in this horrible establishment then I would assume these people need to learn how to treat customers better and not automatically assume about their patrons. I wont recommend this place to anyone, this complete disregard for a customer and their restaurant experience has solidified my thoughts for this place. Hopefully they will learn to treat their customers a lot better from now on.
Been coming here for quite some time. Food is always great and comes piping hot. They have a great staff of people working for them. I would recommend them to anyone. Prices are reasonable. Would recommend you make a reservation.
Based on Yelp review, I took a guest tonight for a dinner. Like few reviewers below who complained about bad service, especially by the manager or so.  I had the exact same experience tonight. When we went there, it was crowded and were told that the waiting time was 30-40min.  We decided to wait and fortunately, the crowd was getting smaller.  But he seated a couple who came much later than us. I watched him making some gesture to this couple while having us wait. He gave them a nice table next to the window.   I kept giving him a look and when he finally seated us, it was  corner.   Then he whispered in my ears whether I wanted to wait longer (as if do you want to seat here in this corner table or wait longer).   He certainly seemed to give favor to others rather than seating people as they come. Food was good, but SERVICE, especially by this guy who was wearing black shirt and pant if he is the manager, you need to LEARN how to provide SERVICE.
I created a yelp login just to write this. My Osteria experience today in two words: HORRIBLE SERVICE. Personally, I have no issues with the food - actually it's quite good. But I was in a hurry today since I only had a little over an hour for lunch and I thought I'd drop by with a friend for a quick bite. Not only was it extremely difficult to get the waiter's attention for everything (had to call twice to get a spoon, three times to get a box for leftovers and the check), when I finally had to wave to get the waiter's attention, he STOMPED over to the table, waved HIS arm at me (as a protest to the fact that I waved at him - but hello, keep your eyes on the table you're supposed to wait on because THAT's your job.  Don't make me wave to get your attention), and to top it all off, I got yelled at for rushing him.  Yes - yelled at, scolded, reprimanded.  Whatever you want to call it. Had I the time to sit there and call the manager over, complain, etc., I would've given him a piece of my mind but my lunch hour was almost up and I had to go, so I simply apologized for rushing him and asked for the check. Not only does he talk to me in this..  SARCASTIC way, but he boxes my food, literally throws it on the table, and stomps off. The lady at the cashier's table (presumably the manager?) saw this and rushed over to our table to get our check taken care of, but at this point, I vowed that I would NEVER return to this place, ever again.  Why should I pay my good money to be treated like that? I have seen some great waiters at Osteria.  Don't get me wrong - not everyone at this place is like the jerk that I unfortunately came across today. But for crying out loud, some waiters need serious training before they serve anyone. Will someone please teach them that they should not yell at their customers?  Please?  I'm not expecting five-star service here.  Just the basics.  That's not asking for too much....  or is it?
The food was good, but my pasta was a little overdone.  My friend having the linguine was much better.  I would say the food was above average. The things that I do not like about the place are: 1)  I walk in, and the place was hazy with cooking smells that were overwhelming.  When I walk out of the place, all my clothes and hair smelled like butter and garlic, to a point, that I need to go home and shower and wash my hair AND my clothes. 2)  The waiter was not very attentive.  We asked for some olive oil, and it took two more times of asking before it came.  He also reached across other guests to drop the plates off, instead of walking around the table. 3)  The host basically pushed us out the door, about 3 minutes after I signed the credit card chit.  He explained that he "squeezed" us in, "just like he told us when we got our reservation", and that their lobby is full of people waiting for a table.  Well, he NEVER told us that he needed to "squeeze" us in; he just gave us a choice for 6:30 or 8PM.  If he had a problem with us having appetizers, main course, and desert, which took a bit of time, he should have told us before we sit down, what time we need to be done.  Literally, it was 3 minutes after I signed the chit and he walked over to have his little talk with us. Despite the food being relatively good, I don't think I want to visit this place again.
Other than the condescending sneer from the Maitre d' upon our arrival, it was fine. Whoever the guy is, with his Euro-tight pants, slicked back hair, unshaven face and earring, he needs a lesson in customer service! We walked in the door five minutes after our reservation time, having called ahead to tell them we'd be a bit late, and he said to us something like, "A little late, aren't you?" and then grudgingly showed us to our table. We will not be going back, which is a shame because the food was good and the waiter--an older Italian man--was really delightful. The artichoke and shrimp appetizer we had was great. My gnocchi was okay and my husband's veal piccata also okay, but I wasn't wowed.
My go to place in Palo Alto for fine Italian dining.  Just went there again last night and love it for the food, service, and price.  We were assisted by an irish waiter who interestingly enough sounded italian at one point to me.  We ate family style and he split everything at our table for no charge.  The pastas are tasty but not overbearing and the veal has no peer.  Best of all, it's down the street from Peninsula Creamery, so you can go get Apple Pie a la mode or a refreshing milkshake after the meal.  Like I tell everyone, being overweight takes a lot of hard work that I am willing to put the effort into.
It is more like 4.5 stars. If they only train the woman who answers the phone to be more friendly, this would be a 5 stars. The food is consistently good here, the prices reasonable and the food is fresh too. It is homey, kind of loud and you are somewhat close to the next table.
I'm personally Anti-Olive Garden. They do an ok job of introducing Italian to the masses and for sheer convenience, I don't have to make a reservation to stand in line to eat spaghetti and meatballs. But Osteria is quite something else in the complete opposite end of the spectrum. Here you will find authentic Italian food at reasonable prices in a simple yet elegant atmosphere. Evenings are best served in your casual formal attire and you can bet you'll get a second and third date after you take the future Mrs. here. Golden. Fellas, I recommend you pick your go-to spots and use them regularly. This is one of those places where even if you don't have game, you can separate yourself from the rest.
Pretty much my favorite Italian restaurant. Their pesto pasta and fettucine Alfredo are perfect. I am not much of a pasta coinoisseur but the only difference I can taste in the quality of pasta dishes is that of Osteria pasta. To me, there is Osteria pasta, and then there is non-Osteria pasta. The prices are a bit steep but that's what you get for eating in downtown Palo Alto. It's a pretty quiet place, good for taking dates, parents, parole officers, etc.
I think this is an authentic Italian place, friendly service, very fast and kinda easy going atmosphere. Crowded and noisy, a good first date place i think. The lamb was good but the sides were ok. I would say 3 1/2 stars would be fair.
Really top notch Italian - keep it simple stupid menu - and a cozy, family-oriented, but classy atmosphere. Worth the wait; the best in the area for sure. And, totally affordable, especially for PA.
The other best Italian food in Palo Alto.  Home-style, always tasty, and not over-large.
Easily one of my favorite Italian restaurants. Very generous portions, great service, and very good tasting food. The seafood pasta is very good. It does get packed here so make reservations ahead of time. This place puts Buca to shame.
This place is always crowded so if you are planning on going for dinner, call and make a reservation ahead of time. I have been here a few times and am ready to write my review. My favorite thing to eat here and if you can refrain from ordering anything else, would be to get the freshly handmade pastas. We had some salad appetizers and they were ok but there seemed to be too much vinegar in them which made them taste very sour and strong. But the pastas have never failed me. So order the pasta! Then go down the street to Fraiche for some fro yo.
I went to Osteria for the first time recently.  We took a customer out for dinner and this place was recommended by a cow-orker.  It was conveniently located across the street from a parking garage.  It's a quaint little place on the first floor of the Cardinal Hotel.  I guess you need reservations here, I guess we were lucky to walk in at 6:30pm on a weeek night and get a table.  I had the Fettucine Al Pesto.  It was pretty good, not spectacular.  The melon in the prosciutto e melon was not the sweetest.  I really enjoyed the sourdough bread on the table.  My dining companions had the sole and the gnocchi and they agreed theirs was good but not the most fantastic thing ever.
From what I can tell, Osteria is the best Italian restaurant on the Peninsula.  Reasonable prices, good portion sizes, great homemade pastas, and good service.  Usually difficult to get a table for dinner on the weekends, but relatively easy at lunch.
This is a very authenic pasta place. It passed the "italian test" which is it passed muster with our friend's Italian hubby who was born and raised in Italy. They make their own pasta... what more could you want? The parpadelle osteria was amazing and so was the tagliani with shrimp. Yum!
Only had dinner once there and there was food was very good. Remind me of the good Italian food we had in Spain. The restaurant is small so it is noisy but who care when the food is good.
Awesome food! I tried fresh gnocchi with pesto sauce, the much-reviewed polenta appetizer, and hazelnut flan. Each item was delicious - the polenta was cooked right, the pasta sauce was creamy yet the amount of cream had been well-balanced with the pesto, the gnocchi didn't have more dough than the filling, and the flan was  excellent. Definitely worth another visit!
I've been here three times over the years, always willing to give Osteria another try, I really want to like it. There's nothing bad about Osteria, and, there's nothing good about Osteria. Perhaps I'm an Italian food snob but the homemade pasta that everyone raves about at Osteria is simply "meh" to me. There's always a long wait, even if you make a reservation. The restaurant is small and they pack a ton of people in there. There's not too many vegetarian options and the service is spotty. Portions are huge so plan for having leftovers for lunch (if you can stomach eating their leftovers again, I can't). I'll probably be returning, but it won't be my idea.
Our favorite Italian place in the area.   Worth the drive. Always perfectly cooked.  Reasonably priced, good portions.  Waitstaff is no nonsense but competent.  So delicious!
Friendly staff, authentic Italian menu, great chianti, flavorful entrees, boisterous atmosphere.  A bit cramped but cozy.
